SKETCHES.
A DAY AT RAVENNA.
Shall we go see the reliques of this town?
Twelfth Night
On
a gloomy evening, I found myself crossing the
broad plains contiguous to the ancient city of Ravenna.
These extensive fields serve chiefly for pasturage, and
their monotonous aspect is only diversified by a few
stunted trees and patches of rice. Nearer the Adriatic,
however, the eye is relieved by the appearance of a noble
forest of pines, which extends for the space of several
miles along the shore. The branches of these trees, as
is common in Italy, have been, by repeated trimmings,
concentrated at the top; and most of them being lofty,
a complete canopy is formed, beneath which one walks
in that woodland twilight so peculiar and impressive.
The effect is enhanced here, by the vicinity of the sea,
whose mournful anthem or soothing music mingles with
the wind-hymns of the forest aisles. As we emerged
from a magnificent church that stands in the midst of this
solitude, the interior columns of which were transported
from Constantinople, no living object: disturbed the
profound
repose of the scene, but a group of fine cattle,
instinctively obeying the intimations of nature, and slowly
returning to their domiciles. I found no difficulty in
realizing that this scenery, when arrayed in the dreamy
influences of such an hour, should prove congenial to the
poetic mood, and wondered not that Byron, during his
long residence at Ravenna, found so much pleasure in
coursing through this quiet country, and along the
adjacent
shore.
The old city, like Venice, to whose triumphant arms,
after so many fierce wars, it was at last subjected, rose
from the marshes, and, although apparently at a
considerable
distance from the sea, presents, even at the present
day, abundant indications of its marine foundation; and
among them, the traveller observes with regret, the
obliterating traces of a humid air, in the discolored and
corroded frescos of the churches. One of the most
valuable of these, however, has been singularly well
preserved
,
considering that it has withstood the combined
effects of dampness and removal from its original
position
a
process involving no little risk. This beautiful
specimen is at present fixed in the sacristy of the
cathedral
.
It represents the angel visiting Elijah in the
desert; and dimmed as are its tints by time and moisture,
no one can gaze upon the sweet face of the angel, radiant
with youth, and contrast it with the calm, aged
countenance
and gray locks of the sleeping prophet, without
recognizing that peculiar grace which marks the creations
of Guido. Happily, some of the most ancient vestiges
of art discoverable at Ravenna, exist in the more durable
1*
form of mosaics. Several of the churches, but
particularly
the baptistry, and the sepulchral chamber of Galla
Placida, are completely lined with this curious species of
painting, evidently of the most primitive order.
But by far the finest antiquity, is the edifice called the
Rotunda, which, like almost every similar relic in Italy,
with equal disregard to taste and propriety, is fitted up as
a modern church. This building is the mausoleum of
Theodoric. It is without the walls, and approached
through an avenue of poplars, whose yellow leaves rustled
beneath our feet, or whirled in wild eddies over the
grass. The cloudy sky and the solitude of the spot were
also favorable to the associations of the scene. The form
of the structure is circular, and the dome is considered a
curiosity, being constructed from a single piece of marble.
It is likewise remarkable, that all attempts to drain the
water which has collected beneath the building, have
proved fruitless. A flight of steps leads to the interior,
which has long since been denuded of its ornaments;
and the porphyry sarcophagus which surmounted the
structure, and contained the ashes of Theodoric, has
been removed, and imbedded in the walls of the old
building supposed to have been his palace. I could not
but remark, as I afterward noted this ancient urn, the
singular combination which seems to attend memorials
of past greatness. The side presented to view, was
covered with the notices of public sales and amusements,
a purpose which it had evidently long subserved, while
the mansion itself has been converted into a wine
magazine.
The fortifications of Ravenna, which were obviously
constructed on no ordinary scale, have fallen into decay.
Traces of but two of the many towers designated on the old
charts, are discoverable; and a city, whose obstinate and
prolonged conflicts with the Venitian republic are alone
sufficient to vindicate the warlike character of its ancient
inhabitants, now furnishes the most meagre evidences of
former activity and prowess. The few soldiers now seen
in its deserted streets, serve not, alas! to defend the town
or enlarge its possessions, but minister to the ignoble
purpose of draining its wretched inhabitants of their
scanty resources. About three miles from one of the
gates, a column commemorates the fate of Gaston De
Foix. This brave knight, notwithstanding his extreme
youth, had won so high a reputation for invincible courage
and address, that he was intrusted with the command of
the French troops, then struggling for the possession of
Italy. When De Foix attacked Ravenna, it was
vigorously
defended by Antonio Colonna, who, in anticipation
of his design, had entrenched himself with an effective
force within the walls. After a warm conflict on the
ramparts, the crumbling remnants of which still attest
their former extent and massive workmanship, during
which not less than fifteen hundred men perished in the
space of four hours, the invaders were compelled to
withdraw
.
At the instant the young commander was rallying
his troops for a second assault, he was informed of the
approach of the general army. They were soon fortified
about three miles from the town, and the French warrior
found himself in a situation sufficiently critical to damp
the ardor of the best tried valor. Before him was his old
enemy, of whose prowess he had just received the most
signal proof, and near by, a fresh and vigorous army,
while his position was utterly destitute of those
accommodations
requisite to recruit his forces, or afford the
necessary
provisions either for men or horses. In this
exigency
,
he formed the resolution to force the army to a
general conflict. Unfortunately for the Italians, the
leader of their Spanish allies differed from the other officers
as to the course expedient to be adopted; the one party
wishing to remain within the entrenchments, the other
advocating a general rally and open attack. The former
prevailed. The adverse armies continued to cannonade
each other for a considerable time, and the balance of
success was evidently in favor of the allied army, when
the Duke of Ferrara brought his highly efficient artillery
to bear from a very advantageous position in flank. So
unremitted and annoying was the fire, that the allies
were at length obliged to rush from their entrenchements,
according to the sanguine wishes of De Foix, and try
the fate of an open battle. On that memorable day, the
eleventh of April, 1512, occurred the most tremendous
action which for a long period had taken place on the
war-tried soil of Italy. As one wanders over the
mouldering bastions and solitary campagna of Ravenna,
and pictures the spectacle which on that occasion was
here beheld, the contrast between the retrospect and the
reality is singularly impressive. The shock of the
meeting
of those two mighty bodies is described by the
historian
of the period, as abounding in the awfully sublime.
The action was sustained with
a
relentless fierceness,
that soon laid the flower of both armies in the dust.
More than once, the impetuous valor of the Spanish
infantry
threatened to decide the fortune of the day; but
the Italian forces were at length compelled to fly, leaving
Cardinal de Medici, other illustrious prisoners, and all
their artillery and equipages, in the hands of the enemy,
besides nine thousand of their number dead upon the
field. The French loss was computed as still greater.
But the most lamentable event of the occasion, was
the fate of their gallant leader. Flushed with victory, he
pursued the panting squadrons of the fugitives with
unremitted
ardor, when, as he flew over the hard fought field,
at the head of a thousand horse, he was surrounded and
killed. There is something peculiarly touching in the
fate of this young chieftain. He had scarcely attained
the age of manhood, and was already regarded as the
flower of the French chivalry. Glowing with the
enthusiastic
,
though mistaken zeal of the period, he had just
led his soldiers to a victory eminently fitted to increase
the fame of his arms. After a season of suspense, which
must have appeared an age to his impatient spirit, he had
met the opposing forces on the open field. Long,
desperate
,
and dubious was the contest; but at length his
gladdened eye saw through the smoke of battle, the
retreating
ranks of the enemy; his enraptured ear caught,
above the din of war, the victorious shouts of his soldiers.
What visions of glory must have gleamed before his
imagination
,
as he spurred his charger over the conquered
field! How sweet must have been the gratulations of
his country, heard in exultant fancy! The lasting
trophies
of valorous renown were already won, and he was
but in the morning of life. The wreath of chivalric
honor, which his early ambition had pictured as a far-off
boon, was already his. Yet, in that moment of
triumphant
emotion, when he felt the wreath of victory pressing
his flushed brow, and heard, perhaps, the greeting of her
whose smile would be the sweetest flower in his garland
of renown, the fatal rally was made, and the gorgeous
visions of gratified ambition were suddenly obscured by
the mists of death! He fell, not at the fearful onset,
when despair of success might have reconciled him to
such a fate; nor in the midst of the struggle, when the
influence of his example, or the desire of revenge, might
have urged on his followers to yet fiercer effort; but at
the close of the fight, when the day was won, at the
instant
when the clouds of doubt broke asunder, and the
joyful beams of success blessed his sight. At such a
moment, fell the young and valiant Gaston de Foix.
In the academy at Ravenna, there is the statue of a
warrior carved in white marble. The name of the
sculptor
is not well authenticated; but the work seemed to me
remarkably well calculated to deepen the associations
which environ the memory of the French knight. The
figure is completely encased in armor, and sketched in
the solemn repose of death. The visor of the helmet is
raised, and the face presents that rigid expression, which
we cannot look upon without awe. The very eye-lids are
cut with such a lifeless distinctness, as to be eloquent of
death. Thus, thought I, fell the veil of dissolution over
the young soldier, whose bravery was here displayed.
How affecting, with the story of his valorous energy
fresh in the memory, to gaze upon such an image, and
to feel that thus he became in the very hour of his
triumph! Erroneous as were then the ends of youthful
ambition, yet is there enough of nobleness in the
associations
of that epoch, to hallow its ornaments to our
imagination
.
Comparing them with the selfish and narrow
ideas which too often mark the manners and demean the
characters of our day, we must sometimes lament, that if
the ignorance and barbarism of more warlike times have
departed, so has also much of their high and almost
universal
spirit of honor, gallantry and disinterestedness.
Like most secondary Italian cities, Ravenna wears the
semblance of desertion. At noonday, the stranger may
often walk through streets deficient neither in spaciousness
nor noble dwellings, and yet encounter no being, nor hear
a sound indicative of life, far less of active prosperity.
This was the case, to a remarkable degree, on the day of
my visit, as it occurred during the month of October, when,
according to the Italian custom, most of the nobility were
at their villas; and the sanitary restrictions established
on account of the cholera then raging in some parts of the
country, had greatly diminished the usual numbers of
passing
travellers. In the piazza, at some hours of the day,
there is a little life like appearance, from the assemblage
of buyers and sellers, and, at early evening, the
principal
caff exhibits the usual motley company collected to
smoke and talk scandal, or to pore over the few journals
which the jealousy of the government permits to find their
way into the country. These restricted vehicles of
communication
consist of little else than an epitome from
the French journals, of the most important political and
other passing events, collected and arranged with as little
reference to order and connection, as can well be
imagined
.
It is owing to the garbled and confused
notions
derived from these paltry gazettes, to which many
even of the better class of Italians confine their reading,
that there prevails in this country such profound
ignorance
of the most familiar places and facts. Some of the
ideas existing in regard to the United States, afford good
illustration of this remark. A retired merchant, who was
travelling in very genteel style; once asked me if Joseph
Bonaparte was still king of America. A monk of
Genoa, who was my companion in a voiture in
Lombardy
,
opened his eyes in astonishment when informed
that it was more than half a century since we had ceased
to be an English colony; and another friar, whose ideas
of geography were in rather a confused state, observed
that he considered mine a very aristocratic country,
judging
from what he had read of our president, Santa Anna.
A young Tuscan, of respectable standing, inquired if one
could go from Italy to America, without passing through
Madagascar; and a
signora
of some pretensions begged
in a very pathetic voice, to know if we were much annoyed
with tigers!
Life, for the most part in these reduced towns, accords
with the limited scope of the prevailing ideas. The
morning is lounged away in listlessness; the ride after
dinner, and the
conversazione
in the evening, being the
only ostensible occupation, except during the carnival,
when some theatrical or other entertainment is
generally
provided. Those of the resident nobility who can
afford it, usually travel half the year, and economize the
remainder. And if, among the better class, there are
those whose range of knowledge is more extensive, or
whose views are nobler, the greater part soon reconcile
themselves to a series of trifling pursuits, or idle
dissipation
,
as the appropriate offsets to their hopeless destiny.
Sometimes, indeed, a rare spirit is encountered, superior
to the mass, and incapable of compromising either
principle
or opinions, however objectless it may seem to
cherish them; and there are few more interesting
characters
than are such men, in the view of the thoughtful
philanthropist; beings superior to their associates, and
worthy of a better fate; men who, amid degrading
political
and social circumstances, have the strength and
elevation
of mind to think and feel nobly, and seek by
communion
with the immortal spirits of the past, or by
elevating
anticipations, consolation for the weariness and
gloom of the present. Occasionally, too, in such
decayed
cities, the stranger meets with those who, cut off
from political advantages, and possessed of wealth, have
devoted themselves to the pursuits of taste, and their
palaces and gardens amply repay a visit. Such is the
case with the eccentric Ruspini, one of the Ravenese
nobility, whose gallery contains many valuable and
interesting
productions of art.
At an angle of one of the by-streets of Ravenna, is a
small building by no means striking, either as regards
2
its architecture or decorations. It is fronted by a gate of
open iron-work, surmounted by a cardinal's hat
indicating
that the structure was raised or renovated by some
church dignitary, a class who appear invariably
scrupulous
to memorialize, by inscriptions and emblems,
whatever
public work they see fit to promote. A stranger
might pass this little edifice unheeded, standing as it does
at a lonely corner, and wearing an aspect of neglect;
but as the eye glances through the railing of the portal, it
instinctively rests on a small and time-stained bas-relief,
in the opposite wall, representing that sad, stern, and
emaciated countenance, which, in the form of busts,
engravings
,
frescos, and portraits, haunts the traveller in
every part of Italy. It is a face so strongly marked with
the sorrow of a noble and ideal mind, that there is no
need of the laurel wreath upon the head, to assure us that
we look upon the lineaments of a poet. And who could
fail to stay his feet, and still the current of his wandering
thoughts to a deeper flow, when he reads upon the
entablature
of the little temple, `
Sepulchrum Dantis Poet?
'
It is not necessary that one should have solved the
mysteries
of the
Divina Commedia
, in order to feel the solemn
interest which attaches to the spot where the bones of its
author repose. It is enough to know that we are
standing
by the tomb of a man who, in early boyhood,
loved
;
and cherished the deep affection then born, after its
object
was removed from the world, through a life of the
greatest vicissitude, danger, and grief, making it a
fountain
of poetic inspiration, and a golden link which bound
him to the world of spirits; a quenchless sentiment,
whose intensity vivified and hallowed existence. It is
sufficient to remember, that we are near the ashes of a
man who proved himself a patriot, and when made the
victim of political faction, and banished from his home,
wrapped himself in the mantle of silent endurance, and
suffered with a dignified heroism, that challenges
universal
sympathy and respect. It is sufficient to reflect that
the people who had persecuted the gifted Florentine when
living, have long vainly petitioned those among whom he
died, for the privilege of transporting his revered remains
to the rich monument prepared for them; and that a
permanent professorship, to elucidate his immortal poem,
is founded by the very city from which he was ignobly
spurned. It is enough that we see before us the
sepulchre
of a man who had the intellect and courage to think
beyond and above his age, who revived into pristine
beauty a splendid but desecrated language; who fully
vindicated his title to the character of a statesman, a
soldier
,
and a poet; and in a warlike and violent age, had
the magnanimity to conceive, and the genius to create,
an imperishable monument of intellectual revenge.
THE CHOLERA IN SICILY
The blessed seals
Which close the pestilence are broke,
And crowded cities wall its stroke.
Halleck
.
In
the modern history of pestilence, there are few
records which can parallel, for scenes of horror and
ceaseless
havoc, the course of the cholera in Sicily during the
summer of 1837. For many months previous to the
outbreak of the disease, the commerce of the country had
been essentially diminished, by a series of rigid and
absurd
quarantines; and so obstinate are the people in
their belief that the complaint is contagious, that they
still persist in ascribing its appearance in their capital
to the introduction of contraband goods from Naples,
where it was then raging. Notwithstanding these
precautionary
measures, no preparation was made in case
they should prove unavailing, so that when the dreaded
enemy arrived, the ignorance and poverty of the lower
orders, and the utter absence of remedial arrangements
on the part of the government, gave free scope to its
awful energies. A still more shameful cause of the fatal
triumph which it subsequently achieved, is to be found in
the pusillanimous conduct of the physicians and agents
of police, many of whom fled at the first announcement
of danger. For weeks the multitudinous precincts of
the city presented naught but the trophies of disease and
death. In many instances the bodies were thrown into
the streets; and not unfrequently from the carts which
removed them, might be heard the groans of some poor
wretch prematurely numbered among the dead. As a
last resort, the galley slaves were offered their liberty upon
condition of burying the victims; but few survived to
enjoy the dearly purchased boon. The strength of the
poor nuns finally became inadequate to transporting the
rapidly increasing bodies to the gates of the convents,
and these asylums were necessarily broken open by the
becci
. These wretches nightly made the circuit of the
deserted streets, by the light of numerous fires of
pitch, kept burning at long intervals, with a view of
purifying the air. They sat upon the heap of livid
corses piled up in their carts, stopping at each house
where a light glimmering in the balcony indicated that
their services were required. Entering without
ceremony
,
they hastily stripped the body, and placing it on
the cart, resumed their progress, generally singing as
they went, under the influence of intoxication or
unnatural
excitement. Arrived at the Campo Santo, their
burdens were quickly deposited in huge pits, and the
same course repeated until sunrise. It is remarkable, that
2*
of one hundred and fifty-six of those regularly employed
in this way, but three fell victims to the cholera.
The low situation of Palermo, surrounded as it is by
high mountains, and built nearly on a level with the sea
doubtless augmented the virulence of the disease.
During
several days in July, a strong
sirocco
wind prevailed;
and no one who has not experienced the suffocating and
dry heat of this formidable atmosphere, can realize the
complete lassitude it brings, both upon mind and body.
Engendered amid the burning sands of Africa, even its
flight across the sea chastens not the intensity of its heat.
It broods over the fertile valley in which the Sicilian
capital stands, with the still and scorching intensity of
noon-day in the desert. The laborers crouch beneath
the shadow of the walls in weary listlessness. The
nobility take refuge on the couch or in the bath. The
paper on the escritoir curls in its breath like the sensitive
plant at the human touch; and vases of water are
constantly
filled beneath the piano-forte, that the thin case of
the instrument may not crack asunder. The fresh
verdure
of the fields withers before it, and the solitary streets,
at the meridian hour, proclaim its fearful presence. The
occurrence of a
sirocco
soon after the advent of the
cholera, greatly augmented its ravages. Literally might
it be said, that the pestilence came on the wings of the
wind; and, unlike its course in other countries, it
primarily
attacked foreigners and the higher class of natives.
But a few days prior to its appearance, I left Palermo
for the other side of the island. The spring had been
unusually fine. Daily excursions, at that luxurious
season, nowhere more redolent of beauty than in Sicily,
had made me familiar with the rich scenery of the `golden
shell.' The same friends whose society enlivened these
excursions, brightened the
conversazione
with pleasant
intercourse and kindly interchange of feeling. It was
with something of a heavy heart that, on a brilliant day,
I gazed on the fast-fading outline of a prospect
interesting
from its intrinsic beauty, and endeared by habit and
association. A young countryman, who had been my
companion for many months, bade me farewell at the
mole. We parted with many assurances of a pleasant
meeting in a few weeks on the same spot, to enjoy
together the festivities of St. Rosaliathe great national
festival of the Palermitans, and one of the most splendid
in Europe. As we glided out of the beautiful bay, my
eye ranged along the palaces which line the Marina, till
it rested instinctively upon the hospitable mansion of the
American Consula gentleman whose home taught
probity
and application, and whose attachment to the
principles
of his country and the persons of his countrymen
never swerved during more than twenty years' residence
amid the enervating influences of the South. I knew
that in that mansion, there was at that hour a gathering
of social spirits, and remembered the kindly pleasantry
with which the host had interposed his consular authority
to prevent my departure, in order that I might make one
of the guests. I turned to Monreale, perched so
picturesquely
on the mountain range above the town, and
gazed upon the bold promontory of Mount Pelegrino,
rising like the guardian genius of the scene, in solitary
grandeur from the sea. With the aid of a telescope, I
could trace the neat promenade upon which I had so
often walked, unconscious of the passage of time, as the
tones of friendly converse soothed my ear, or the passing
glance of beauty cheered my sight. And as we were
rounding the last point and fast losing sight of every
familiar object, I caught a glimpse of the ancient and
noble dome of St. Guiseppe, beneath whose shadow was
the dwelling of one whose melody had often stirred my
weary pulse, and still rang sweetly in my memory. At
length the distant mountains covered with mist, alone
met my eager view. The night wind rose with a solemn
wildness, and the gloomy roar of the sea chimed in with
the shadowy tenor of my parting thoughts. But the idea
of soon revisiting the pleasant friends and favorite haunts
I was quitting, soon solaced me; and the next morning,
when I ascended to the deck, and found our gallant vessel
cleaving the blue waters before an exhilarating breeze
and beneath a summer sky, cheering anticipations
soon usurped the place of unavailing regret.
A few long summer days, and what a change came
over that scene of tranquil fertility and busy life! They
whose smiling adieus seemed so significant of a speedy
reunion, were no more. The youth whose manly
beauty and buoyant spirits I had so often noted on the
promenade and in the ball-roomthe leader in every
plan of social amusement, the first to start the humorous
thought, and the last to prolong the joyous laugh; he
whose prime found every energy at the height of action,
and life's plan widening with success; and the fair
creature to whose meek brow I was wont to look for the
sweetest impress of woman's dignity, as her voice was
attuned to the softest and most intelligent expression of
woman's mindall, as it were, struck out from the face
of the earthgone from the freshest presence of Nature
and the thoughtful scenes of an absorbing being, to the
dark and solitary grave!
Of a population of one hundred and seventy thousand,
according to the last census of Palermo, within the space
of two months, thirty-seven thousand were swept off:
and within the city, the number of interments in a single
day, when the disease was at its height, amounted to
three thousand five hundred. Appalling as is the bare
mention of such details, they are less calculated to shock
the imagination and sicken the heart, than many of the
subordinate and contingent scenes attending the
pestilence
.
There is such a mystery and superhuman
destructiveness
in the rise and progress of a fell contagion,
that the mind is awed as at the solemn fulfilment of a
divine ordination. But when the unrestrained and
savage play of human passions mingles with the tragic
spectacle of disease and death, absolute horror usurps the
place of every milder sentiment, and we are ready to
believe
that the pestilence has maddened the very soul, and
despoiled humanity of her true attributes. To
understand
the scenes of violence and atrocity which were
almost of daily occurrence during the existence of the
cholera in Sicily, it is necessary to remember the
circumstances
and temperament of the people. Perhaps in no
spot of earth do the extremes of civilized and savage life
so nearly approach each other as in this rich and ancient
island. Scattered over the kingdom, there are countless
beings in a state of ignorance and poverty which, but
for ocular proof, we should suppose could not co-exist
with the indications of social refinement observable in
the principal cities. These unhappy victims of want and
superstition possess passions which, like the fires of tna,
break forth with exhaustless energy, and when once
aroused, lead to consequences which it is impossible to
foresee or imagine. Crushed to the earth by exorbitant
taxation, and every national feeling insulted by the
galling presence of a foreign military, it is scarcely a
matter of surprise that when the long-dreaded cholera
appeared among them, aggravated in its symptoms by
the climate, and every moment presenting the most
harrowing
spectacles in the streets and by the way-side, they
should readily adopt the idea that their oppressors had
resorted to poison, as a means of ridding themselves of a
superfluous and burdensome population. Nor are there
ever wanting in every country, designing men, who,
from the basest motives of self-aggrandizement, are ready
and willing to inflame the popular mind even to frenzy,
if, in its tumultuous outbreak, their own purposes are
likely to be subserved. Such men are neither restrained
by an idea of the awful machinery they are putting in
motion
,
or the thought of their eventual danger; desperate
in their fortunes, they re-enact the scenes of Cataline,
and few are the epochs or the communities which can
furnish a Cicero to lay bare their mock-patriotism and
bring speedy ruin upon their projects, by exposing their
turpitude. Were an unvarnished history written of the
outrages which took place in Sicily in the summer of
1837, it would scarcely be credited as a true record of
events which actually transpired in the nineteenth
century
;
and while indignation would be deeply aroused
against the acts themselves, a new and more earnest
protest
would be entered in every enlightened mind against
the barbarous abuses of political authoritythe long, dark,
and incalculable evils for which despotism is accountable
to humanity.
In many places, the cry of a poisoner! was
sufficient
to gather an infuriated mob around any person
attached to the municipal government, or upon whom the
absurd suspicions of the populace could with the slightest
plausibility, fix. The unfortunate and innocent
individual
thus attacked, immediately found himself at the
mercy of a lawless crowd, in whose excited faces, flushed
with a stern and ferocious purpose, no hope of escape
was to be read; he was frequently struck to the earth,
pinioned, and dragged, by means of a long cord, through
the streets, the revengeful throng rushing behind with
taunts and imprecations. In more than one instance,
the heart of the poor wretch was torn out
before
the eyes of his friends. The fate of one of these
unhappy victims to popular fury was singularly awful.
He was one of the middle order of citizensa class
among whom was manifested more firmness and mutual
fidelity, during the pestilence, than in any other; for the
nobility, pampered by indulgence into habits of intense
selfishness, and the lowest order, driven to despair by the
extremity of their sufferings, too often entirely forgot the
ties of parentage and the claims of natural affection,
children
abandoning parents, and husbands wives, with the
most remorseless indifference. But among that
industrious
class, in which the domestic virtues seem always to
take the deepest root and to flourish with the greatest
luxuriance, there were numberless unknown and
unrecorded
instances of the noblest self-devotion. It was to
this rank that the unfortunate man belonged, and his
only daughter to whom he was tenderly attached, having
been carried off by the cholera, in the hope of saving his
own life and that of his two sons, they left the city and
fled towards Grazia, a town in the interior. Before they
reached their destination, the father was attacked by the
disease, and it became necessary to seek refuge in the
first convent. Here his sons nursed him for several days,
until, being slightly affected with symptoms of the malady,
the elder returned to Palermo in order to procure
medicine
and other necessaries. During his absence, an old
woman whom they employed as a laundress, discovered
in the pocket of one of their garments several pills
composed
of Rhubarb and other simple substances, which had
been procured in the city to be used in case of emergency.
She immediately displayed them to the peasants in the
vicinity, declaring her conviction that the invalid was a
poisoner. This evidence was sufficient. They rushed
to the convent, drew the sick man from his bed, and beat
him unmercifully. Meantime some of the party collected
a quantity of straw and wood, and binding the younger son
upon the pile, set fire to it before the father's eyes, whom,
having again beaten, they also threw upon the flames,
and burned them both alive. Soon after, the elder son
returned, having received medical advice in Palermo
which entirely restored him. Surprised at finding his
father's room vacant, he inquired for his brother of a little
boy, who replied by leading him to the spot where the
charred remains lay; his violent demonstrations of grief
soon attracted attention; his relationship to the two
victims
was discovered, and nought but the timely
interference
of an influential individual residing near, saved him
from sharing their fate.
The cholera appeared in Syracuse early in July.
About the middle of that month, strong indications were
manifested on the part of the people of a disposition to
revolt; and the public authorities were convened to
deliberate on the subject. There is no question that in
this place the fears of the multitude were excited by
designing
men. The shop of a bread-seller was forcibly
entered, and several loaves paraded about the streets as
poisoned, doubtless with the express purpose of
collecting
a mob. This was soon accomplished, and the
disaffected
throng next proceeded to the residence of an
apothecary, upon whom their suspicions fell, and, having
taken him to the public square, murdered him. The
Commissary of Police next fell a victim to their fury.
The Intendant, hearing that the mob were approaching,
made his escape by a by-lane, and applied to a boatman
to convey him beneath the walls of the citadel. The
boatman refused, and he was obliged to fly to the country.
His pursuers, however, soon discovered the direction he
3
had taken, and, following with bloodhounds, traced him
to a cavern called the Grotto, whence he was drawn and
dragged into the city, where, after suffering many outrages,
he was murdered before the image of the patron saint.
The next morning the Inspector of Police, his son, and
several other citizens, lost their lives. An old blind man
was seized upon, and threatened with death if he did not
give up the names of his accomplices. To save his life,
and doubtless prompted by some malicious persons, he
gave a list of respectable citizens, most of whom were
instantly seized and put to death. Meanwhile, similar
sanguinary proceedings were making many of the minor
towns of the island scenes of outrage and blood; and as
the populace of Syracuse grew emboldened by success,
they published and circulated a proclamation addressed to
their countrymen, commencing Sicilians! The cholera,
that dreadful disease, which has so long been the terror
of Europe, has at length found its grave in the city of
Archimedes, &c. going on to attribute it to poison, and
calling upon their countrymen to eradicate it by removing
the government which introduced it.
Towards the last of July, a report was spread in Catania,
that Major Simoneschi, of the
gendarmerie
, had taken
refuge
in the monastery of the Benedictines, and that he
was a distributor of the poisons which had desolated
Naples
and Palermo. A crowd collected under the direction
of several individuals of the rank of lawyers, brokers and
mechanics, who assaulted the monastery, but not finding
the person they sought, soon dispersed. As no notice
was taken of these proceedings by the civil authorities,
the mob were encouraged, and, in the course of a few
days, attacked the police and other public offices, in order
to possess themselves of the weapons there deposited.
On the same day, the manifesto of the Syracusans arrived,
was immediately reprinted by the rebel Catanese and sent
off to Messina with a band to excite a mob there also.
The town, however, was then under the protection of a
civic guard; and all attempts to excite disturbances were
vain. On the same evening, the Catanese arrested the
Intendente, Procuratore Generale, and the commander of
the
gendarmerie
, as persons suspected of distributing
poison
,
and confined them under guard in the house of one
of their nobility. They then formed a Council of
Security
,
and raised the yellow flag in token of Sicilian
Independence
.
The Intendente and Procuratore were forced
to swear allegiance to the new government, and were
then set at libertyalthough their freedom was all but
nominal, as they were kept under the strictest surveillance.
The garrison, being small and inefficient, was soon
disarmed
.
An original manifesto was published, declarative
of the good deeds and purposes of the rebels. The bells
of the churches were taken from their towers to be
moulded
into cannon. The pictures of the royal family were
collected from the various public edifices and demolished,
the statue of Francesco torn from its pedestal, destroyed
by order of the government, and the revolutionary
standard
displayed in its place.
The slight opposition with which these movements in
Sicily were met by the representatives of the government,
indicates the frail tenure by which Naples holds dominion
over the island. And when at length measures were
adopted to quell the disturbances, new scenes of horror
succeeded. The Marquis Del Carretto was commissioned
by the King to make the circuit of the island and inflict
summary justice upon all implicated in the recent
transactions
.
This officer appears to have been singularly
fitted for his sanguiary vocation. Had the victims to
martial law whom he caused to be sacrificed, been confined
to the conspicuous among the mob, or even to such as
had openly identified themselves with the violent deeds of
the populace, we might consider him in some measure
justified by the circumstances and occasion, in making
such an example as would prevent the farther effusion of
human blood.But many an act of the most aggravated
tyranny and cruel proscription perpetrated by Del
Carretto
,
under the pretence of restoring public order, will long
be remembered with indignation.
There is a class of educated Sicilians, and chivalrous
youth, who have cherished the hope of effecting the
independence
of their country, by means and at a period
altogether
different from those, into which the pestilence
precipitated
the fiery hearts of the less informed and the
deluded
.
In the midst of the various and contending
revolutionary
elements then convulsing Sicily, there were not
a few noble, ardent, and truly patriotic spirits who saw in
the course of events consequent upon the cholera, a still
longer postponement of their dearest hopesa still wider
chasm yawning between anticipated and realized freedom.
The unfitness of the mass for the boon of
self-government
was made appallingly obvious. The gradual,
healthy
spread of liberal sentiment was suddenly checked.
The government, long jealous and anxious for an
occasion
to inspire the people with fear, seized upon this
moment
to remove the most influential advocates of free
principles from the pathway of liberty. If the
revolutionists
availed themselves of the cholera to excite the
multitude
against the government, the latter took no small
advantages
of the excesses of the people to revenge
themselves
upon the daring, intelligent and quiet promulgators
of those truths which lie at the foundation of all
successful
innovation. Many a gifted young man was sentenced
to die in two hours, upon the bare evidence of having
uttered
or written some expression indicating his hostility
to foreign dominion; and not a small portion of the
flower
of the Sicilian youth were chased by a Neapolitan
vessel
of war beyond Elbarending the air, as they flew
before the breeze, with the glad strains of the Marsellaise.
One of the King's manifestos threatened with death all
who should
believe
in poisoning as the cause of the
pestilence
;
and his indefatigable deputy, who had volunteered
to avenge his cause upon the wretched Sicilians, passed
rapidly from city to city, holding levees for the adherents
of the crown, giving balls to the loyal ladies, confiscating
the estates of the refugees, and shooting, after the merest
mockery of a trial, all recognized ring leaders of rebellion
and every one who could, under any pretence, be
suspected
of being a liberal.
One poor youth escaped death only by flight who had
been seen to applaud some patriotic sentiment rather
vehemently
in the theatre; and the name of one of the best
3*
educated and finest young men of the island was placed
on the bloody list merely on the dying testimony of one
of the victims, wrung from him by the hope of a reprieve.
After the lapse of a few weeks, public order was
re-established
.
The pestilence ceased. Del Carretto returned
to Naples. But it will be long before the melancholy
traces of these calamities will pass away from the island,
or the solitary places be filled. The King has since
visited
his subjects, and a reconciliation has been effected.
Neither have their sufferings been wholly without political
benefit to the Sicilians. Many privileges have been
acceded
to the different communities. New commercial
facilities have been afforded, onerous regulations
abolished
,
and the quarantine system revised. Nor can the
conduct of a part of the inhabitants have failed so as to
impress the government as shall henceforth command for
them more respect, and cause their just rights to be more
readily recognized.
[1]
[1]
Later accounts however indicate but too plainly a renewal of
the most despotic and baneful policy.
One scene of which I was a witness,
was alone calculated to produce no transient impression.
As the news of the afflicting events which were
desolating
the other parts of Sicily, reached Messina, it threw
the whole city into mourning. The arrival of the Palermo
post was expected with an eager and painful interest
visibly
depicted upon the face of almost every passer; and at
all hours of the day, the Marina was studded with groups
whose auxious countenances indicated the one
absorbing
subject they were discussing. But on one occasion,
the spectacle presented from the balconies, was by no
means so quiet. A crowd had collected around the
Health Office, which rises directly from the water's edge,
and were clamoring to the deputies sitting within, to send
instantly away a brig of war which had that moment
entered
the port from Naples, where the cholera was then
raging, having been sent by the King, with clothing for
the troops, then quartered at Messina. The circle
immediately
around the building consisted of the lower orders
of the Messineseporters, boatmen and mechanics
their disordered vestments, shaggy beards and fierce
expressions
,
giving them not a little of a genuine
revolutionary
aspect. Behind these foremost actors in the
scene, stood a multitude of the better class, regarding the
movements of the rabble with simple curiosity or secret
approbation. The members of the Board of Health thus
found themselves in an awkward predicament. On the
one hand, they feared to disobey the royal order to
receive
the clothing, and on the other they were threatened
with the vengeance of an exasperated populace. Their
reply, however, was indecisive; and so deep and
vindictive
a murmur followed its annunciation, that the
frightened
deputies deemed it best to effect their escape. With
this view, they sprang from the back door and crowded
into the boats which were drawn up on the beach, urging
their owners to push off, and promising their adversaries
in the rear that the obnoxious vessel should be forthwith
sent away. It was ludicrous to see with what a
compromise
of dignity their escape was effected. Many of these
worthies rushed into the water above their middle, in order
to gain the boats. Their assurance of immediately
complying
with the popular desire, was received with a shout
of triumph, and the crowd eagerly watched their progress
as they glided on towards the quarantine harbor. When
about midway, however, they suddenly veered and moved
rapidly towards the citadel, within whose protecting walls
they were soon safely ensconced. The rage of the
people
when they found themselves thus deceived, was
beyond
measure. They instantly attacked the deserted
Health Office with clubs, stones and every obtainable
missile
,
and in a few moments it presented a ruinous and
shattered appearance. Scores of boys, half clad urchins,
sprang through the windows like bees from a hive, bearing
the records, account-books and files of papers connected
with the establishment, which they deliberately tore into
fragments, scattered to the winds or threw into the sea,
which was soon whitened for yards around with the
floating
masses. In the midst of the destruction, it was
curious
to observe the behavior of the leaders of the tumult.
One of them carefully conveyed away several of the most
valuable articles, and deposited them in the hands of a
highly respectable and popular citizen among the
bystanders
.
Another took a silver lamp and threw it far
out into the water, that it might be evident that their object
was not to pilfer. One climbed to the front of the
building
,
and having calmly cut to pieces the inscribed marble
tablet, touched several times the king's arms which were
inscribed above and then kissed his hand, amid the
responsive
shouts of the multitude; by this salutation
implying
that they recognised the allegiance due to their
sovereign, and aimed vengeance only at the deputies.
He then posted a small engraving of the Madonna in the
place of the marble slab, thereby indicating that for the
preservation of the public health, they trusted wholly to
Heaven. Meanwhile, another leading spirit had raised
the royal banner at half-mast, at the opposite corner, to
suggest that the king mourned over the
mal-administration
of his officers. At length the municipal authorities
fearing the consequences of further opposition to the public
will, ordered the brig to depart, and presently she stood
gallantly out of the harbor before a strong breeze. The
exultation of the populace at the sight of this movement
was without bounds. They abandoned the work of
destruction
upon which but a moment previous they had
been so sagely intent, and ran along the shore beside the
ship, brandishing their sticks and shouting
fuore!
(away!)
until she had doubled the adjacent cape and disappeared.
It was a scene of no ordinary excitement; the steady and
swift course of the armed vessel silently gliding from the
bay under a cloud of canvass, and the eager crowd with
victory gleaming from their eyes, rushing on to hail her
exit. Never was a popular triumph more complete.
THE CAPUCHIN OF PISA.
Grey was his hair, but not with age.
Anon
.
For
one inclined to a studious life, there is no more
desirable residence, in Italy, than Pisa. The calls of
pleasure
and society which so constantly assail the student
in the capital cities, are far less numerous and exciting
here. Boasting the oldest university in Tuscany, Pisa,
with the downfall of her commercial importance, lost not
the attractiveness which belongs to an ancient seat of
learning. The reputation for military prowess, gained
by her brave citizens in the crusades, and the maritime
consequence she enjoyed in the primitive era, when small
vessels only were in use, are distinctions which have
long since ceased to exist. She sends forth no fleets of
galleys, as of old, armed with bold mariners panting to
destroy the Saracenic pirates. The Islands in the
Mediterranean
,
once tributary to her arms, now acknowledge
another master. Bloody feuds no longer divide her
citizens
;
nor has she ventured to dispute the empire of the
seas since the close of the twelfth century, when she
suffered
a memorable defeat in a naval combat with the
Genoese
,
under Admiral Doria. So great was the number
of her distinguished people who, in this and previous
battles
,
fell into the power of her formidable rival, that it was
a common saying in that age, that, `whoever whould see
Pisa, must go to Genoa.'
The edifices upon the right bank of the Arno, many of
them rich in architectural decorations, are built in the form
of a sweeping curve admirably exposed to the sun. In
these buildings are the best winter lodgings; and the
broad street forms a delightful promenade. Here the
invalids
stroll at noon or evening, completely sheltered
from the wind; while about the adjacent bookstores the
literati
lounge in the sun, to con a new publication, or
discuss some mooted point in science or belles lettres.
Sometimes on an autumn evening, when nature is in her
balmiest mood, and the walk filled with students, the
several
bridges reflected in the river, and the
av Maria
stealing
on the breeze, the scene is delightfully significant of
calm enjoyment. On a pleasant afternoon, as I noted
this picture from beneath an awning which surmounted
the door of a
caff
, my eyes encountered those of a
Capuchin
friar, who was sitting on the parapet opposite,
occasionally
enjoying the same pastime, but more frequently
engaged in turning over the leaves of an old folio. The
members of this fraternity, usually seen in Italy, are very
unprepossessing in their appearance. Their brown robes
generally envelope a portly person, and the rough hood
falls back from a face whose coarse features bedaubed
with yellow snuff, indicate mental obtuseness far more
than sanctity. This Capuchin, however, had an eye
which, at the first glance, seemed beaming with
intelligence
;
but, upon inspection, betrayed an unsettled
expression
,
such as might pertain to an apprehensive or
disordered mind. But the most striking peculiarity in the
monk's appearance, as he sat with his cowl thrown back
to enjoy the evening air, was the remarkable contrast
between
a face decidedly youthful, and hair that exhibited
the grey of sixty winters. An effect was thus produced
similar to that observed on the stage, when a juvenile
performer
is invested with one of the heavy powdered wigs
of the last century. It was as if youth and age were
miraculously conjoined in one person. The adolescent
play of the mouth, the freshness of the complexion, and
the careless air, bespoke early manhood, and were in
startling contradiction to the thick locks blanched almost
to snowy whiteness. The friar noticed my gaze of
curiosity
,
and advancing towards me with a good-natured
courtesy, proffered the curious volume for my inspection.
It was truly a feast for a connoisseur in black-letter
and primitive engravingsone of those parchment-bound
church chronicles which are sometimes met with in Italy,
filled with the most grotesque representations of saints
and devils. The Capuchin it appeared, was an amateur
in such lore; and this his last prize, had just been bought
of a broker in similar matters, who had long watched for
him on the promenade as a sure purchaser of the
worm-eaten
relic. Most patiently did he initiate me into the
mysteries of the volume, apparently delighted to find so
attentive an auditor. I observed that it was as an antiquity,
and especially on account of the pictures, that he prized
the book; and my wonder was increased by the general
knowledge and worldly wisdom displayed by this member
of a brotherhood noted for their ignorance. Perhaps he
interpreted my curiosity aright, for when we had turned
over the last leaf, he proposed an adjournment to his
convent
,
that I might view his collection of ancient tomes,
an invitation I was not slow to accept. His cell was at
the corner of the monastery, and commanded a fine view
of the surrounding country on the one side, and of the
river and city on the other. It was neatly furnished, and
not without ornament. He pointed out several
bookshelves
,
and evidently enjoyed the surprise with which I
read the titles of works usually found in the libraries
of men of taste, but seldom known in the dormitory of the
priest. At length, he raised them
en masse
, and what I
had deemed a little library, proved but an ingenious
imitation
.
Beneath the painted boards was disclosed the
veritable
collection of the poor Capuchina few
vellumbound
volumes, chiefly refering to the theology of his
sect. I was not a little interested in the quiet humor thus
displayed by this singular brother of a gloomy fraternity.
His cheerful eye was at variance with the dark, rough
robe, and coarse rope which bound him. His little room
was furnished with a view to the enjoyment of the
occupant
;
and, judging by the fine old Malaga with which he
entertained me, not without the means of indulgence. I
could not but fancy the feelings which must sometimes
visit him as he gazed from his secluded nook upon the
4
world he had renounced. When, at dawn, he has seen
one of the many equipages start from the adjacent square,
bearing hearts intent upon re-union with the loved in the
place of its destination, or youthful spirits eager for the
excitement and adventure of a distant tour, has he not
sighed for a share in the blessed ministry of the affections,
or panted to throw himself into a more expanded sphere
of experience? or, if sincerely deeming all earthly
friendship
vain, and all knowledge of the world unholy, in
musing
at sunset over the richness, the silent and varying
beauty of that lovely landscape, has he not momently
caught the inspiration of nature's freedom, and felt that
the breezes of heaven are not less chainless, by Heaven's
ordination, than the spirit within him? The Capuchin
understood and interrupted my reverie.
Signor, said he, I perceive you are surprised at
the obvious want of harmony between my character and
my destiny. You think the friar's garb does not
altogether
become me, and wonder how it is that so youthful a
brow should be shaded by hoary locks. I will endeavor
to explain the apparent anomaly, if you are disposed to
listen to a brief recital. A Corsican by birth, I reached
the age of sixteen without clearly understanding the word
responsibility. My life had flown on beneath the paternal
roof, unmarked by vicissitude, unembittered by sorrow.
My education was intended to prepare me for a naval life,
and, as far as theoretical knowledge is important, perhaps
it was not valueless. I had acquired, too, some dexterity
in the management of such small craft as ply about the
Mediterranean coast. But no duty had ever been
imposed
upon me, which my own inclination had not
suggested
;
and if at times, I was deep in mathematical
studies, or intent upon displaying my nautical skill when
a storm had lashed our bay into a foam, it was my native
love of excitement rather than any settled principle of
action
,
which prompted my exertions. I was regarded as a
spoiled child, and the rebukes to which I was, in
consequence
,
subjected, aroused my indignation more deeply
than corporeal punishment often does that of less ardent
beings. On one occasion, when smarting inwardly from
a taunting reproach my father had bestowed, I suddenly
resolved to flee, if it were only to prove that I could
depend
upon myself, and be indeed a man. Such
resolutions
doubtless abound at that age, and are not
unfrequently
acted upon. With a few louis-d'ors in my purse,
I embarked for Marseilles, and after a few weeks' stay in
that city, found myself without money or friends, and
prevented
by pride from revealing myself or my situation to
any one. Want, however, was fast undermining my
resolution
;
and one bright morning I walked towards the
quay, hoping to discover some Corsican captain who would
convey me home. As I stood near one of the docks,
glancing over the shipping, I observed a man whose
vestments
were those of a dandy mariner, rapidly pacing the
wharf. His keen gaze soon fell upon my person, and, at
the next turn in his promenade, he abruptly clapped me
on the shoulder, and, pointing to a neat brig with
Sardinian
colors in the offing, asked my opinion of her build
and appearance. As I had been an observer of vessels
from early boyhood, I answered him with frankness,
introducing
some technical phrases, which seemed to convince
him that I was no novice in such matters. When I had
concluded; `my lad,' said he, `I am the supercargo of that
craft. Ask no questions, navigate her to Corsica,
and this is your's,' shaking a purse before my eyes.
Without hesitation I accepted the proposal. Mindful of
my immediate necessities, and elated at the idea of
entering
our harbor the recognised commander of so fine a
vessel, I banished all doubts of my capacity, trusted to
fortune
to carry me safely through the enterprise, and
springing
with alacrity after the supercargo, into a boat, soon
stood with all the pride of youth mantling in my cheek,
upon the quarter deck of the Maria Teresa. Several
Jews were clustered about the mainmast, awaiting our
arrival to secure their passage. They offered to make
up what was deficient in the cargo, by shipping several
cases of
liqueurs
, and agreeing to pay liberally, the
bargain
was soon closed. It was arranged that we should
sail at sunset; and leaving the supercargo at his desk in
the cabin, I hastened on shore to atone for my recent
abstinence
.
The commencement of our voyage was highly
prosperous. After several days, having been blest with
clear weather, and favorable, though light breezes, I
began
to congratulate myself upon my success, when, one
afternoon, there appeared along the horizon, indubitable
tokens of a coming storm. I knew not precisely where
we were, though I had concealed my doubts on the subject;
and as night approached, a strange feeling of melancholy
came over me. I leaned over the bulwarks, watching the
ominous masses of clouds, and listening to the heavy and
solemn swell of the sea. All at once, a sense of the
responsibility
I was under, began to oppress me.
Misgivings
crowded upon my hitherto resolute mind; and, at
length, a presentiment of evil took entire possession of
my fancy. Inexperienced, and prevented by false pride
from exposing my fears, I bitterly repented of the task I
had undertaken. I felt, however, that it was now too late
to retreat, and observing an old sailor casting an eye of
curiosity upon my anxious countenance, I suddenly
determined
at all hazards, to maintain the character I had
assumed
.
The wind increasing, before dark every thing was
snug on board, and at midnight it blew a tempest. The
brig, heavily laden as she was, ploughed wearily through
the waves, every timber creaking as she flew before the
wind. Sometimes it seemed impossible she should rise
after a plunge so convulsive, and a pause so awful. My
heart beat with agonizing suspense, till I felt the quivering
fabric slowly lifted again on the billow, to dive once more
madly on her way. The mast fell with an awful crash,
and for a second, the crew stood astounded, as if the
vessel
herself had burst asunder; but, when the extent of the
mischief was discovered, they worked on assiduously as
before. We were scudding under a reefed jib, and I
stood braced against the companion-way, awaiting, with
mingled feelings of awe, perplexity, and hope, the crisis
of the storm. Encouraged by the firm bearing of our
gallant bark, I began to think all would eventuate happily,
when a flash of lightning revealed to me the old mariner
on his knees by the forecastle, the other sailors standing
in terror and dismay about him, and the Jews huddled
together
4*
apart, regarding them with looks of fear, which
even the raging elements seemed not to divert. At the
same moment a strong smell of sulphur filled the
atmosphere
.
Conceiving a thunderbolt had struck the brig,
and scarce knowing what I did, I rushed forward, and
seizing the foremost Jew with a savage grasp, `base
Israelite
!'
cried I, `are you the Jonah?' Trembling, he
sunk upon his knees, and implored me for the love of
Abraham, to spare his life, confessing they had stowed
a quantity of
aqua fortis
in the hold. The mystery was
explained. The jars of sulphuric acid had broken in the
heavings of the vessel, and their contents mingling
with the silks and woollen stuffs, produced combustion.
The sailors already abandoned themselves to despair. In
vain I ordered, supplicated and reviled. They lay in
supine
misery, calling upon the Virgin, and giving
themselves
up as lost. O the excitement of that hour! Years
appeared concentrated in moments. I seemed endowed
with an almost supernatural energy, and firmly resolved
to stretch every nerve and sinew for preservation. With
no assistance but that of the cabin boy, who alone listened
to my orders, I threw off the hatches. A tremendous
cloud of steam rolled up in thick volumes. Half
suffocated
,
we proceeded to throw boxes and bales into the sea;
saturated with the acid, they fumed and hissed as they
struck the water. Our hands and clothes were soon
terribly
scorched; yet with breathless haste we tailed on,
while the lightning flashed with two-fold vividness, and
the gale raged with unabated fury. The sailors finally
came to our aid; and after many hours of incessant
exertion
,
the traces of fire were removed, and we sunk
exhausted
on the deck. The darkness was intense, and as
we lay, still tossed by the tempest, a new and horrible
fear entered our minds. We apprehended that we were
drifting towards the Barbary coast, and should be thrown
on shore only to be cruelly murdered. The horrors of
such a fate we could too easily imagine, and with
torturing
anxiety, awaited the dawn. It was then that I vowed,
if my life was spared, to dedicate it to St. Francis. The
horrible scene of that night had revolutionized my nature.
The danger passed like a hot iron over my soul. My
previous life had been a pastime. This first adventure was
replete with the terrible, and its awful excitement
penetrated
my heart. An age seemed to exhaust itself in every
passing moment of our painful vigil. We gazed in silent
suspense towards the east. There an ebon mass of
vapor
hung, like a wall of black marble. At length, a short,
deep, crimson gush, glowed through its edge. Slowly the
sun arose, and displayed to our astonished and gladdened
eyes the farthest point of Sardinia. How we entered
the harbor unpiloted, was a mystery to us as well as the
hospitable inhabitants. From the vessel we hurried to
the church, to render thanks to the Virgin for our
deliverance
.
I threw my cap upon the pavement, and knelt at
the first shrine. My companions uttered an exclamation
of surprise. The intense care and apprehension of that
night of terrors, had sprinkled the snow of age amid my
locks of jet.
SAN MARINO.
With light heart the poor fisher moors his boat,
And watches from the shore the lofty ship
Stranded amid the storm.
Wallenstern
.
The
ancient Via Emilia is still designated by an
excellent
road which crosses Romagna in the direction of
the Adriatic. It traverses an extensive tract of fertile
land, chiefly laid out in vineyards. As we passed through
this rich and level country, the occasional appearance of
a team drawn by a pair of beautiful grey oxen and
loaded
with a reeking butt of new wine, proclaimed that it
was the season of vintage. But autumn was not less
pleasingly
indicated, by the clusters of purple grapes suspended
from cane-poles at almost every cottage-window, and by
the yellow and crimson leaves of the vines, that waved
gorgeously in the sun as far as the eye could reach, like
garlands with which departing summer had decorated the
fields in commemoration of the rich harvest she had
yielded. The single companion who shared with me the
open carriage so well adapted for such a jaunt, was a
large landed proprietor in the neighboring district, and,
being quite familiar with every nook and feature of the
surrounding country, he endeavored to amuse me by
pointing out all objects of interest with which we came
in view. Here was a little chapel under whose walls a
notorious thief concealed an immense treasure, and when
the term of his imprisonment had expired, returned and
disinterred it. There was the Devil's bridge, so called
because it is said to have been built in a single night.
This veteran beggar, distinguished from the mendicant
group of the village by the erect air of his emaciated
figure, was a soldier under Napoleon, and has now
roamed
back to his native town, to live on the casual alms of
the passing traveller; while that stout and well-clad man
who succeeded, with the loss of a thumb, in arresting a
formidable bandit, is living snugly on a pension. The
shallow stream over which we are now passing is believed
to be the Rubicon. You gay
contadina
with large silver
ear-rings, whose laugh we hear from the chaise behind, is
a bride on her way from church; and that white and
flower-decked crib which a peasant is carrying into his
cottage, is the bier of a child. It was only at long
intervals
that the agreeable though monotonous scenery was
varied to the view, and within the precincts of the towns
scarcely a single pleasing object could the eye detect, to
counteract the too obvious evidences of human misery.
In all the Papal villages, indeed, the same scene is
presented
.
At every gate the traveller is dunned for his
passport by an Austrian guard, whose mustaches and cold
northern visage are as out of place in so sunny a region,
as would be an orange-grove amid the sands of Cape
Cod, or annoyed by the wretched inheritor of one of
the noblest of ancient titlesa Roman soldier, clad in a
loose, brown, shaggy coat, who after keeping him an hour
to spell out credentials which have been read a score of
times since he entered the territory, has the effrontery to
ask for a few biocchi to drink his health at the nearest
wine-shop. When, at length, one is allowed to enter and
hurry through the dark, muddy streets, no sign of
enterprize
meets the gaze, but a barber's basin dangling from
some doorway, a crowd collected around a dealer in
vegetables
,
or, if it be a
festa
, a company of strolling
circus-riders
,
decked out in tawdry finery, cantering round to
collect an audience for the evening. No activity is
manifested, except by the
vetturini
who run after the
carriage
,
vociferating for employment, and the paupers who
collect in a dense crowd to impede its progress. In the
midst of such tokens of degradation, planted in the centre
the square, rises a statue of some pope or archbishop in
bronze or marble, with tall mitre and outstretched arm;
and, as if to demonstrate the imbecility of the weakest
and most oppressive of Italian governments, around the
very pedestal are grouped more improvidents than would
fill a hospital, and idle, reckless characters enough to
corrupt
an entire community. There is something
peculiarly
provoking in the appearance of these ugly, graceless
statues, which are so ostentatiously stuck up in every
town throughout the Pontifical statesthe emblem of a
ruinous and draining system, which has reduced these
naturally fertile localities to their present wretchedness,
towering, as it were, above the misery it has occasioned.
The inclined head, and arm extended as if in the act of
blessing, is a benignant, humble posture, in ridiculous
contrast to the surly soldiery and countless mendicants,
who seem to constitnte the legitimate subjects of Papal
favor. Rimini is one of the most ancient of these
appendages
to the Roman states, and boasts of a few
antiquities
,
with which the traveller can beguile an hour,
while some of the excellent fish fromthe adjacent bay, are
preparing for his supper. Upon the principal piazza, a
large palace, which presents nothing without but a broad
front of mutilated brick-work, and within is newly fitted
up in modern style, is pointed out as the former dwelling
of Francesca di Rimini, whose singularly melancholy story
constitutes the most beautiful episode of Dante's Inferno,
has been dramatized by Silvio Pellico, and forms the
subject
of one of Leigh Hunt's most graphic poems. If the
visitor endeavors to recall to his mind the knightly
splendor
which, at that epoch, the scene before him presented,
and a strain of martial music swell upon the air as if to
aid his fancy, the illusion is quickly dispelled when,
instead
of a company of gallant courtiers, an Austrian
regiment
in plain uniform winds in view, marching from
the parade ground to their quarters. On a fine October
morning, I resolved to escape awhile from scenes thus
darkened by despotism, and make an excursion to a spot
still hallowed by the presence of freedom. The approach
to San Marino is through a pleasant and fertile country,
and a small bridge indicates the line which divides the
republican territory from Rimini. After crossing this
boundary, the road becomes more hilly, and the aspect of
the surrounding fields more variegated, displaying
numerous
small oaks and elms, clumps of olive trees, and
patches of yellow cane. In many spots, well clad and
hardy looking women were breaking the glebes in the
newly-ploughed land, to prepare it for the reception of
grain or vines. Nothing can be more picturesque than
the site of the town. It is built upon the summit of a
hill which presents an almost perpendicular cliff to the
approaching
traveller, the rocky face of which is relieved by
a grove of chesnuts whose autumn-tinted leaves waved in
umbrageous masses among the grey stones. As we
draw near, it struck me as a most appropriate eyry for the
mountain nymph, sweet liberty. The very air
seemed
instinct with freedom, and every step along the
winding
road to bring us to a region of more elevated and
bracing influences. As we thus approach, let us trace
the history of a spot which, amid the countless
vicissitudes
that involved in ruin every other community in
Italy, preserved through so many centuries, the name and
privileges of a republic.
The remarkable mountain upon which the town of San
Marino is built, was anciently called Titano, perhaps in
reference to certain gigantic bones found buried there,
but more probably in allusion to its isolated position
as if thrown on the plain by one the fabulous giants
of antiquity. It retained this primitive appellation until
the ninth century. On one side, it presents a beautiful
line of hills rising in picturesque gradation, and on the
other, a dissevered cliff surmounted by an abrupt wall of
rock. The soil is argillaceous and abounds in sulphur,
petrified shells and valuable mineral springs, some of
which enjoy considerable celebrity for their sanative
qualities
among the inhabitants of the surrounding districts.
This spot thus favored by nature, might have remained
unknown to fame, had not a certain Dalmatian by the
name of Marino, a lapidary, come to Rimini, and having
occasion to visit Titano, where he discovered abundant
materials for his art, found it no less adapted to afford a
retreat from persecution and a fit retirement for a tranquil,
free, and religious life. Favored by the archbishop of
Rimini, he established himself on the mountain, and was
resorted to on account of his benevolence and piety, till
the number of the faithful who became attached to the
place induced the formation of a settlement and the
erection
of a church. Marino was believed to work miracles,
and soon became renowned. By the eleventh century,
agreeable to the universal system of defensive structures
forming throughout Italy, the republic was in a measure
fortified by the rearing of a castle. The zeal of the people
in effecting this object is no small evidence of their
attachment
to freedom, which is not less signally indicated
by the remarkable and at that period unique inscription
placed upon their churchDIVO. MARINO. PATRONO. ET
LIBERTATIS AUCTORI. During the succeeding age, in
consequence of the increasing population, the inhabitants
of Il Castello, as the summit was called, divided, a
portion
descending to the first table land now called Il Borgo.
About this time, rose into power some of those mighty
families who so long and fiercely tyrannized over Italy.
5
From its very infancy, the republic was surrounded by
these despotic rivals, especially the Feltreschi, Malatesti
and Faggiuoli, and, although frequently involved in
the most trying dilemmas, preserved its love of liberty
and its actual independence. In the twelfth century, when
the warfare between the adherents of the Emperor and the
Pope, convulsed the Italian states, although San Marino
was in a much happier condition to enjoy the benefits for
which some contended in the struggle, it was long before
the demon of faction invaded the peaceful precincts of
the republic. The archbishop Ugolino gave the spirit of
party, birth. He was a violent Ghibelline. His ardor in
the cause attached many to him, and when the people
subsequently purchased of the neighboring barons land to
accommodate their increasing population, he succeeded
by means of priestly influence, in becoming a distinct
party in the contract, evidently with a view to obtain
some feudal authority and join temporal to spiritual power.
Thesame attempt was made, on a similar occasion, by his
successor. The inhabitants were well identified with the
Ghibelline party, and when it was overthrown in
Romagna
,
afforded a secure asylum to its members and most
illustrious leader in that region. Toward the close of
the century, while Hildebrand reigned, Teodorico, the
bishop, proceeded to levy certain church tributes upon all
the provinces, including San Marino. Upon the
republicans
asserting their independence, an examination of
their claims to the distinction resulted in his withdrawing
the demand, and acknowledging by a public decree, the
entire liberty of the republic. This is one of the earliest
recorded testimonies to the original liberty of San Marino,
and is the more remarkable from having occurred at a
period when the authority of the church was so
profoundedly
reverenced, and her officers so unwearied and
importunate
in their exactions. A like attempt to impose taxes
was made soon after by the neighboring
podestas
, and
upon a similar refusal being returned by the republic, the
subject was referred to a solemn trial, according to the
practice of the times. At this examination, it appears
that not only were the facts of their history questioned,
but the leading men catechized even upon the metaphysical
basis of their rights, being asked what is liberty? and
sundry other abstract problems; but their historian, with
characteristic partiality perhaps, declares that the honest
republicans were not in the least puzzled or confounded,
but exhibited an extraordinary strength and clearness of
purpose, as well as a singular unanimity of feeling, on
this memorable occasion. The result, however, was a
declaration against them, and a formal assertion of the
right to tax on the part of the church and other authorities.
Whether this right was ever enforced is very doubtful, but
from the endeavor never being repeated, the inference is
that the parties either from respect to the people or from
motives of policy, were content with merely asserting
their claims. The simple majesty of its political
character
seems to have proved remarkably efficacious, even at
this early period, in securing for San Marino a degree of
consideration wholly disproportionate to its diminutive
size.
Early in the fourteenth century, the supreme
magistrate's
title of Consul was changed to that of Captain or
Defender, and because of the abuse of the latter in Italy,
the former was ultimately alone retained. At this
period
commenced a series of difficulties with Rimini,
induced
by clashing interests and rival jealousies. The
annalist of the epoch is at great pains to show, that the
connection between the various powerful families of the
neighboring territory and the republic, was simply a
mutual
league implying no subjection. This assertion is
confirmed by the singular fidelity manifested by the
people towards friendly barons. The threat of
excommunication
failed to make them abandon a certain feudal
lord, who fled to their citadel to escape the vengeance of
Pope John. It is proved also, by several existing
documents
,
that their relations with the Feltreschi and other
distinguished families who have been supposed to have
exercised feudal authority over San Marino, were merely
those of friendly alliance. Thus they appear to have
been wholly exempt from temporal dominion, and as to
spiritual, the assumption of cardinal Andrimini, in 1368,
was withdrawn by solemn decree, and the bishop obliged
to disclaim publicly any intention of seeking authority.
Soon after, a more insidious enemy to the republic arose
in one of its own citizens, Giacomo Pelizzaro, who
plotted
with the Podesta of Brescia and the archbishop of
Montefeltre; to deliver San Marino into their hands.
His plan was happily discovered before its execution.
He confessed and suffered death as a traitor.
During the succeeding era of private and bloody feuds,
San Marino, allied to Count Guido, was more fortunate
than the rest of Italy in escaping the dangers of this and
other alliances, by means of which, teachery or the
exigencies
of the times could have so easily procured the
republic's
ruin. A war with Sigismondi Pandolfo, Signore
of Rimini, ended in his downfall and an increase of their
territory, attested to them in 1463. Now, too, we find
the alliance of the little state sought by the larger and
superior
principalities of Italy, a fact only to be accounted
for by the reputation it enjoyed for the character of its
institutions. In 1491, during one of those fitful intervals
of peace which occasionally blessed that age of war and
turbulence, among the meliorations of the civil code, we
find statues enforcing the immediate payment of public
debts, the proclamation of criminal sentences, the
obligation
of the captains to procure as far as possible treaties
of peace and good fellowship, and prohibiting the flogging
of children under four years of age. At this time, some
of the warriors from San Marino gained much renown in
the battles of the age, and several men of distinguished
talents arose, among whom were two of the earliest
commentators
of Dante. The republic appears to have been
singularly favored in her diplomatic agents. Her
ambassadors
were most wisely selected, and to the firmness
and wisdom which marked their proceedings is to be
ascribed
the almost miraculous escape of the state from
embroilments
with other powers, and accounts, in no small
degree, for the remarkable esteem she gained in Italy.
A most dangerous era for San Marino was the time of the
infamous Csar Borgia, and for a limited space she
placed herself under the protection of the Duca del
Valentino
.
5*
Continuing, however, to enjoy the amity of the
illustrious
house of Urbino, she maintained to an almost
incredible extent, the favor of the church, and afforded a
refuge
,
often at great risk, to the many persecuted victims of
all parties. The spirit of faction and the priestly
pretensions
which have ever been the bane of the Italian states,
too soon, however, induced a fatal dereliction from the
primitive patriotism and honest attachment to freedom.
Another cause of this decline, may be found in the influence
of some of those who sought an asylum within the limits
of San Marino. Refugees from all parties, they
naturally
brought and disseminated much of the perverse and
exciting
spirit of the times, among the less sophisticated
inhabitants
.
For these and other reasons, the
commencement
of the seventeenth century found the people more
exposed than they had been to the subjection which the
agents of the Romish church so constantly and
insidiously
endeavored to effect. An intriguer, according to
history
,
combining all the low cunning, ambition and ready
talent necessary to promote this object, soon appeared.
Alberoni being legate in Romagna, undertook to befriend
certain men who were suffering under the just awards of
the tribunal of San Marino. The republic, from the deep
conviction of the bad results produced by allowing justice
to be impeded by priestly intervention and
commenditizie
,
which custom had been grossly abused at that period,
made rigid enactments against it; notwithstanding which,
the haughty prelate insisted upon the privilege. The
republicans
vainly explained and remonstrated; yet boldly
maintained their rights. Alberoni, by way of revenge,
caused certain of their citizens to be imprisoned in Rimini,
and by cutting off their communication with the
surrounding
country endeavored to produce a famine. At the
same time, his efforts were unremitted to seduce the most
ill-disposed of the citizens, and he succeeded in securing
the coperation of many traitorous abettors.
Misrepresenting
them to the Pope and sacred college, and abusing
the authority vested in him by the pontiff, he artfully
induced
that ruler to exert a special commission in his
favor
,
and under its shield endeavored to annex San Marino,
as forfeited, to the papal territory. At length, every
thing being prepared for the consummation of his vile
project, on the twenty-fourth of October, 1739, attended
by a band of his satellites, he passed through the Borgo,
and was even cheered by some of the infatuated citizens.
He entered the sacred temple dedicated to Liberty and
their Saint, where he smoothed over with subtle words
the nefariousness of his scheme; and Capitano Giangi
thus acknowledged his concurrence:
Nel d primo di
Ottobre giurai fedelt al mio legittimo principe della
Republica
di San Marino; quel giuramento confermo e cosi
giuro
. Giuseppe Onofri repeated the same oath; but,
Girolamo
Gori using the words of the Saviourlet this cup
pass from meprotested that he had not made one mark
of shame upon the face of the protecting saint, but would ever
exclaim
Evviva San Marino, evviva la Liberta!
These
words uttered with enthusiasm, were caught and repeated,
until they resounded through the holy edifice, re-awakening
the dormant patriotism of the people and striking fear into
the heart of the usurper. The functions were abruptly
closed and a scene of disorder ensued. Before Alberoni
left the church, he threatened the rebellious with death.
The faithful remained to concert measures for the safety
of their country. Perceiving that an immediate appeal
to force would be useless, they determined to represent the
case to the Pope and calmly await the result, meantime
using every means to reanimate the drooping spirit of
their fellow-citizens. Notwithstanding the age and
imbecility
of Clement XII., he was just and benevolent,
and upon being informed of the facts, indignantly declared
that he had vested no authority in the legate to attempt
obtaining
any ascendancy over the people of San Marino,
nor to interfere with their rightsbut simply to exert a
spiritual influence and protection. To contravene the
base assumption of Alberoni, he despatched Monsignor
Napolitano, afterwards Cardinal, with power to re-establish
the good fame of the papal court, and secure justice to the
people. Between the usurpation of Alberoni and the
restitution
of the republic, there was, however, an
interregnum
of three months and a half. San Marino was
restored
on the fifth of February, the day of the sacred
virgin
Agatha. Shouts, prayers, tears of joy, and jubilee
in every form, announced the happy event; and the day
has since been observed as a festival. Alberoni's defence
of his conduct gave rise to some curious literary
discussion
.
The event redounded to the improvement of
the people, operating as an effectual check upon the
passion
for intrigue, and to the honor of Clement, to whom
a monument was erected by the grateful republicans.
When the modern conqueror of Europe drew near the
confines of the small but honored state, he respected its
liberties. Receiving most graciously the ambassadors
from San Marino, in an elegant address, he alluded to the
singular preservation of their freedom, and promised his
protection; at the same time offering to enlarge their
possessions
,
and tendering, as an indication of his respect
and good will, a present of two field-pieces. Monge, the
ambassador, made an eloquent reply, gratefully
acknowledging
the courtesy of Napoleon and applauding his
forbearance
.
The people declined his offers and present;
but in commemoration of the occasion, added the 12th of
February, 1797, as another joyous anniversary, to the
republic's
calendar.
The original government was simply paternal. The
laws sprang from necessity, were improved by experience,
and modified from time to time, according to the
circumstances
and wants of the people. Two captains, one from
the signors and one from the citizens at large, are
elected
every six months. No individual can be re-elected
oftener than once in three years. Thus all deserving the
honor, serve in turn. No prejudice exists with respect
to age, very young men being frequently chosen when of
great promise or proved worth. It is only indispensable
that the captains should be natives of the republic. The
legislative body consists of a council of seventy and
another of twelve. A judicial magistrate is also elected
triennially by the council. The state includes a circuit
of twenty-five miles, and its present population is between
six and seven thousand.
Such is a brief sketch of the history of San Marino.
Its long immunity from conquest and despotism and the
remarkable perpetuity of its institutions, are doubtless
owing, in no small measure, to its insignificant size and
almost impregnable position. Still the place cannot but
possess a singular interest in the view of a pilgrim from
the New World, especially when its present condition is
contrasted with that of the rest of Italy, and more
particularly
of the surrounding territory. A few humble
domiciles
scattered along the lower ridge of the mountain,
and separated by a narrow and rugged street, constitute
Il Borgo. Thence, ascending by a circuitous path,
we soon arrived at a larger collection of houses which
form the capital of the republic. It differs not essentially
from similar Italian towns, except that the streets are
narrower
and more straggling. The new church, just
completed
,
is a pretty edifice built of
travertina
, excavated
near by, after the design of Antonio Sara. The twelve
apostles in stucco, placed in niches, ornament the
interior
,
and near the altar is a handsome marble statue of
Saint Marino, recently executed by a Roman Sculptor.
He is represented holding a scroll, upon which the arms
of the republic (three towers surmounted by as many pens,
significant of the union of strength and wisdom) are
sculptured in bronze, with the word
Libertas
. This
edifice continues as in ancient times, the place of
elections as well as of worship. There is a little
theatre where
dilletanti
occasionally perform. I was at
some pains to enter this miniature temple of Thespis,
for the sake of standing in the only theatre in Italy
exempt from censorship, and where, although the
audience
is small and the spot isolated, free expression is
given to any sentiment or opinion which the people
choose to utter or applaud. Crossing a grass-grown
and solitary court near the walls, where four or five
cisterns alone gave signs of the vicinity of man, we
entered a small and time-worn building ornamented
by an old tower and clock, and ascending a narrow
flight of steps, were ushered into the council-room. A
few wooden seats scattered over the brick floor, upon
the back of which are rudely painted the arms of the
republic
,
surround an ancient chair covered with crimson
velvet, placed beneath a canopy of the same hue. A
mutilated
picture of the Holy Family by Giulio Romano,
and a bust of their favorite ambassador, Antonio
Honuphrio
,
are the only ornaments of which the apartment
boasts. I had lingered, but a day or two previous, in the
magnificent halls of some of the Bolognese nobility, where
the silken drapery, rich marbles and splendid works of
art, weary the gaze. But this plain and unadorned
chamber
possessed an interest which their profuse
decorations
failed to inspire. It bespoke narrower resources
but a richer spirit. The presence of freedom seemed to
hallow every sunbeam that played upon the undecked
walls. Nor have mightier principalities disdained, in
our day, to recognize the little republic. Among its
archives are many communications from the several
Italian
governments, the late king of Spain, and the present
king of France. Not long since, a prior being
discovered
manifesting a disposition to intrigue beyond his
appropriate
sphere, was bound, conducted to the confines
and banished. The only organized force is the militia,
who are bound to second the executive and judicial
magistrates
.
The people, however, are distinguished for their
probity and peaceful habits. Most of them are engaged
in agriculture. The only peculiar trait observable among
them, is an inflexible attachment to their peculiar
institutions
and an earnest spirit of freedom. But recently,
an archbishop whose province of duty properly embraced
two towns, one of which was San Marino, abandoned the
latter in disgust, because he could not induce the people,
on public ocasions, to salute him before their own rulers.
Every half-year, they go in a body to the church, and
deposite
their vote for captains in a silvervase. The result
of the election is made known at evening, and they
accompany
the successful candidate home, with torches.
Before leaving the town, I ascended to the old castle.
The walls command a most extensive and beautiful
prospect
,
embracing the plains of Lombardy, a broad sweep
of wild, undulating hills, the mountain of Ancona and the
waters of the Adriatic. It was a delightful pastime to sit
in the pleasant sunshine of autumn, and gazing from this
little spot of free earth over such a landscape, let the
imagination luxuriate amid the thrilling associations of
the scene. We found but one occupant of the prison.
The gate was opened by a pretty blue-eyed woman, the
wife of the gaoler, who follows the trade of a cobbler in
the belfry of one of the three towers. There is one horrid
dungeon where a traitor priest suffered a long
imprisonment
;
but the number of available cells is only three
which speaks well for the general character of the people.
When, on our return, we reached the little bridge which
divides the republican territory from Rimini, a venerable
woman was leaning upon the parapet, her grey hair
fluttering
in the wind, in earnest conversation with a hardy
stripling who stood at a short distance from her. He
was a political fugitive who had found safety within the
bounds of San Marino, and she was his mother just
arrived
from a town in the vicinity to visit him. The
incident
excited a pleasing train of reflections. San Marino
has rendered no small service to the cause of liberty,
by sheltering the many unfortunate victims of
unsuccessful
revolution. For such she has ever a welcome. The
pope has been obliged to compromise with the
republicans
,
by agreeing that refugees from his
territory
may travel unmolested for a certain period, with a
passport from the authorities of San Marino. This
arrangement
has been eminently serviceable in protecting
the persons and rights of the liberals, and excited much
gratitude and respect towards the state. The setting sun
gleamed upon the summit of the mountain, as I turned
back to take a farewell glimpse of this little nestling-place
of freedom. I remembered the contented and happy
looks of the peasantry, and recalled the testimony
they all so cordially bore to the superior privileges
they enjoyed. I mused upon the remarkable preservation
of that isolated spot amid the unhappy destinies of the
land. I strove to impress the picturesque locality upon
my memory; and pleased my heart with the thought that
there was still one little green leaf in the withered crown
of Italy.
6
TURIN.
Embosomed by the hills, whose forms around
Stand sentinel'd with grandeur.
Anon
.
One
of the circumstances which gives the traveller
rather
painful assurance of his approach to the northern
confines of Italy, is that he finds himself once more
ensconced
within that most comfortless of all locomotives,
except the
lettiga
of Sicily,a Diligence. The
straggling
,
untrimmed horses, and harlequin-looking postilions
bobbing up and down most pitifully; the constant
cracking
of the whip, and the lurching and shivering of the
clumsy fabric, are but the exterior graces which the
vehicle boasts. At night, the roof within is often hung
with baskets of provisions, and countless hats and
bonnets
which dangle most disturbingly in the face of the
sleeping passenger; and when he has, at length, lost
himself in a pleasant dream, and commenced an
imaginary
colloquy with some fair object left at the place of his
last sojourn, a sudden jolt pitches him upon his neighbor,
or an abrupt stoppage of the ponderous machine, rouses
him to a sense of stiffened joints, yawing ostlers, and an
execrating
conducteur
. It is, however, well that one
leaving the dreamy atmosphere of the South, should be
thus initiated into a more practical habit, and have the
radiant mists of imagination dissipated from his brain.
The Diligence is an excellent preparatory symbol of the
more utilitarian regions and prosaic localities, towards
which his pilgrimage tends. From the corner of one of
these minature arksdespite the grumbling of an old lady
by my side, the nap of whose lap dog I disturbed, and the
angry chattering of a parrot, whose pendant cage was
vibrating
overheadI succeeded, one afternoon, in
withdrawing
myself sufficiently, to look from the window over
the surrounding fields. They presented a broad level
plain, covered with fresh green grain, which a band of
women, whose heads were enveloped in red cotton
handkerchiefs
,
were assiduously reaping. The air was still,
and the sky cloudy. A few trees, chiefly small poplars
and mulberries, rose here and there along the road. And
yet, meagre as was the natural scenery, it was a spot
abounding in interest. Thirty-eight years before, it was
the arena where contending armies battled for the
possession
of Italy, and men were mown down as the grain, then
waving over their graves, fell beneath the sickles of the
reapers. It was the plain of Marengo. Near yonder
plantation of vines, Desaix took up his position. Across
these fields the French line stretched imposingly away.
And when the Austrians were so incautiously pursuing
their success, it was in the midst of this now deserted level,
that Napoleon met his brave ally, who, rushing forward
at his bidding, met, almost immediately, his death. It
was hence, too, that the brave Melas, then more than
eighty years of age, considering the day won, and
overcome
with fatigue, retired to Alexandria, only to hear in
a few hours, of his army's defeat. After this celebrated
battle, Turin became the metropolis of the French
department
of the Po, and fourteen years after was restored to
Sardinia. It is not surprising that the young mind of
Alfieri was greatly impressed on entering this city. Its
broad, clean streets radiating from a common centre; its
airy arcades forming, like the
passages
of the French
metropolis
,
most agreeable promenades, and its cheerful
aspect
may well captivate a stranger's eye. One scarcely
realizes, at Turin, that he is within the precints of an
Italian
city. There is a modern look about the buildings,
an elegance in the shops and
caffs
, and altogether an air
of life and gayety, which brings Paris forcibly to mind.
Indeed, the proximity of this capital to France,
neutralizes
,
in no small degree, its Ausonian characteristics.
The language is a mixture of French and Italian; and
Goldoni found the taste here so strong for the French
stage, that, during his visit to Turin, he composed his
comedy
of Moliere, to avail himself of the attraction of that
author's name. There are few finer public squares in
Europe than the Piazza del Castello, and no, more
beautiful prospect of its kind than that from the church of
La Superga, where the bones of the Sardinian kings
repose
.
The small number of paupers, and the frequent
instances of manly beauty among the military officers,
are peculiarly striking. Sometimes, beneath the porches,
a procession of nuns, poorly but neatly clad, is
encountered
,
with garlands and tapers, headed by a fat priest
chanting the burial service. The neighborhood of the
Alps is disagreeably indicated by the number of women
seen in the streets with
goitres
. They come, for the
most part, from the base of Mt. Cenis and Susa, where
this disease is very common, and still attributed by the
common people, to the chill the throat constantly receives
from the extreme coldness of the water. We are
reminded
of old Gonzalo's query in the Tempest:`Who would
believe that there were Mountaineers dew-lapp'd like
bulls, whose throats had hanging at them wallets of
flesh?' Turin is the coldest city in Italy. The
circumadjacent
mountains are scarcely ever entirely free from
snow. As one looks upon them, frequently surmounted
by variegated clouds, or, in dull weather, bathed with the
yellow gleam of the struggling sunbeams playing on their
white scalps, with here and there a dark streak where the
snow has melted away, the appropriateness of the name of
this section of Italy becomes more apparent
pie di
monte
foot of the mountains.
I found an unusual number of priests reading in the
University library, and not a few peasants seated at the
reading desksa note-worthy and pleasant circumstance.
It is interesting, when wandering about the precincts of
this institution, to remember that it was the scene of that
mis-education, of which Alfieri has drawn so vivid a
picture
in his autobiography. It was here that so many of
his young days were wasted in wearisome sickness;
where he was bribed or threatened into labors for his
stupid
6*
but powerful school mate; where he looked so long
upon the adjacent theatre, which he was only allowed to
enter five or six times a year, during carnival; and where
he suffered so long from the tyranny of a capricious and
pampered
valet
. In Turin, the stern tragedian first knew
the sweet delights of poetry in his stolen and secret
communion
with Ariosto and Metastasio. Here he laid the
foundation of those dissipated habits which, he had the
rare moral courage to vanquishsuddenly vaulting from
the low level of a life of pleasure, to the most determined
and assiduous career that genius and industry ever
achieved. Here, too, his ardent soul first experienced
the delicious excitements of music, horsemanship, and
lovethose inspiring resources of his after years.
The exhibition of the stranger's passport at Turin, is
sufficient to introduce him to the Royal Gallery. It is
interesting chiefly for its specimens of the Vandyck
schoolthose expressive portraits which have so long
formed the study of artists, and ever charmed that large
portion
of the curious who delight in observing the `human
face divine.' There is one of Carlo Dolce's most
characteristic
Madonnas, full of the mildness, soft coloring, and
timid execution which belong to his heads. That class
of woman's admirers, who would fain make the standard
of her attractiveness proportionate to the absence of any
strong traits, should collect the female faces portrayed by
this artist. A short time spent in contemplating such an
array, would convince them of the absolute necessity of
elevating their ideal of the sex, if they would have the
spell of their graces perpetuated. But the picture which
chains the attention in this gallery, is one of Murillo's
master-pieces. Some of the biographers of the Spanish
limner, seem to lament that his purpose of visiting Italy
was never fulfilled. It would certainly be a cause of just
regret, if the obscurity of his lot had doomed him for life,
to paint nothing but banners for exportation, and fruit
pieces for immediate sale; but since scope was given to
his genius at the Escurial, and it was encouraged to a
free and happy development at home, we cannot but deem
it a happy destiny that prevented him from ever leaving
his native country. There is no little error in the
prevalent
notion, that a true painter, so constituted by nature,
is necessarily to improve by a visit to Italy. On the
contrary
,
numerous instances might be cited, where such a
course has been fatal to the individuality of the artist's
style. His real force is thereby often sacrificed to a false
manner. Servile imitation frequently supersedes
originality. He ponders the works of the old masters too
often, only to adopt certain of their peculiarities, instead
of being quickened to put forth what is characteristic in
himself. Such has, in many cases, been the result with
regard to young votaries of art among us, who after giving
certain proofs of talent, have gone abroad only to bring
home an improved taste, perhaps, but not seldom a far
inferior execution. Murillo was a genuine child of
nature
.
He painted, as Goldsmith wrote, from individual
inspiration. Who laments that his style is not so elevated
as that of Raphael, nor so graceful as that of Correggio?
If it were one or the other or both, he would not be
Murillo
.
What we love in him, is his singular truth to
natureso fresh and vivid in expressionsuch a unity
of coloring, such a semblance of life! When one stands
before his Mother and Child, in the Palace at Florence,
does it require much imagination, momentarily to fancy,
that the infant is springing from the bosom of its mother
into our arms? There is an almost perceptible motion
in its posture, and a look of recognition in its eyes, that
haunts us at every step. How often does the traveller in
Italyhe who is wedded to that inexpressible charm in
life, society and art, which we call
nature
lament the
paucity of Murillo's paintings! How often does he sigh
for a journey into Spain, that he may behold more of them!
The picture of which Turin boasts, represents Homer
with the laurel wreath straggling round his head, as an
improvisatore
, and an amanuensis recording his song.
The bard appears like a fresh portrait of one of those
blind old men so often seen in southern Europe. The
singular blandness of such countenances who has not
noted? They wear a pensive, but peaceful expression, as
if sweet thoughts were cheering their darkness. The
light of poetry hovers round the brow. We feel that
although
bereft of vision, the bard
sees
. The deep things
of life are unveiled to his inward gaze. And, then, how
plainly the other figure listens! We soon cease to
lament
the blindness of the minstrel, in regretting that he
is dumb.
A son of Carlo Botta, the historian, follows the
profession
of an engraver in this capital. It is but recently
that his justly renowned parent died in poverty at Paris.
Five hundred copies of his works, in sheets, were given,
as the only recompense in his power to afford, to the
physicians
who attended his wife in her last illness. This adds
one more to the countless anecdotes illustrative of the
melancholy lot of authors. But in this instance, the high
merit and estimable qualities of the individual, enhance
the pain with which every feeling mind must contemplate
his fate. It would be a pleasing thought if we, the people
of a free and prosperous land, had contributed to the
comfort
of one in his declining years, who, when in the full
vigor of his intellect, devoted himself, most
enthusiastically
,
to recording the history of our Revolution. The
details
of the war of independence are chiefly known on the
continent through the history of Botta. No single work
has served so effectually to establish the fame of that
glorious
event in the minds of Italians. One of the first
questions they ask a comer from the New World is, if he
has read
La Guerra Americana
by
Carlo Botta?
The
work is a beautiful monument of the sympathy of one of
the gifted of that nation in the cause of freedom; and
happy would it have been, had our government added to
the honorary title of citizen, the means of smoothing the
venerable historian's passage to the grave. Another
of his sons is travelling in Arabia, for the Jardin des
Plantes. The father's last literary effort was a
translation
of a voyage round the world by an American captain,
of whom this son was a companion. The latter is about
publishing it, and the proceeds, with the hon rable name
he boasts, will constitute his paternal heri age.
I could not leave Turin, without seeing the author of
Le Mie Prigioni
. That beautiful and affecting record
of human suffering has spread the name of Silvio Pellico
over the civilized world. The despots of Europe have
endeavored in vain to prevent its entrance into their
territories
;
being well aware, that no harsh invectives
against tyranny, no panegyrics in praise of free
institutions
,
however eloquent and insidious, possess a tithe
of the power to arouse men to a sense of their rights,
which lives in such a calm and simple narrative of one of
the victims of their cruelty. How many honest bosoms
have glowed with indignation at the picture this amiable
and gifted Italian has painted, of his tortures under the
leads of a Venetian prison, and amid the cold walls of
the Spielberg fortress! How many have admired the
resources
of intellect, philosophy, and affection, by which
the unfortunate prisoner made even captivity captive!
His correspondence with his fellow sufferer, his league
of amity with his keeper, his reading, poems, and
reveries
how
do they shed a halo of moral brightness around
the gloom of his dungeon! His hope deferred, his
agonizing
suspense, and, at length, his liberation and happy
return to the bosom of his familyall related with so
much truthfulness and feeling,what an interest have
they excited in behalf of the innocent object of such cruel
persecution! Sharing this sentiment, I was not a little
disappointed to find that Pellico was absent from the
group of Piedmontese
literati
, who convene every
evening
at one of the
caffs
. An
abb
, his friend, informed
me, that the illuess of his father confined Silvio almost
constantly at home. Every one remembers the deep
affection
with which he always alludes to his parents. I
found that the strength of this sentiment was not
exaggerated
in his memoirs. His father was rapidly declining
with age, and the son only left his bed-side for a few
moments to breathe the fresh air. At one of these
intervals
,
I paid him a visit. Pellico is now about thirty-eight
years of age, small in stature, and wears glasses. His
complexion is deadly pale, blanched by the blighting
shadow
of a dungeon. His brow is broad and high, and his
expression serious and thoughtful. He was courteous
and affable, spoke with deep emotion of his father, and
seemed much gratified at the interest his work had
excited
in America. Notwithstanding the immense number
of copies of
Le Mie Prigioni
which have been sold on
the continent, and that it has been translated into so many
languages, the author has derived no pecuniary benefit,
except the two thousand francs he received from the
original publisher at Turin. He is at present
patrouized
by a rich and liberal Marchesa, who has made him
her librarian. He dines almost daily at her table, but
resides with his parents. It must be confessed, that the
sufferings of Pellico have, in no small measure, subdued
his early enthusiasm. Some of the young advocates of
liberal principles, in Italy, profess no little
disappointment
,
that one who was so near becoming a martyr to
their cause, should have turned
derotee
. They are
displeased
that Pellico should now only employ his pen upon
Catholic hymns and religious odes. Such objectors
seem not to consider the extent and severity of the trials to
which the mind of the author has been exposed. They
appear, too, to lose sight of the peril of his situation. It
is only by retirement and quiet, that he can hope to
enjoy
in peace, the privilege of watching over and consoling
the last years of his parents. Jealous eyes are ever upon
him. Few are the spirits which would not be unnerved
from their native buoyancy, by such a tragic experience as
he has known; few the hearts that would not, at the close
of such sufferings, fall back upon themselves, and cherish
serenity as the great boon of existence. When I received
his kindly-uttered
buon viaggio
, and followed his
retreating
figure as he went to resume his station by his father's
bed-side, I could not but feel that the tyranny of Austria
had not yet exhausted itself upon his naturethat his
spirit
had not wholly rebounded from the repression of
despotism
;
but I felt, too, that he had nobly endured enough to
deserve aniversal sympathy, and be wholly justified in
applying
to himself the sentiment of Milton: `They also
serve who only stand and wait.'
LOVE IN A LAZZARET.
`The cell
Haunted by love, the earliest oracle.'
Byron
.
The
surface of the sea assumed the crystalline
quietude
of a summer calm. The dangling sails flapped
wearily; the sun slept with a fierce and dead heat upon
the scorching deck; and even the thin line of smoke
which rose from Stromboli, appeared fixed, like a light
cloud, in the breezeless sky. I sought relief from the
monotonous
stillness and offensive glare, by noting my fellow
passengers, who seemed to have caught the quiescent mood
of surrounding nature, and resigned themselves to
listlessness
and silence. Delano was lolling upon a light
settee
,
supporting his head upon his hand, and with
half-closed
eyes, thinking, I well knew, of the friends we had
left, a few hours before, in Sicily. Of all Yankees I ever
saw, my companion most rarely combined the desirable
peculiarities of that unique race with the superadded
graces of less inflexible natures. For native intellgence
7
and ready perception, for unflinching principle and manly
sentiment, his equal is seldom encountered; but the idea
of thrift, the eager sense of self-interest, and the iron
bond of local prejudice, which too often disfigure the
unalloyed
New-England character, had been tempered to their
just proportion, in his disposition, by the influence of
travel and society. On the opposite side of the deck, sat
a young lady, regarding with a half-painful, half devoted
expression, a youth who was leaning against the
companion-way
,
ever and anon glancing at the small yellow
slippers
that encased his feet, while he complacently arranged
his luxuriant mustaches. These two were affianced;
and by a brief observation of their mutual bearing, I soon
inferred the history of the connection, and subsequent
knowledge confirmed my conjecture.
The Prince of  had paid his addresses to the eldest
daughter of the Duke de Falco, with a view of
replenishing
his scanty purse; and by dint of some
accomplishments
and much plausibility, had succeeded not only in
obtaining the promise of her hand, but in winning the
priceless, but alas! unrecompensed boon of her
affection
.
Often, in the course of our voyage, when I marked
her sudden gaze of disappointment, as she sought in vain
for a responsive glance from her betrothed, I could not
but realize one fruitful source of that corruption of
manners
which characterizes the island of their birth. And
not unfrequently, as I saw the parental pride and
tenderness
with which the old man caressed his children, have
I wondered that he could ever bring himself to sacrifice
their best happiness to ambitious designs. Yet the
history
of every European family abounds in such dark
episodes
.
The daughters of the South open their eyes upon
the fairest portion of the universe, and during the
unsophisticated
years of early youth, their affections,
precociously
developed by a genial clime and ardent
temperament
,
become interested in the first being who appeals to
their sympathies, or captivates their imagination. The
claims of these feelings, the first and deepest of which
they are conscious, if at all opposed to previous
projects
of personal aggrandizement, are scorned by their
natural
guardians. And yet when the warmest and richest
attributes
of their natures are thus unceremoniously sacrificed
to some scheme of heartless policy, it is deemed
wonderful
that in the artificial society thus formed, principle and
fidelity do not abide! What is so sacred in the
estimation
of youth, as a spontaneous sentiment? And when
this is treated with cold sacrilege, what hallowed ground of
the heart remains, on which Virtue can rear her
indestructible
temple? The elder children, however, are generally
the victims of this convential system, and when its main
object is accomplished, the others are often left to the
exercise
of their natural freedom. With this consoling
reflection
,
I turned to the second sister, who was reading near
by, under the shadow of a light umbrella, which a young
Frenchman held over her head. Never were two
countenances
more in contrast, than those of the donna
Paolina
,
and Monsieur Jacques. There were certain
indications
in the play of her mouth and expression of her eye,
that, youthful as she was, the morning of her life had been
familiar with some of those deep trials of feeling, the effect
of which never wholly vanishes from the face of woman.
His physiognomy evinced both intelligence and
amiability
,
and yet one might study it for ever, and not feel that
it was animated by a soul. Upon a mattress beneath the
awning, her shoulders proped up by pillows, and her
form covered with a silk cloak, reposed the youngest, and
by far the most lovely, of the sisters. Angelica had seen
but sixteen summers, notwithstanding the maturity of
expression
and manner so perceptible above the child-like
demeanor of girlhood. Her dark hair lay half unloosed
around one of the sweetest brows, and relieved the rich bloom
of her complexion, as she dozed, unconscious of the
admiring
gaze of a Neapolitan officer, who stood at her feet. I
had scarcely time to notice the exquisite contour of her
features, when she started at an observation of her sister,
and the smile and voice with which she replied, redoubled
the silent enchantment of her beauty. At a distance from
us all, as if to complete the variety of the party, stood an
Englishman, whose folded arms and averted gaze
sufficiently
indicated that, for the time at least, he had
enveloped himself in the forbidding mantle of his nation's
reserve.
At sunset, a fresh breeze sprang up, and the spirits of
our little party rose beneath its invigorating breath. I have
often had occasion to observe the admirable facility with
which travellers in some parts of Europe assimilate. It
always struck me as delightfully human. One may
traverse the whole extent of the United States, and all the
while feel himself a stranger. If a fellow traveller
engage him in conversation, it is probably merely for the
purpose of extracting information, satisfying curiosity,
or ascertaining his opinions on politics or religion,
objects so intrinsically selfish, that the very idea of them
is sufficient to repel any thing like the cordial and frank
interchange of feeling. This is perhaps one reason why
our people have such a passion for rapid journeys. One
of the chief pleasures of a pilgrimage is unknown to them;
and it is not wonderful that men should wish to fly through
that worst of solitudes, the desert of a crowd. In the old
world, however, and especially in its southern regions, it
is deemed but natural that those who are thrown together
within the precincts of the same vessel or carriage, should
maintain that kindly intercourse which so greatly
enhances
the pleasures and lessens the inconvenience
of travel. In the present instance, a score of people
were collected on board the same craft, and destined to
pass several days in company, strangers to each other,
yet alike endowed with common susceptibilities and
wants; what truer philosophy than to meet freely on the
arena of our common humanity? Fortunately, we had
all been long enough abroad, to be prepared to adopt this
course, and accordingly, it was interesting to remark,
how soon we were at ease, and on the friendly footing of
old acquaintances. There was a general emulation to be
disinterested. One vied with the other in offices of
courtesy
;
and even the incorrigible demon of the
mal sur mer
was speedily exorcised by the magic wand of sympathy.
I was impressed, as I had often been before, by the fact
that the claims of a foreigner seemed to be graduated, in
the estimation of the natives, by the distance of his
country
.
Delano and myself, when known to be Americans,
soon became the special recipients of kindness; and the
ten days at sea passed away like a few hours. We
walked
the deck, when it was sufficiently calm, with our fair
companions, in friendly converse; and leaned over the
side, at sun-set, to study the gorgeous cloud-pictures of
the western sky. We traced together the beautiful
scenery
of the isles in the Bay of Naples, and the night air
echoed with the chorus of our songs. And when blessed by
the moonlight, which renders transcendant the beauty of
these regions, our vigils were interrupted only by the
rising
sun. Even when the motion of the vessel interfered
with our promenade, forming a snug circle under the
lee, we beguiled many an evening with those gamesome
trifles, so accordant with the Italian humor and vivacity.
Two of these sports, I remember, were prolific occasions
of mirth. The president appoints to each of the party a
procuratore
, or advocate, and then proposes certain
queries
or remarks to the different individuals. It is a law
of the game, that no one shall reply, except through his
advocate. But as the conversation becomes animated,
it is more and more difficult to observe the rule; many
are taken off their guard by the ingenuity of the president,
and commit themselves by a gratuitous reply, or neglect
of their clients, and are accordingly obliged to pay a
forfeit
.
Another is called dressing the bride. The
president
assigns to all some profession or trade, and after a
preliminary harangue, which affords abundant
opportunity
for the display of wit, calls upon his hearers to make a
contribution to the bridal vestments, appropriate to their
several occupations. As these are any thing but adapted
to furnish such materials, the gifts are incongruous in the
extreme; and the grotesque combination of apparel, thus
united upon a single person, is irresistibly ludicrous.
The point of the game is, to keep from laughing, which,
from the ridiculous images and odd associations
presented
to the fancy, at the summing up of the bridal
adornments
,
is next to impossible. The consequence is, a
series of penances, which, by the ready invention of
the leader, who is generally selected for his quick parts,
in their turn augment the fun to which this curious game
gives birth.
On arriving at our destination, we were condemned
to perform a quarantine of fourteen days, according to
the absurd practice but too prevalent in Mediterranean
ports. Seldom, however, are such annunciations so
complacently received by voyagers wearied with the
confinement
of ship-board, and eager for the freedom and
variety
of the shore. In spite of the exclamations of
disappointment
which were uttered, it was easy to trace a
certain
contentment on many of the countenances of the
group, the very reverse of that expression with which the
unwilling prisoner surrenders himself to the pains of
durance
.
The truth was, that for several days the
intercourse
of some of the younger of our party had been
verging
upon something more interesting than mere
acquaintance
.
Angelica had fairly charmed more than one of the
youthful spirits on board; and there was an evident
unwillingness
on their part to resign the contest, just as it had
reached a significant point of interest. Being fond of
acting the spectator, I had discovered a fund of quiet
amusement in observing the little drama which was
enacting
,
and nothing diverted me more than the apparent
perfect unconsciousness of the actors that their by-play
could be noted, and its motives discerned. My
sympathies
were naturally most warmly enlisted in behalf of
poor Delano, notwithstanding that, after exhibiting the
most incontestible symptoms of love, he had the
assurance
to affect anger toward me, because I detected
meaning
in his assiduous attentions to the little syren.
The place of our confinement consisted of a paved
square, or rather oblong, surrounded with stone buildings.
Within the narrow limits of this court, were continually
moving to and fro the occupants of the adjacent rooms,
stepping about with the utmost caution, now and then
starting at the approach of some fellow-prisoner, and
crying
largo!
as the fear of contact suggested an
indefinite
prolongation of their imprisonment. Occasionally
old acquaintances would chance to meet, and in the joy
of mutual recognition, forget their situation, hasten
toward
each with extended hands, and perhaps be prevented
from embracing only by the descending staff of the
watchful
guard. It was diverting to watch these manuvres,
through our grated windows; and every evening we failed
not to be amused at the in-gathering, when the chief
sentinel
,
armed with a long bamboo, made the circuit of the
yards, and having collected us, often with no little
difficulty
,
like so many stray sheep, ushered us with as much
gravity as our sarcasms would permit, to our several
quarters, and locked us up for the night. The variety of
nations and individuals thus congregated within such
narrow bounds, was another cause of diversion. Opposite
our rooms, a celebrated
prima donna
sat all day at her
embroidery, singing,
sotto voce
, the most familiar opera
airs. Over the fence of the adjoining court, for hours in
the afternoon, leaned a Spanish cavalier, one of the
adherents
of Don Carlos, whom misfortunes had driven into
exile. A silent figure, in a Greek dress, lounged at the
door beneath us, and at the extremity of the court, a Turk
sat all the morning, in grave contemplation. With this
personage we soon opened a parley in Italian, and I was
fond of eliciting his ideas and marking his habits. He
certainly deserved to be ranked among nature's
philosophers
.
After breakfast, he regularly locked the door upon
his wives, and took his station upon the stone seat, where,
hour after hour, he would maintain so motionless a position,
as to wear the semblance of an image in Eastern costume.
His face was finely formed, and its serious aspect and dark
mustaches were relieved by a quiet meekness of manner.
He appeared to consider himself the passive creature of a
higher power, and deemed it the part of true wisdom to
fulfil the requisite functions of nature, and, for the rest,
take things as they came, nor attempt to stem the tide of
fate, except by imperturbable gravity, and perpetual
smoking
.
He assured me that he considered this a beautiful
world, but the Franks (as he called all Europeans,) made
a vile place of it, by their wicked customs and silly bustle.
According to his theory, the way to enjoy life, was to go
through its appointed offices with tranquil dignity, make no
exertion that could possibly be avoided, and repose
quiescent
upon the decrees of destiny. And yet Mustapha was
not without his moral creed; and I have seldom known one
revert to such requisitions with more sincere reverence, or
follow their dictates with resolution so apparently
invincible
.
`There is but one difference,' said he, `in our
religion
;
the Supreme Being whom you designate as
Deo
, I
call
Allah
. We take unto ourselves four wives, and we do
so to make sure of the blessing for which you praynot to
be led into temptation.' Of all vices, he appeared to
regard
intemperance with the greatest disgust, and was
evidently
much pained to see the ladies of our party
promenading
the court unveiled. `Are your wives beautiful?' I
inquired. `In my view,' he replied, `they are lovely, and
that is sufficient.' I asked him if they resembled any of
the ladies who frequented the walk. `It would be a sin,'
he answered, `for me to gaze at them, and never having
done so, I cannot judge.' In answer to my request
that he would afford me an opportunity of forming my
own opinion, by allowing me a sight of his wives.
`Signor,' he said, with much solemnity, `when a Frank
has once looked upon one of our women, she is no
longer fit to be the wife of a Turk.' And he appears to
have acted strictly upon this principle, for when the
custode
abruptly entered his room, as they were all seated at
breakfast, Mustapha suddenly caught up the coverlid from
the bed, and threw it over their heads.
There is a law in physics, called the attraction of
cohesion
,
by which the separate particles composing a body
are kept together, till a more powerful agency draws them
into greater masses. Upon somewhat such a principle, I
suppose it was, that the parties convened in the Lazzaret,
darting from one another in zig-zag lines, like insects
on the surface of a pool, were brought into more intimate
companionship, from being denied association with those
around, except at a respectable distance, and under the
strictest surveillance. Our company, at least, were soon
established on the intimate terms of a family, and the
indifferent
observer could scarcely have augured from
appearances
,
that we were but a knot of strangers, brought
together by the vicissitudes of travelling. And now
the spirit of gallantry began to exhibit itself anew;
in the Neapolitan with passionate extravagance, in the
Frenchman with studied courtesies, and in the Yankee
with quiet earnestness. At dinner, the first day, the
latter
took care to keep in the back ground, till most of the
party had selected seats, and then, seemingly by the
merest
accident, glided among the ladies, and secured a post
between the two younger sisters. This successful
manuvre so offended the Englishman, that he retired
from the field in high dudgeon, and never paid any
farther
attention to the fair Italians than what civility required.
The remaining aspirants only carried on the contest
more warmly. I was obliged almost momently to turn
aside to conceal an irresistible smile at their labored
politeness
towards each other, and the show of indifference
to the object of their
devoirs
, which each in turn assumed,
when slightly discomfited. Nor could I wonder at the
eagerness of the pursuit, as I beheld that lovely creature
seated at her book, or work, in a simple but tasteful dress
of white, and watched the play of a countenance in
which extreme youth and modesty were blent in strangely
sweet contrast with the repose of innocence, the
vividness
of talent, and beauty so rare and heart-touching. I
could not, too, but wonder at the manner in which
she received the attention of her admirersa manner so
amiable as to disarm jealousy, and so impartial as to
baffle the acutest on-looker who strove to divine her real
sentiments. There is a power of manner and
expression
peculiar to women, more potent and variable than
any attribute vouchsafed to man; and were it not so
often
despoiled of its charm by affectation, we should more
frequently feel its wonderful capacity. In the daughters
of southren climes, at that age when `existence is all a
feeling, not yet shaped into a thought,' it is often
manifested
in singular perfection, and never have I seen it
more so than in Angelica. It was a lesson in the art of
love, worthy of Ovidius himself, to mark the course of
the rival three. Such ingenious tricks to secure her arm
for the evening walk; such eager watching to obtain the
vacant seat at her side; such countless expedients to
arouse her mirth, amuse her with anecdote, or interest
her in conversation; and such inexpressible triumph,
when her eye beamed pleasantly upon the successful
competitor
!
The Neapolitan cast burning glances of
passion
,
whenever he could meet her gaze: quoted Petrarch,
and soothed his hopeless moments by dark looks,
intended
to alarm his brother gallants, and awaken her pity.
The Frenchman, on the contrary, was all smiles,
constantly
studying his toilet and attitude, and laboring, by the
most graceful artifices, to fascinate the fancy of his
ladylove
.
The Yankee evinced his admiration by an
unassuming
but unvarying devotion. If Angelica dropped
her fan, he was ever the one to restore it; was the evening
chill, he always thought of her shawl, and often his dinner
grew cold upon his neglected plate, while he was
attending
to her wants. One day her album was circulated.
Don Carlo, the Neapolitan, wrote a page of glowing
protestations
,
asserting his inextinguishable love. Monsieur
Jacques, in the neatest chirography, declared that the
recent
voyage had been the happiest of his life, and his
present
confinement more delightful than mountain liberty,
in the company of so perfect a nymph. Delano simply
declared, that the sweet virtues of Angelica sanctified her
beauty to his memory and heart.
There are some excellent creatures in this world,
whose lives seem to conduce to every body's happiness
but their own. Such an one was the donna Paolina.
Affable and engaging, and with a clear and cultivated
mind, she lacked the personal loveliness of her sisters,
and yet rejoiced in it as if it were her own. No one could
remain long in the society of the two, without perceiving
that the confidence between them was perfect, and
founded
on that mutual adaptation which we but occasionally
behold, even in the characters of those allied by the ties
of a common parentage. To this kind-hearted girl I
discovered
that the lovers had separately applied for counsel
and support in the prosecution of their suits. Don Carlo
begged her to warn her sister against the advances of the
Frenchman, as he knew him to be a thorough hypocrite;
and Monsieur Jacques returned the compliment, by
assuring
8
her that the Neapolitan was by no means
sufficiently
refined and accomplished to be the companion of so
delicate a creature as Angelica. Young Jonathan, with
a more manly policy, so won the esteem of Paolina, by
dwelling upon the excellencies of her sister, that she
became
his unwavering advocate. I confess that as the
appointed
period of durance drew to a close, I began to feel
anxious as to the result of all this dallying with the
tender
passion. I saw that Monsieur was essentially selfish
in his suit, and that vanity was its basis. It was evident
that the Neapolitan was stimulated by one of those ardent
and sudden partialities, which are as capricious as the
flashes of a volcano, and often as temporary. In truth,
there was not enough of the spirit of sacrifice, or vital
attachment
,
in their love, to warrant the happiness of the
gentle being whose outward charms alone had captivated
their senses. Delano, I knew, was sincere, and my fears
were, that his future peace was involved in the result.
At length the last evening of our quarantine had arrived.
Mons. Jacques had played over, as usual, all her favorite
airs on his guitar, and Carlo had just fervently recited a
glowing passage from some Italian poet, descriptive of a
lover's despair, when sunset, playing through the bars of
our window, reminded us that the cool hour of the day
was at hand, when it was our custom to walk in the
outer
court. As we went forth, there was that eloquently
sad silence, with which even the most thoughtless engage
in an habitual employment for the last time. No one
anticipated me in securing the companionship of the
sweet child of nature, whose beauty and gentleness had
brightened to us all, so many days of pilgrimage and
confinement
;
and I determined to improve it, by ascertaining,
if possible, the probable success of my poor friend. I
spoke of the many pleasant hours we had passed together,
of that social sympathy which had cheered and consoled,
and asked her if even those narrow walls would not be
left with regret. `Consider,' said I, `you will no more
be charmed with the exquisite elegance of Monsieur
Jacques'she looked up to see if I really thought her
capable of being interested by such conventional graces
`or be enlivened,' I continued, `by the enthusiastic
converse
of Don Carlo'she smiled`or know,' I added,
with a more serious and searching glance, `the
affectionate
and gifted society of Delano'a tear filled her eye,
but the smile assumed a brighter meaning. I looked up,
and he was before us, gazing from one to the other, with
an expression of joyful inquiry, which flashed the happiest
conviction on my mind. The passionate Neapolitan had
flattered, and the genteel Frenchman had amused, but the
faithful Yankee had won the heart of Angelica De Falco.
FLORENCE REVISITED.
Florence, beneath the sun
Of cities, fairest one.
Shelley
.
We
had been riding all night along the Arno, whose
turgid waters were shrunk to half their usual dimensions,
by the intense heat of midsummer. Dawn was gradually
unveiling the heavens, and spreading a soft, silvery light
over the landscape, as we drew near the termination of
our journey. The vines, by the road-side, stirred
cheerfully
in the morning breeze, and as one after another of
their broad leaves was uplifted, the mossy boughs of the
mulberry trees upon which they are festooned, were
momentarily
revealed, brightened by the grateful dew. The
full grain beneath them, bowed by its own weight,
glistened
with the same moisture, condensed in chrystals upon
its bended tops; and to vary the rich carpet so lavishly
spread over the earth, a patch of lupens or artichokes,
occasionally
appeared, from amid which, rose the low, grey
olive, or thin poplar of Tuscany. Sometimes a few
dwarfed
pines indicated the site of ancient woods, long since
extirpated by the genius of Agriculture, or some remnant
of an ancient wall marked the old feudal boundaries of
the landholders. A still more interesting memorial of
those times exists farther back, in the shape of a
picturesque
tower, celebrated on account of its having been taken
by a curious stratagem. Lights were appended to the
horns of a flock of goats, which, in the night, appeared
like an army, and frightened away the hesieged. Early
as was the hour, a large group of poor women, spinning
flax, were awaiting at the gate of a villa, the customary
alms of its proprietor; and often a bend in the river
brought us in view of several men dragging a heavily
laden barge through its narrow channel. As the day
broke, we came in sight of Florence. The mighty dome
of its cathedralthat noble monument of the genius of
Brunelleschi, and the graceful tower by its side, rose from
the mass of dense buildings, like a warrior of the middle
ages, and a fair devotee of some more peaceful epoch,
standing in the centre, to guard and hallow the city. Far
around the walls, spread the hills with a fertile beauty and
protecting grace, and through the midst wound the Arno,
gleaming in the morning sun. It is a curious feeling
that with which we revisit an Italian city, familiar and
endeared to our memory. There are none of those
striking
local changes, which startle the absentee on his return
to the New World. The outward scene is the same;
but what revolutions may not his own feelings have
undergone
,
since he last beheld it! How may experience
have subdued enthusiasm, and suffering chastened hope!
8*
Will the solemn beauty of the church wherein he was wont
to lose himself in holy musing, beguile him, as of old, to
meditative joy? Will the picture before which he so often
stood, wrapt in admiration, awaken his heart as before?
Will the calm beauty of the favorite statue once more
soothe his impatient soul? Will the rich and moving
strain for which he has so long thirsted, ever thrill as
when it first fell upon his ear? And `the old, familiar
faces'have a few years passed them by untouched? In
such a reverie I went forth to revive the associations of
Florence. The dreamy atmosphere of a warm and cloudy
day accorded with the pensive delight with which I
retraced
scenes unexpectedly revisited. Many botanical
specimens were added to the unrivalled wax collection at
the museum, and several new tables, bright with
chalcedony
,
amethyst and pearl, were visible at the
Pietra dura
manufactory. The old priest, whose serene temper
seemed
a charm against the encroachments of age, had lost
something of his rotundity of visage, and his hair was
blanched to a more snowy whiteness. A shade of care
was evident upon the brow of the man of pleasure, and his
reckless air and contracted establishment most strikingly
indicated the reduced state of his resources. The
flower-girl
moved with less sprightliness, and the dazzling beauty
of the belle was subdued to the calm grace of womanhood.
The artist whom I left toiling in obscurity had received
the reward of his self devotion; fame and fortune had
crowned his labors. The beggar at the corner looked as
unchanged as a picture, but his moan of supplication had
sunk a key lower. The waiter at the
caffe
maintained
his accustomed swagger, and promotion had cooled the
earnest promptitude which distinguished his noviciate.
Three new chain bridges span Arno; being painted
white, and supported by massive pillars of granite,
surmounted
by marble sphinxes, their appearance is very
pleasing. The one below the Ponte Vecchio, serves as
a fine foreground object in the landscape formed by the
adjacent hills; and the other embellishes the vista through
which we gaze down the river to the far-off mountains
and woods of the Cascine. Utilitarianism is rapidly
penetrating
even into Tuscany. Demidorff's elegant villa
is transformed into a silk manufactory; and a railroad is
projected between Florence and Leghorn. With the
same stolid dignity rose the massive walls of the Pitti
and Strozzi palaces, wearing as undaunted an aspect as
when the standards of the ancient factions floated from
the iron rings still riveted to their walls. The lofty firs
and oaks of the public walk waved in undiminished
luxuriance
;
and the pheasants flitted as lightly over the lawn.
The curious tower of the Palazzo Vecchio was relieved
with the same vivid outline in the twilight; and the crowd
pressed as confusedly through the narrow limits of the
Via Calziole. The throng promenade as gaily as ever
along the river-side, on the evening of a festival,the
stately peasant-girl, with her finely-wrought hatthe
strutting footmanthe dark-robbed priestthe cheerful
stranger, and the loitering artist. The street-musicians
gather little audiences as formerly; and the evening bells
invade the air with their wonted chime.
The most interesting of Greenough's recent
productions
,
is an ideal female headHeloise, illustrative of
Pope's well-known lines:
Dear, fatal name! rest ever unrevealed
Nor pass these lips in holy silence sealed;
Hide it, my heart, within that close disguise
Where, join'd with God's, his loved idea lies.
Another American sculptor has recently taken up his
residence in Florence, whose labors seem destined to
reflect great honor upon his country. Hiram Powers is
one of those artists whose vocation is ordained by native
endowments. Amid the vicissitudes of his early life, the
faculty, so strong within him, found but occasional and
limited development: yet was it never wholly dormant.
Powers derives his principles of art directly from the
only
legitimate sourceNature. His recent busts are
instinct
with life and reality. They combine the utmost
fidelity in detail with the best general effect. They
abound in expression and truth. His success in this
department
,
has given occasion to so many engagements
for busts, that time has scarcely been afforded him for
any enterprize of a purely ideal character. He is now
about to embody a fine conception from Gesner's Death
of Abel. He intends making a statue of Eve at the
moment
when after her expulsion from Paradise, the sight of
a dead bird first revealed to her the nature of death. It
is I! It is I! Unhappy that I am, who have brought
misery
and grief on every creature! For my sin, these pretty,
harmless animals are punished. Her tears redoubled.
What an event! How stiff and cold it is! It has
neither voice nor motion; its joints no longer bend;
its limbs refuse their office. Speak Adam, is this
death?'
Florence may appear, at a casual view, comparatively
deficient in local associations; yet few cities are more
impressed by the facts of their history. It was during
the middle ages that it rose to power, and that violent
era has left its memorials behind. The architecture is
more remarkable for strength than elegance, and its
beauty is that of simplicity and dignity. Of this, the
Pitti and Strozzi palaces are striking examples. In
whatever direction one wanders, memorials of departed
ages meet the view, less numerous and imposing than at
Rome, but still sufficiently so to awaken the sweet though
melancholy charm of antiquity. Every day, in walking
to the Cascine, the stranger passes the house where
Amerigo Vespuccio was born; and as he glances at the
hospital of Santa Maria Nuova, he remembers that it
was founded by the father of Dante's Beatrice. The
sight of Galileo's tower, near the Roman gate, recalls
that scene of deep, moral and dramatic interest, when
the philosopher, having, on his knees, renounced his
theory of the earth's motion, before the tribunal of Rome,
suddenly sprung to his feet and exclaimed,
E pur si
muove!
`and yet it moves.' The villa of Boccacio, in
the environs, awakens the awful associations of the plague
as well as the beauty of the Decameron; and a stroll
around the walls, by bringing in view the old fortifications,
will revive some of the scenes of the celebrated siege of
eleven months, in 1530. The heroism exhibited by the
Florentines at this period of privation and suffering,
renders
it one of the brightest pages of their annals. Many a
maiden cast herself from the balcony to escape the brutal
soldiery; and one woman who had been forcibly carried
away by an officer, stole from the camp at night, collected
all his spoils, and mounting hishorse, rode back to Florence,
with a new dowry for her husband. Let the stranger
who would excite the local associations of the Tuscan
capital, stroll into the Piazza Grand Duca on a spring
morning. Yonder is a crowd of applicants at the grated
windows of the post office; here a line of venders,
vociferating
the price of their paltry wares; and there a score
of porters at work about the custom-house. In the
centre is an eloquent quack, mounted upon an open
barouche, and surrounded by vials, plasters and surgical
instruments, waving a long string of certificates, and
loudly
expounding the virtues of his specifics to a group of
gaping peasants. At the portal of yonder palace, an
English equipage is standing, while its master is
negotiating
with Fenzi, the banker, within. People are passing
and re-passing through the spacious area, or chatting in
small groups. In the midst is the bronze, equestrian
statue of Cosmo, and near it, the fountain exhibiting a
colossal figure of Neptune. This remarkable public
square is not less striking as a witness of the past than
from its present interest. The irregular design of the
Palazzo Veccho, is attributed to the public animosities
of the period of its erection; and the open space which
now constitutes the Piazza, was formed by the
destruction
of the houses of the Uberti family, and others of the
same faction, that the palace of the Priors might not
stand on what was deemed accursed ground. Another
scene associated with one of the most tragic events in
the history of Florence, is the Duomothat huge pile so
richly encrusted with black and white marble, which
was commenced towards the close of the twelfth-century.
As one, in any degree susceptible to the influence of
superstition, wanders, at twilight, through the vast and
dusky precincts of this cathedral, vague and startling
fancies will often throng upon his mind. As he slowly
paces the marble floor towards the main altar, perhaps
some mendicant glides from a dark recess, with a low
moan of entreaty, or an aged female form, bowed at one
of the shrines, is dimly descried in the gloom. The
only light streams through the lofty and richly-painted
windows. The few busts of the illustrious of by-gone
days, are scarcely discernible; the letters on the
sepulchral
tablets are blurred in the twilight, and the
dust-covered
banners, trophies of valor displayed in the Holy
Land, hang in shadowy folds. At that pensive hour, in
the solitude of so extensive a building, surrounded by
the symbols of Death and Religion, how vividly rises to
the imagination the sanguinary deed perpetrated before
that altar! The conspiracy of the Pazzi forms the
subject
of one of Alfieri's tragedies; and a very spirited
illustration of one of the scenes was recently exhibited in
Florence, the production of a promising young artist. It
represents the wife of Francesco kneeling at his feet and
endeavoring to prevent his leaving the house at the
appointed
signal. At the head of the plot was Sixtus IV.,
whose principal agent, Salviati, concerted with the
Pazzi to execute their purpose at a dinner given by
Lorenzo de Medici, at Fiesole; but in consequence of
his brother's absence, the scene of action was transferred
to the church. On the 26th of April, 1478, the day
appointed, it appears the service commenced without the
presence of Guliano de Medici. Francesco Pazzi and
Bandini went in search of him. They not only
accompanied
him in the most friendly manner to the cathedral,
but in order to ascertain if he wore concealed weapons,
threw their arms caressingly about him as they walked,
and took their places by his side, before the altar. When
the bell rungthe signal agreed upon, and the priest
raised the consecrated wafer, as the people bent their
heads before it, Bandini plunged a dagger into the
breast of Giuliano. Francesco Pazzi then rushed upon
him and stabbed him in many places, with such fury
that he wounded himself in the struggle. Lorenzo
defended
himself successfully against the priest who was
to have taken his life, and received but a slight wound.
His friends rallied around him, and they retreated to the
sacristy, where one of the young men, thinking the
weapon which had injured Lorenzo might have been
poisoned, sucked the wound. The conspirators having
so completely failed, were soon identified, and the
leaders executed, while Lorenzo's escape was hailed with
acclamations by the people. On a calm, summer night,
as one walks up the deserted and spacious area of the
Via Larga, he may watch the moonbeams as they play
upon the beautiful cornice of the Palazzo Ricardi, and recall,
as a contrast to the peaceful scene, another bloody deed
in the chronicles of the house of Medici. It was to this
princely dwelling that the nephew of Allessandro, first
Duke of Florence, commonly called Lorenzino,
ambitious
of power, lured his profligate uncle, and having
invited
him to repose, and placed his sword with the belt
twisted firmly round the hilt, upon the bolster, stole out
and brought a
bravo
to dispatch him. The assassination,
however, proved difficult, and the treacherous relative was
obliged, personally, to join in the butchery. He dipped
his finger in the blood of his kinsman, and wrote upon
the wall of the room, the line from Virgil
Vincit Amor Patri, laudumque immensa cupido
.
Although the presumptive heir of Alessandro, he fled, and
after ten years of exile, fell, himself, beneath an assassin's
dagger at Venice.
Among the numerous hills of the Appenine range
surrounding Florence, Fiesole is conspicuous from its
picturesque appearance. It is surmounted by a row of
cypresses, and upon its summit stands an ancient
convent
.
From the green and shady esplanade before this
building, is obtainable one of the best views of the city
and its environs; and the traveller who possesses any
taste for scenery will not regret his three miles walk from
the Porta Pinta, or the somewhat precipitous ascent which
brings him to so commanding an observatory. Upon
this mountain stood a celebrated Etruscan fortress. It
was one of Cataline's strong-holds; and the traces of its
walls are still discernible. From this spot the founders
of Florence descended to the borders of the Arno, and
9
there established their dwellings. Originally, the whole
city occupied the right bank of the river, and boasted
but one bridge outside the walls, which is still called
Ponte Vecchio. It is believed that the abundance of
lilies and other flowers (fiori) which flourished there,
gave its name to the metropolis of Tuscany, although
Cellini
declares it to have been derived from Florentius, a
celebrated general. It is remarkable that the first use the
people made of arms, was to turn them against the spot of
their origin.
The republic was well established about the close of the
twelfth century. The population were early devoted to
manufactures, particularly of cloth. The first
magistrates
were denominated consuls; afterwards, the office
of mayor was instituted, and it was decreed that the
incumbent
should be a foreigner, that no ties of
relationship
might interfere with the impartial discharge of his
duties. Another condition was attached to the situation
which would scarcely be deemed expedient in our own
timesthat the mayor should never give nor accept
dinners
.
Subsequently, the title was changed to that of
gonfaliere
,
or standard-bearer, whose functions, at different
times, were variously modified. Besides the consuls,
there were priors of the arts and trades, senatorsten
buonuomini
, etc. The Florentines first learned the art of
war in numerous conflicts with feudal lords, who made
incursions from neighboring castles located amid the
fastnesses
of the mountains, and strongly fortified. A civil
feud, however, which gave birth to an infinite series of
long and bloody animosities, soon succeeded these paltry
and irregular enterprises. This fatal discord was excited
by female beauty, which seems to have been one of the
most prolific occasions of ancient dissensions, as
influential
,
in those troubled times, in nerving the warrior, as
it has been, in every age, in calling forth the richest
strains of the bard. The youthful head of the wealthy
and powerful family of Buondelmonte had promised to
marry a daughter of the house of Amidei, equally
renowned
and powerful. The charms of another lady, one of
the Donati, also one of the first rank, beguiled the
accomplished
cavalier from his first love; and, unmindful of
former
vows, he married the object of his new attachment.
The family of the deserted bride considered their dignity
compromised by this act, and on Easter Sunday, while
Boundelmonte, dressed in white, and mounted upon a
white horse, was riding from the other side of the Arno,
towards the house of the Amidei, passing over the old
bridge, they made an attack near the statue of Mars, and
killed him. This murder threw the whole city into
confusion
,
and the people, almost immediately, were divided
into two parties. The citizens barricaded the roads, and
fought in the streets and squares, and from the houses and
turrets. Soon after this event, ensued the political warfare
between the Guelphs, and Ghibelines, the former
attaching
themselves to the Buondelmonte, and the latter, to the
Ubertithe most powerful family of the party, which
became
its head, instead of the Amedei. The people
constantly
vacillating between interest and enmity, alternately
fought and made truces, till a quarrel with Pisa, for a time,
diverted their arms. This rival colony undertook to stop
the goods from Florence, as they came down the river.
They were not, however, so good fighters on land as at
sea, and were finally defeated by the Florentines, at
Castel
del Bosco. This war of inroads, however, lasted six
years, and was, at length, adjusted by a cardinal. The
old, intestine controversy was soon renewed with increased
ardor, and when the Ghibelines remained masters of the
city, for want of any better way of wreaking vengeance
upon the Guelphs, they razed their dwellings, demolished
numerous towers, and even made a barbarous attempt to
destroy the temple of St. John, now called the Baptistery,
because their opponents had once held meetings there.
A beautiful tower stood at the commencement of the
street of the Adimari, and this they endeavored to make fall
upon the temple by placing rafters against the opposite
part, cutting away the other side, and then setting fire to
the props. Happily, however, the tower fell in another
direction. For a series of years, the arms of the
Florentines
were constantly exercised, with various success, in
wars against the Pisans, Lucchese, Arentines, etc., but,
ever and anon, this original and fierce civil feud usurped
all their energies. Its history is one of the remarkable
evidences of the spirit of that age, and hereafter, as the
sounds of warfare and violence die away into the past,
before the mild influences of Christianity, it will be
reverted
to by the philosopher as a fertile source of
illustration
.
Its consequences and incidental results are
numerous
and interesting. The Ghibelines were generally
triumphant in Florence. In 1261, when Count Guido
Novella was elected mayor, in order to introduce his
people
more easily from Casentino, into the city and palace,
he opened a new gate in the nearest walls, and the avenue
leading thence, is still called the street of the Ghibelines.
In the annals of these celebrated factions, we find now
one, and now another invoking foreign aid. Sometimes
a respite occurs of so long a continuance, as to induce a
belief that the demon of discord is at length laid asleep,
and anon it breaks forth with tenfold fury. At one
moment
,
the Pope's interposition procures peace, and the
next, some incident, trifling in itself, suddenly revives the
flame of party rage. After a solemn reconciliation had
apparently settled the dissension at Florence, it was again
renewed in Pistoia, a few miles off. A certain Ser
Cancelliere
of that city was the father of a very numerous
family
,
the progeny of two wives, both of whom belonged to
noble houses. Between the descendants of these rival
mothers, a strong jealousy existed; and under the name
of Black and White chancellors, (
Bianci and Neri
) more
than a hundred individuals were included in the quarrel,
among whom, not less than eighteen, were chevaliers or
knights of the golden spur. Some young men of both
parties, having quarrelled over their wine, one of the Neri
received a blow from Charles Walfred, of the opposite
faction. In the evening, the aggrieved individual waylaid
the brother of his insulter, and having beaten him, so
mutilated one of his hands, that only the forefinger
remained. This aggression roused an universal
spirit
of resentment on the part of the Bianci. The
opposite party vainly attempted to make peace; and
the inflictor of the injury, on repairing to Walfred's house,
9*
to apologize, was seized and taken into the stables, when
one of his hands was cut off by way of retaliation, and he
was sent back to his partisans. This act rendered all
further
attempts at treaty vain. Thenceforth, street-broils,
of the fiercest character, were of constant occurrence.
Some of the most guilty repaired to Florence, and there
fomented the old feud, the Bianci inciting the Ghibelines,
and the Neri the Guelphs. In 1301, Charles of Valois,
invited by Boniface VIII, into Italy, secretly concerted with
him the ruin of the Bianci party. The Neri were then
dominant. In consequence of the violence committed
under Corso Donati, the Pope had sent one of his
cardinals
to Florence to bring about peace, but the efforts of
the prelate were vain. On Christmas day, the son of
Corso Donati, being on horseback in the square of Santa
Croce, and seeing Nicholas of the Cerchia family pass by,
ran after him out of one of the gates. A contest ensued,
in which both were killed, and, in consequence, civil war
once more kindled. At length, on the second of April,
the remainder of the Bianci party, among whom were
Dante and Petrucco of Parengo, the father of Petrarch,
were banished. The Neri threw fireworks upon the
houses and shops of their discomfitted opponents, near
the Mercato Nuovo, which, taking fire, produced
extensive
destruction, and reduced many to poverty. In 1310,
the New German Emperor, Henry VII., prepared to
descend
into Italy. Many cities invited him. In Tuscany,
Pisa and Arrezzo, alone desired his arrival. The
following
year, Dante, in behalf of the Ghibeline party, wrote
him, earnestly, to come down upon Florence. This letter
sealed the poet's fate; and four years after, his exile was
again confirmed. Received openly at Pisa, and crowned at
Rome, Henry approached and besieged Florence, but
after a wearisome delay before the walls, and several
fruitless
skirmishes, he fell sick, and on the last night of
October, 1813, abandoned the attempt to the glory of the
city. He soon after died at St. Salvi, and these eras of
violence and war were soon succeeded by a brilliant
period of literature and art.
The mausoleum of the Medici, against the extravagant
splendor of which, Byron utters so earnest a satire, is
now far advanced towards completion. It is an octagon,
lined with the richest marble and most precious stones.
As the curious visitor inspects the gorgeous monument,
how various and conflicting are the associations inspired
by the thought of the renowned family it celebrates.
Their redeeming characteristics were taste and liberality.
They promoted the progress of humanity by rewarding
the exertions of genius, rather than by a generous
philanthropy
.
The mass were as much cajoled and
subjected
,
as under more warlike princes; but the gifted
received
encouragement, and were urged to high endeavor.
The annals of the house of Medici abound in scenes, at
one moment exciting warm admiration, and the next,
unbounded disgust. One instant we kindle at the
refined
and enthusiastic taste of Lorenzo, and the next, are
revolted at some act of petty tyranny. Now we see
genius unfold with brilliant success beneath the fostering
rays of patronage; and the next, injustice, conspiracy, or
revenge, degrades the chronicle. The patriotic Cosmo,
ardently listening to the doctrines of Plato, Lorenzo,
the Magnificent, chatting with a young sculptor in his
garden, the dissipated and cunning Giovanni, the
imbecile Piero, the perfidious Lorenzino, and the cruel
Catharine, pass before us in startling contrast. Yet as
we behold the works to which the redeemers of the name
have given rise, and trace the splendid results of wealth
dedicated to the cause of taste, we feel their mission on
the earth was one, the intellectual fruits of which are
inestimable and progressive. The origin of the Medici
family has been romantically referred to Averardo de
Medici, a commander under Charlemagne. The first
authentic mention of this celebrated race seems, however,
to indicate Filippo as one of the earliest founders.
Toward
the middle of the thirteenth century, the Guelphs
having obtained the chief authority in Florence, Filippo,
oppressed by the Ghibelines, fled from Fiorano, in the
valley of Mugello, to the Tuscan capital, which,
thenceforth
,
became his country. In 1348, we read of
Francesco
de Medici, as the head of the magistracy, although
prevented by the plague from exercising his functions.
Filippo left two sons, Bicci and Giovanni. To the latter
succeeded Cosmo, and with his name began the renown
of the house. The world was but just emerging from
barbarism when this prince commenced his sway.
Although
exiled by a faction, his absence was deeply
regretted
,
and his return triumphantly hailed. Cosmo invited
numerous Greek refugees to settle on the banks of the
Arno. Through them, a new interest was awakened in
ancient literature; classical studies revived, and
manuscripts
were eagerly sought. While the council of
Florence
were employed in barren theological disputes,
Cosmo was listening to Gemisthus Pletho, and planning
a Platonic academy. Among the illustrious Greeks
whom he befriended, was Agyropylus. `My son,' said
he, leaning over the cradle of one of his children, `if you
were born to be happy, you will have Agyropylus for your
preceptor.' Cosmo was succeeded by Piero, who had
previously married the wealthy Contessina Bardi. His
authority was near being overturned by a conspiracy,
headed by the Pitti family, who, in the end, were obliged
to flee, leaving their superb palace unfinished. Piero left
two sons, Lorenzo and Giuliano. The brilliant career of
the former has been made familiar by the elaborate and,
perhaps flattered portrait of Roscoe. That this
magnificent
prince was a man of more than ordinary abilities,
is sufficiently proved by the address exhibited on his
youthful embassy to Ferdinand of Naples, as well as by
the numerous specimens extant of his poetical talents.
But no small portion of his renown is to be ascribed
simply to his immense wealth and exalted station. He
was a man of elegant taste, rather than of extraordinary
genius; and merits applause for his liberal patronage of
literature and the arts, more than for any example he has
bequeathed of intellectual or moral power. He renewed
and prolonged the impulse his father had given to the
cause of civilization. The visitor is continually
reminded
of the obligations of Florence to Lorenzo. He
established
a school of sculpture, greatly enriched the
Laurentian
library, improved architecture, promoted the
study of philosophy, and revived the art of the lapidary.
His life was passed in the midst of men distinguished
for genius and acquirements, whom his magnificent
taste had gathered around him. His time was
occupied
in supervising local improvements, cheering native
genius, collecting rare manuscripts and medals,
cultivating
philosophy, studying politics, making love,
discussing
poetry with Politiano, and writing sonnets. He
demonstrated
that a prince could find ample employment,
and attain true glory without recourse to conquest.
He proved that there were more enduring monuments
than those which rise from the battle-field. His name
is associated with works of art and literary productions,
as indissolubly as those of their authors, and although he
only lived to the age of forty-four, he expired tranquilly
in the midst of his friends. His death was deemed a
national misfortune, and seems to have been the
precursor
of innumerable woes to Italy. Giovanni, son of
Lorenzo, was an archbishop at ten, and a cardinal at
fourteenthe youngest person ever raised to that rank.
A letter still extant, addressed by his father to him at
Rome, evinces how much at heart he held his
advancement
.
After the death of Piero, Giovanni became the
head of the family; and all his wishes centered in the
hope of reviving its influence, which had again suffered
a serious interruption. This feeling he prudently
concealed
for some time. After the battle of Ravenna, three
young men, resolute friends of the Medici, went to the
Gonfaliere, and, with their daggers at his throat, forced
Soderini to resign. The Medici being thus restored,
Giovanni was made Pope, under the title of Leo X.
His pontificate is celebrated as a period when letters and
the arts flourished to an unparalleled degree. Previous
circumstances, however, had prepared the way for the
many brilliant results of that remarkable epoch. The
sale of indulgences, and other church abuses, were then
carried to the highest point; and the protests against
ecclesiastical tyranny commenced, which ushered in the
reformation. Cosmo, Francesco and Ferdinand,
maintained
something of the liberal and tasteful spirit of their
ancestors. But under Ferdinand II., who, in 1621,
came to the government, at the age of eleven, the aspect of
affairs changed. Extravagant expenditures drained the
state of its resources, and when Cosmo III., died, after
a reign of fifty-three years, Tuscany was reduced to a
most deplorable state, oppressed with a heavy national
debt, and exhausted by taxes. Fortunately for the
country
,
John Gaston was the last of his family, once so
glorious
,
but now so sadly degenerated. He died after an
indifferent rule, and in accordance with the terms of peace
with Vienna (1735) left his duchy to the house of
Lorraine
.
Francis Stephen, Duke of Lorraine, and Grand
Duke of Tuscany, made a contract with John Gaston's
sisterthe last of the name of Medici, by which he
acquired
the various allodial possessions collected by her
ancestors. Under the twenty-six years of the sway of
his son Leopold, Tuscany recovered from a
decline
that had lasted more than a century. He
encouraged
commerce, agriculture and manufactures, established
penitentiaries, abolished the inquisition, and proclaimed
a new criminal code. His financial administration was
admirable, and his own manner of life extremely simple.
The traveller in Italy still recognizes the happy
influences
of his regenerating rule. Nor has the effect of his
noble example been contravened by his successor. An
air of contentment, and a feeling of safety continues to
distinguish Tuscany, and render it the favourite sojourn
of the stranger. Even the comparative severity of the
climate in winter, aggravated by the
tramontana
which
sweeps so coldly from the mountains, seldom drives the
foreign sojourners to more genial localities. It is not,
perhaps, without reason, that the distinguished literary
rank which Florence holds in Italian history, has been
ascribed to its inferior climate.
There is something almost oppressive to the senses,
and confusing to the mind, in the immense collections of
paintings in Italy. The stranger, especially if his time
is limited, and his eagerness for knowledge and true
impressions
,
a delicate and discriminating, as well as an
earnest passion, will not unfrequently regret the number
and variety of interesting objects which at once demand
his attention. A scene of natural grandeur or beauty
seldom distracts the eye with the variety of its features.
The mountain range which girdles the prospect, the grove
which waves above the cliff, the river flowing through the
vale, the flowers on its banks, and the rich cloud-land
above, are harmonized to the view, reposing beneath the
same light, and stirred by a common air. But each work
of art has a distinctive character. It is a memorial of an
individual mind. It demands undivided attention.
Hence, the first visit to a museum of art is almost
invariably
unsatisfactory. We instinctively wish that the array
were not so imposing. Many a sweet countenance,
whose expression haunts us like a dream, we vainly
endeavor
to recall; many a group we would fain transfer to
our own apartment, that there we might leisurely survey
its excellencies, and grow familiar with its spirit. There
are few public galleries which are less objectionable, on
this account, than that of Florence. When we have
paused in the vestibule long enough to recover breath
after ascending the long flight of stairs, and inspect the
specimens of statuary there arranged, the first paintings
which meet our gaze, on entering, are of an early date.
The stiff execution brings to mind the Chinese style,
and indicates a primitive epoch in the history of art.
The arabesques on the ceiling, the portraits immediately
beneath it, and the range of ancient busts below, fill,
without dazzling the eye. As we pass on, the interest
increases
at every step. There is a gradual growth of
attraction. Curiosity is soon absorbed in a deeper
sentiment
.
Alternately we stand smiling before some
graphic product of the Dutch pencil, wrapt in a
speculative
reverie over an obscure painting, or seated, at last,
quite absorbed in admiration within the hallowed precincts
of the Tribune. The perfect freedom of entrance and
observation, unannoyed by the jargon of a
cicerone
,
doubtless adds to the pleasure of a visit to the Florence
collections. And the heart is not less gratified than the
eye, when we behold one of the sunburnt
conladini
improving
a spare hour on market-days, to loiter in the gallery, or
10
turns from a miracle of art to the happy countenance of
some foreign painter, as he stands before his easel, intent
upon copying a favorite original. The most unique
feature
in the collections of which this city boasts, however,
is doubtless the gallery of portraits of celebrated painters,
chiefly by themselves. How interesting to turn from the
immortal products of the pencil, to the lineaments of the
artist! Raphael's sweet countenance, eloquent with the
refined beauty which distinguishes his works, and
subdued
by something of the melancholy associated with his
early death; Perugino, his master; Leonardo da Vinci,
who first developed the principles of that progress in art,
which was perfected during the fifteenth century, who so
earnestly and successfully devoted his life to the
advancement
of his favorite pursuit, and died in the arms of his
royal patron; Salvator Rosa, the poet, musician and
painter, recognised by his half savage aspect, who so
delighted
in scenes of gloomy grandeur, and studied nature
with such enthusiasm amid the wilds of the Appenines;
all, in short, of that glorious phalanx, whose best
monuments
are their works.
The bronze statue of Perseus, under the allogii of the
gallery, reminds the passer of one of the most remarkable
characters to which Florence has given birth. Born on
the night of All Saints' day, Cellini assures us he was
rapturously welcomed to the world by his father, who, as
if anticipating his future celebrity, instantly greeted him
as Benvenuto. Like Salvator Rosa, music, at first,
disputed
the empire of his mind with the other arts, and his
remarkable
performance on the flute, was the primary
occasion
of attracting towards him attention and patronage.
Indeed, the artist's father most pertinaciously fixed all his
hopes for young Cellini's advancement, upon his
proficiency
in this accomplishment. Benvenuto's ambition,
however, was of a far more various and earnest nature
than the success of a mere musician could gratify. To
please his parent, however, he long continued to devote
much time to practising upon his favorite instrument,
although the employment was frequently an occasion of
ennui and disgust. At length, having been apprenticed
to a goldsmith, the skill he displayed in the finer
departments
of the trade, indicated, in a striking manner, the
true bent of his genius. Henceforth, we find Benvenuto
constantly employed in various places, and everywhere
with distinguished success. It strikes us, at the present
day, with no little surprise, to perceive the enthusiasm
excited by labors of such a nature as employed the mind
of Cellini; but the exquisite grace and rare invention he
displayed, were as significant of talent to the admirers of
art, in the fifteenth century, as the gifted limner exhibited
on his canvas, or the statuary in his marble. His abilities
were in constant requisition, and seemed to have excited
equal admiration whether bestowed upon a button for the
Pope, a chalice for a Cardinal, or a salt-cellar for King
Francis.At one time we find him engraver to the mint
at Rome, and at another, exercising all his ingenuity in
setting a precious jewel, executing an original medal, or
designing the most beautiful figures in
alto relievo
, upon
a golden vase, for some Italian prince. For a
considerable
period, he was without an equal in his profession.
Towards the last of his life, however, his energies seem
to have been concentrated upon sculpture, of which the
Perseus is the most celebrated specimen. The account
he gives of the difficulties surmounted in casting this
statue and the unworhy treatment he received from the
Grand Duke, in regard to his recompense, is among the
most painful examples of the trials of artists. Cellini's
life was one of the most singular vicissitude. Frequently
changing his abode, working under the patronage of
various
princes, of a bold and active temper, his memoirs
present a picture in which the quiet pursuits of an artist are
grotesquely mingled with the experiences of an adventurer.
One day, banished from his native city for having been
engaged in a bloody quarrel, another, high in the
confidence
of kings and popes; now pining in the dungeon
of St. Angelo, which he once so gallantly defended, and
now rich and honored in the service of a magnificent
court. If we are to place the slightest faith in his own
testimony, Benvenuto proved himself equal to any
exigency
,
and fairly overcame his various enemies by his prompt
courage, or quick invention. He is certainly the prince
of boasters. The coolness with which he speaks of
despatching his foes, is startling to one familiar only with
these peaceful times; and the ingenuity with which he
baffles those who are not to be reached by the sword, is
most remarkable. A striking instance occurred while he
was in the employ of the King of France. Madame
D'Estampes, who seems to have been extremely
disaffected
towards Benvenuto, induced the king to inspect
some of his most recent works at an hour the most
unfavorable
for their display. Cellini, anticipating the
effect, affixed a torch to the arm of a statue of Jupiter;
and while his female enemy and the monarch were
regarding
his studies, in the dusky light, he suddenly ignited
the torch, and wheeled the Jupiter into the centre of the
room. The effect was most vivid, as the light was placed
at exactly the right angle to show the figure to the best
advantage. Francis received a new and powerful
impression
of the genius of Cellini, and Madame's design
was completely counteracted. The versatility of talent in
the character of Benvenuto was not more surprising than
his boundless self-confidence. How much are we
indebted
to this quality for the fruits of genius! Gifts of mind,
unaccompanied by a vivid sense of their existence, are
of little benefit to the world. Consciousness of power,
firm and unwavering, is the best guarantee for its
appropriate
exertion. How much of the cool decision of great
men is attributable to confidence in their destiny! When
Napoleon was urged to leave a dangerous position, during
an engagement when the shot were flying thickly around
him, and calmly replied, `the ball is not yet moulded
which is destined for me,' who does not recognize one
secret cause of his intrepidity? No combination of
circumstances
seemed adequate to shake Cellini's faith in
himself. He spoke as certainly of the issue of an
experiment
in his art, as if it had been repeatedly proved.
Again and again he reinstated himself in the favor from
which the machinations of his rivals had removed him, by
the clear earnestness of his bearing. Whether discussing
the merits of a work of art, defending himself before a
tribunal
,
10*
engaged hand to hand with a foe, or casting a statue
which had cost him years of toil, he seemed to act upon
the sentiment of the poet
Courage gone? all's gone
Better never have been born.
It cannot but provoke a smile in contrast with the
theories
of later moralists, after having followed Benvenuto
thruugh an unequalled category of brawls, duels, amours
and intrigues, to find him consoling himself in prison by
communing with angelic visions, and cheering his heart
with the conviction that he is an especial favorite of
Heaven
.
Benvenuto closed his adventurous life where he
commenced it; and was buried with many honors, in the
church of the Annunziata, at Florence. His native city
is adorned with the chief ornament of his genius; and
the exquisite specimens of his skill as a jeweller and
engraver
,
are scattered over the cabinets of virtuosi
throughout
Italy.
The opera-house of Florence, called the Pergola, is
remarkable for its chaste interior. Romani's poetry has
recently given a new interest to this favorite amusement.
It seems almost to have revived the dulcet numbers of
Metastasio, and wedded to the touching strains of Bellini,
leaves no occasion to regret the earlier eras of the musical
drama. The want of permanent prose companies in
the different cities of Italy, as schools of language, is a
great desideratum; and the number of trashy translations
from the French, degrade the national taste. Sometimes
the excellent company of Turin, including the inimitable
Vestri, a Tuscan by birth, visit Florence in the autumn,
and furnish a pleasant pastime at the Cocomero, while
during Carnival, Stenterello dispenses his jokes and
rhymes at the Borg' Ogni Santi. In Florence, alone, is
enjoyed the opportunity, at certain seasons, of witnessing
Alfieri's tragedies. The stranger, too, cannot but
gratefully
recur to the comedies of Goldoni. They furnish
him with an admirable introduction to the language; and
when he is once more at home, and would fain renew the
associations of every day life in far distant Italy, he has
only to peruse one of these colloquial plays, and be
transported
,
at once, to a
locanda
or a
caff
. Goldoni's
history
is intimately associated with his comedies.
Successively
a student of medicine, diplomacy and law, a maker
of almanacs, and a comic writer, his personal adventures
abound in the humorous. He solaced himself, when
unfortunate
,
by observing the passing scene. When jilted
by a woman, or cheated by a knave, he revenged himself
by showing up their conduct as a warning, in his next
play. He looked upon the panorama of human existence,
not as a metaphysician, but as a painter, not to discover
the ideal, but to display the actual. Yet he often aimed
at bringing popular vices or follies into contempt, and
frequently
with no little success. At a time when
ciscesbeism
and gambling prevailed in Venice, he portrayed
their consequences so graphically, that, a for time, both
practices were brought into disrepute; and when the
Spectator began to be read, and it became fashionable for
women to affect philosophy, he turned the laugh upon
them with his Filosofo Inglese. His comedies have
more humor than wit, but their chief attraction is their
truth to nature. Although much attached to Venice, his
native city, which he declares was never revisited without
discovering new beauties, Goldoni seems to have highly
enjoyed his long residence at the French court. He
boasts of having an excellent appetite after every fresh
mortification; and when care or sickness made him
wakeful, he was accustomed to translate from the
Venetian
into the Tuscan dialect, and then into the French, by
way of a soporific. Overshadowed as his buoyant spirit
was at last, by illness and reverses, his happy
temperament
made his life pleasant. He had the satisfaction of
feeling that, through his efforts, comedy was reformed
in Italy, and his country furnished with a stock of
standdard
plays, of excellent tendency, sixteen of which were
composed in one yearno ordinary achievement of
industry
.
The house of the Buonarotti family has recently
undergone
extensive repairs. But the rooms once
occupied
by Michael Angelo, remain unchanged, save that
around one of them are arranged a series of paintings,
illustrative of the artist's life. How Florence teems
with the fame of this most gifted of her children! How
rife are his sayings on the lips of her citizens! How
eloquently do his works speak in the city where his bones
repose! As the Cathedral dome first greets the stranger's
eye, or fades from his parting gaze, how naturally does
it suggest the thoughts of St. Peter's and the artist's
well known exclamation! In a twilight walk along the
river-side, as we watch the evening star over San Spirito,
we remember that a prior of that convent taught him
anatomy. If we pass the church del Carmine, we are
reminded that he there studied the early efforts of
Massacio
.
In the gallery, we behold the Dancing Faun,
whose head he so admirably restored, wonder at the
stern face of Brutus, or ponder his own portrait. In the
Piazza is his David, in the church of San Lorenzo, his
Day and Night, and that perfect embodiment of
Horatio's
familiar phrase`a countenance more in sorrow
than in anger,'the statue of the Duke of Urbino.
Here he made his figure of snow; there he buried his
sleeping Cupid, which was dug up for an antique. Near
St. Mark's was the school of sculpture, where he first
practiced. In Santa Croce is his tomb. The memory
of Michael Angelo constitutes the happiest of the many
interesting associations of Florence. Not less as a man
than an artist, does his name lend dignity and beauty to
the scene. We look upon the master-lines of his
unfinished
works, and realize the struggles of his soul towards
perfection. Truly has one of his biographers remarked,
`his genius was vast and wild, by turns extravagant and
capricious, rarely to be implicitly followed, always to be
studied with advantage.' But we think not merely here
of the sculptor, painter, architect, philosopher and poet;
we dwell upon, and feel the whole character of him who
so nobly proved his eminent claim to these various titles.
As we tread the chambers where he passed so many nights
of study, so many days of toil, as we behold the oratory
where he prayed, or stand above his ashes, we think of his
noble independence which princes and prelates, in a venal
age, could not subdue, of his deep sympathy with the
grand and beautiful in human nature, and of his true
affection
which dictated the sentiment
Better plea
Love cannot find than that in loving thee,
Glory to that eternal Peace is paid
Who such divinity to thee imparts,
As hallows and makes pure all gentle hearts.
Art seemed not an exclusive end to Michael Angelo.
For fame, he cherished no morbid appetite. He was
conscious of loftier aims. His letters and sonnets
breathe the noblest aspirations, and the most perfect
love of truth. When refused admittance to the Pope's
presence, he quitted Rome in disgust; yet watched as
tenderly by the sick-bed of a faithful servant, as at that of
a son or a brother. As the architect of St. Peter's, he
declined all emolument; and kissed the cold hand of
Vittoria Colonna with tearful reverence. After
eighty-eight
years spent in giving a mighty impulse to the arts,
in cultivating sculpture, painting, poetry and architecture,
in observing `the harmless comedy of life,' in proving the
supremacy of genius over wealth, of moral power over
rank, of character over the world, Michael Angelo died,
saying, `My soul I resign to God, my body to the earth,
and my possessions to my nearest kin.' He left a
bequest
of which he spoke not, for it was already decreed
that his fame and example should shed a perennial honor
upon Florence, and for ever bless the world.
THE THESPIAN SYREN.
But ever and anon of grief subdued
There comes a token like a scorpion's sting,
Scarce seen, but with fresh bitterness imbued.
Byron
.
I.
It
was towards the close of a cool but delightful autumn
evening, in Milan, the best part of which I had vainly
spent in searching for a friend. All at once it occurred
to me that he might beat the opera;yet, thought I, F
is very fastidious, and there is no particular attraction
to-night
.
Thus weighing the matter on my mind, I came
within sight of the Scala, and I was soon at the door of
Count G's box, where F was generally to be found.
The orchestra was performing an interlude, and the
foot-lights
beaming upon the beautiful classical groups
depicted
on the drop. My friend was not visible, and I should
instantly have retreated, had not a side glance revealed
to me the figure of a young man, seated in the shadow of
the box curtains. Count G was partial to Americans,
and I scrutinized the stranger, thinking it not
impossible
he was a countryman, but soon recognized the
countenance
of a Scotch student, with whom I had exchanged
a few words at our
table-d'hote
in the morning. It was
several minutes before I satisfied myself of his identity,
so different was his aspect and demeanor. He sat
opposite
me, at the table, and was engaged in a most lively
conversation with a flaxen-haired daughter of Vienna,
who appeared delighted with the opportunity of reciting
the story of her travels to a new acquaintance, which she
persisted in doing, notwithstanding the obvious
displeasure
of her father, a military character, who morosely
devoured
his dinner beside her. Her auditor repaid the
lady's condescension with an account of the customs and
traditions of the Highlanders, in doing which the keen
air of his native hills seemed to inspire him; for from a
constrained and quiet, he gradually glided into a free and
earnest manner, and evolved enthusiasm enough to draw
sympathizing looks even from a coterie of native Italians,
his opposite neighbors. Frank Graham was now in a
totally different mood. He sat, braced in his seat, as if
under the influence of some nervous affection; his lips
when released from the restraint imposed upon them,
quivered incessantly, andit might have been fancybut
I thought I saw, in the dusky light, several hasty tears fall
upon the crimson drapery. There is something in the
deep emotion of a man of intellectual vigorand such,
Graham's table-talk had proved himwhich interests us
deeply. The very attempt to check the tide of feeling,
the struggle between the reason and the heart, the
affective
and reflective powers, as a phrenologist would say,
awakens our sympathy. I forgot the object of my visit
to the Scala, and silently resolved to lead off my
fellow-sojourner
from the memory of his disquietude, or draw
from him its cause, and, if possible, act the comforter.
With this view, I approached him carelessly, as if I had
not noticed his emotion, and proffered him the greetings
of the evening. He looked at me vacantly, a moment,
but soon rejoined with cordiality. Then rising and
drawing his cloak around him, he seized my hand and
exclaimed
`Let
us leave this place, my friend.' There
was confidence implied in his tremulous tones, yet I was
half in doubt as to the propriety of alluding to his obvious
depression. It was a fine moonlight night, and we
walked side by side for several minutes, in silence.
`How long since you left home, Mr. Graham?' I
inquired
by, way of beginning a colloquy. `Five minutes
ago, or thereabouts,' he replied huskily. I halted in
surprise
,
and gazed upon him in wonder. He stopped also,
and observing my astonishment continued in a clearer
voice, `Do not be alarmed my friend; I am perfectly
sane; literally speaking, I left Scotland five years since,
but just now your voice aroused me to a consciousness of
where and what I am. I have been carried back not
only
to my country, but to my youth, to its richest hour, to
its most vivid epoch; you, by a word, dissolved the spell:
there is the famous cathedral, this is Milan, and I am
nothing now but Frank Graham; but one memento of
my recent fairy land remains'and he pointed to the
moon.
`Oh what mistaken kindness we sometimes practice!'
11
I replied; you seemed brooding over some sorrowful
subject
.
I thought to divert your attention. Forgive my
intrusion, for many, many injuries are fanciful and
unworthy
the name, compared with that which drags a happy
idealist from his rie in the heavens, down to life's
common
and desert shore.'
`Say you so, my friend?' returned Graham, `then you
will not laugh at an incident in the life of an enthusiast.
Come, come,' and he drew my arm within his, and
quickened
his pace. The window of my room at the Albergo,
reached to the floor, and overlooked a small garden; as
we entered, I placed the lamps in a distant corner, threw
open the curtains and admitted the full light of the moon.
`Now, Heaven grant,' said I, as Frank Graham
esconced
himself in a corner of the sofa, and filled his glass
from a flask of red wine`Heaven grant that your's is a
tale of love and chivalry, for such a scene ill befits an
unromantic
legend.'`It is, indeed, a glorious night; but
who ever heard, in these days, of a poor Scotch student
essaying at tournament or holy war, except in the field of
fiction, as here,'and he lifted `Ivanhoe' from the
table`yet remember that this lovely orb smiles equally
upon the love-vigils of the Highland chief, as upon those
of the knights of old, and her beams must seem as
romantic
to you, while I improvise a chapter of my
autobiography
,
as they did to Rebecca the Jewess, daughter of
Isaac of York, when the wounded knight related, at the
same witching season, his adventures in Palestine.'
II.
The vivid impression which our `first play' leaves upon
the mind might teach us something, if we were
introspective
moralists, as to that greatly mooted pointthe true
influence of the drama. Perchance from the deep and
splendid visions thus awakened to the fancy, the clear
and romantic aspect which humanity thus portrayed
assumes
,
we might discover no questionable affinity between
our own unsophisticated natures and the dramatic art, we
might appreciate the importance of such an institution as
the theatre to civilized man, to the dawning mind, to the
human being as such; we might with perfect consistency,
learn to rank the legitimate drama in the poetry of life.
But however this may be, there are many incidental
experiences
where an universal end is pursued. About
every general object, personal associations abundantly
cling. There is deep truth in the great German writer's
remark`every
individual
spirit wakes in the great
stream of multitude.' Lamb's first visit to the theatre was
powerfully associated with a plate prefixed to Rowe's
Shakspeare. This event with me, is linked with a
deeper
reminiscence, for it occurred at an age of deeper
susceptibility
.
`I was educated at the University of St. Andrews, and
from a three years' residence there, divided between study,
solitary walks along the sea-shore, and attendance upon
prudential lectures daily delivered by the maiden aunt
with whom I resided, I was, all at once, removed to the
metropolis and entered as a law student. At Edinburgh,
I boarded with a distant relation who was a great musical
amateur. In his house there also resided a very eccentric
man, a dramatist by profession. He had an interest in
some score of plays, more or less popular, having either
composed or adapted them to the stage. The manager
of one of the principal theatres was his intimate friend,
and had exerted himself to bring out Mr. Connington's
dramas so successfully, that they were then yielding him
a very handsome income. At every meal, dramatic
literature
was discussed, and the merits of various actors
canvassed
.
Not infrequently my kinsman, who was quite an
adept in such matters, gave imitations of the best
tragedians
,
by way of an evening's pastime. As you may
suppose, I soon became much interested in the subject of
these conversations. To me a new field of thought was
opened. And yet evening after evening, I declined
invitations
to attend the theatre. This was thought quite
surprising
,
particularly as I manifested so much interest in
every thing that was going on there, and after a while took
no inconsiderable part in the dramatic conversations.
The truth was, my imagination was wrought up to the
highest pitch. My `first play' assumed an importance
in my mind, which it is difficult to describe. I came to
regard it as one of the great epochs of existence. I
anticipated
its effects as nervous people sometimes fancy
the operation of some powerful nostrum, or as I can
imagine
Sir Humphrey Davy looked forward to the effect
of a new gas. In consequence of this feeling, I made
great preparations for the event. I read Shakspeare with
greater attention than ever before, informed myself of the
history of the drama, read innumerable criticisms,
biographies
and lectures illustrative of the whole subject, and
finally determined to be governed by circumstances as to
the occasion I should choose to make my
debut
as a
playgoer
.
`I entered our little parlor one cold, drizzly evening,
five years ago this very night, my head throbbing with six
long hours' delving into the mysteries of the law. In no
very good humor, I seated myself before the grate to
await the dinner hour. I was gazing rather moodily at
the fire, when something intercepted its rays; I looked
up, Mr. Connington was at my elbow holding a printed
bill before me. I could distinguish but one word, `
Virginius
.'
`Mr. Graham,' said my friend, `you must go
to-night.'`I will,' said I, and we sat down to dinner.
`During the meal I was unusually silent. I was quite
oppressed with the thought that I was so near an end so
long anticipated. I fancied I had been too precipitate.
I felt like one standing at the entrance of a splendid
Gothic cathedral; it seemed to me that a single step
would bring me into an overpowering scene.
III.
`How little, my friend, can a man of acute, lively
sensibilities
calculate upon the experience that awaits him!
A skilful devotee of science can predict, with a good
degree
of certainty, the approach of celestial phenomena,
the existence of unseen fountains, and even the direction
of the unborn breeze; but who has the foresight to
prophecy
the destiny of feelingto indicate the next new
influence which shall arouse it, to trace its untravelled
course, or point confidently to its issue? A man
conscious
of a fathomless tide of feeling within him, who throws
himself into a world of moral excitements, knows but
11*
this, that he is doomed to feel deeply, variously, often to
suffer agonyoften to enjoy delight. But the very means
he thought would prove most magnetic, may absolutely
fail to attract, and some unexpected agency, of which he
dreamed not, may approach the unguarded portal of his
soul, and take it by surprise. Such was my experience
when I trusted myself to dramatic influences. I had
thought to be subject to them as a philosopher; but while
seeking this end I was taught most emphatically to realize
my own humanity.
`The leading actress on the Edinburgh boards at the
period to which I refer, was Helen Trevor. This was
not, indeed, the name by which she was known to the
public; for being the daughter of a distinguished
performer
,
it was deemed expedient for her to appear under
her mother's family name, which was one of the highest in
the annals of the British stage. I first saw her in
Virginia
,
and never, no, never can I forget that memorable
evening. In the first act, when Virginius says to Servia,
`Go fetch her to me,' I observed all around me silent and
intent from expectation. It was not till the deafening
greetings had subsided, that I raised my eyes, and then
my cherished ideal of female beauty was realized. The
chaste dress of white muslinthe thick dark ringlets
about the neckthe simple girdlethe little satin band
around the beautiful browthe quiet, gentle and touching
simplicity of the air and accentsall, all are before me.
How deeply I sympathised in the indignation of
Virginius
how
I wept when he recited his daughter's praises!
Unfortunately, the part of Icilius was played by a novice.
Had it been otherwise, perhaps my emotions,
overpowering
as they were, might have been subdued; but while all
the other characters satisfied me, his, Virginia's lover's,
the very part with which I felt myself identified, was
shamefully weak. I was absolutely maddened. The
theatre
vanished from my mind. I thought of nothing,
cared for nothing but that fair young creature, and
the idea possessed me, with a frightful tenacity, that
I
should one day be the true Icilius. As the play
proceeded
I became more and more lost in this idea. It was
only when the wretched personator of the Roman lover
came on, that the illusion vanished. And then a bitter
and impatient hatred possessed me. I longed to clutch
the young man, and hurl him away. And when the
Roman father, in solemn and touching tones, said
You are my witnesses
That this young creature I present to you
I do pronounce my profitably cherished,
And most deservedly beloved child
My daughter truly filial, both in word
And act, yet even more in act than word
I tremblingly ejaculated, `
We are, we are
.' A lady in the
box thought I was faint and proffered her salts. I took
the vial mechanically, but was not recalled; for a
moment
after, when the words reached my enamoured ear
You will be all
Her father has beenadded unto all
A lover would be?
the query seemed addressed to me; unable longer to
contain
what rushed to my lips, I rose, sprang upon the seat,
and shouted, `I will, I will'but the words were broken
I felt a hand close tightly over my mouth, and myself
lifted into the lobby, whence I was hurried, without a
word, into a hackney coach, by the dim lights of which I
discovered Mr. Connington, who had firmly grasped one
arm, while a gentleman, whom I recognised as an
occupant
of the box, held the other. They evidently thought
me mad.
`This adventure was a salutary and timely lesson.
Never again did I betray any emotion. But I felt the
more. The drama which I had fancied would produce
such mighty effects on my mind, was nothing except as
it was associated with
her
. O my friend, you can have
no idea of what mingled ecstacy and bitterness is
involved
in the love of an object of public admiration!
Sometimes
I would have given worlds if Helen had been a
tradesman's daughter, living in honorable obscurity, and
then when evening came, I saw her personating the
grandest female characters of history, arrayed in an ideal
costume, uttering the noblest sentiments, and appearing
as the faithful, the self-denying, the beautiful
representative
of her sex; and then, in those moments, I wished
her ever to be the same. But poor Shakspeare! where
was my reverence for him? Strange fantasy, the world
would have thought, had I written a new commentary on
his tragedies, to declare that the most eloquent line in
Romeo
and Juliet was Lady Capulet's, `Nurse, where's my
daughter? call her forth to me'and in Othello's speech,
the most awakening phrase the last, `Here comes my
lady
,
let her witness it.' Yet such they were to me, for
they called first upon the stage Juliet and Desdemona.
`Many weeks flew by, and my time was ostensibly
divided
between Blackstone and the drama. My kinsman
frequently applauded this rare union of rational and
imaginative
studies. `Few young men, cousin Frank,' he
would say, `choose so wisely. I perceive you did not
study the philosophy of the human mind, at St. Andrews,
in vain. Here you devote the day to legal investigations,
which, questionless, have a tendency to invigorate the
understanding
,
to create just habits of thinking, and train
the judgment; then your evenings are given to the
greatest
imaginative amusement of this utilitarian age. You
cultivate a taste for the drama. Well, well, cousin, we'll
make a fine fellow of you yet.' In these remarks Mr.
Connington would coincide, neutralizing his praises
with the observation that Mr. Graham's dramatic
criticisms
were, somehow or other, more vague and less to the
purpose, than before he attended the theatre.' Neither
of these sage observers of human nature, however, had
the least idea of the true state of the case. And, indeed,
it was not till late that I myself discovered with wonder
which partook strangely of regret and gladness, that it
was not Cordelia or Virginia that I loved, but Helen
Trevor.
IV.
`Hitherto my love had been ideal. Personal
intercourse
had not revealed to me the imperfections of the
fair Thespian.Report spoke highly of her character,
and the earnest approbation of the public sufficiently
indicated her professional genius. Strange as the
remark would seem to a mere worldly reasoner, you
my friend, will understand me, when I assert that
few attachments excelled mine in real and beautiful
sentiment
.
It was much like the love which we know ardent
men have cherished for a portrait, a statue, or the being
of their dreams.Whatever the object of my affections,
in reality, washowever tainted with the alleged evil
influences
of her pursuit, however intellectually endowed or
morally giftedremember that as presented to me, she
was always the living portrait of departed worth, the
renovated
image of some hallowed being, the human
embodiment
of a poet's dream. Naturally favored with a
classical
species of womanly beauty, displaying manners in
which feminine grace and modesty struggled with a vivid
conception of the part she was representingyou cannot
wonder that a hallow of romance was thrown around the
person of my idol. I never saw her but as the personator
of virtue. No other parts were adapted to her talents.
And thus, to my ardent fancy, she became the
personification
of all that was good, and beautiful, and true.
`It was not in human nature to be long content with
such a semi-interchange of sympathy. Alas! the thought
struck me, all at once, that there had been no interchange,
that my heart had been given to one who knew me not
that I was no more to the Thespian than the multitude
who nightly witnessed her performance. I felt foolishly
conscious of my wandering moods. I resolved, after
long and troubled musing, to come face to face with the
admired actress. And yet I feared to adventure. The
charm might be dissolved, or it might be confirmed.
What then? I should, at least, know my fate. Stripped
of the adventitious aid of her profession, she might prove
uninteresting. And thenI laughed wildly at the
thoughtI should be free! Yet, in a moment I
discarded
the idea. If I have been in bondage this month past,
thought I, then let me be a slave forever. It seemed to
me easier to die a victim to imaginary wo, than to return
again to barren studies or common cares. My
resolution
taken, I grew impatient, yet never suffered myself
to think of what I was about to do, without realizing that
awe with which the German dramatist says all mortals
must `grasp the urn of destiny.'
`Capital, capital!' exclaimed Mr. Connington, one
morning, at the breakfast-table, as he laid down the Post
and resumed his muffin. `What is it?' inquired my
cousin, taking up the paper. `Why, an excellent
criticism
on the Portia we saw Monday night.' `Ah! signed
F. G., toowho can that be?' `Who should it be but
Frank Graham?' asked the dramatist, his eye brightening
at the discovery. I could not deny the authorship. Mr.
Connington hastily swallowed his last cup of tea, and as
he left the room, with a significant nod, remarked
`Well done, master Frank; she shall know it, too; she
shall, I declare.' I was after him in an instant. `My
dear Mr. Connington,' said I, `pray be careful. If you
choose to force this hasty notice upon the attention of
Miss , do it in a way which shall impress her
favorably
as to the author. See, see, my friend, that I am not
merged in her mind with the herd of coxcomb admirers
whom I am sure she despises.' The energy with which
I spoke astonished him, but recovering quickly from his
surprise, he replied, `Why, look you, my young man;
the literary editor of this paper is the best friend her
family ever had; I mean he shall tell her. And should
you like to know her, Frank? I'll ask him to introduce
you. What say?' I could scarcely speak from agitation.
So near the object of my wishes? It seemed impossible.
Clinging to Mr. Connington's arm, I accompanied him
down to the last step, succeeding finally in hurriedly
signifying
my assent. I was lost in joyful surprise, from
which I was aroused by my cousin's voice reprimanding
the porter for leaving the street door open, and hastened
in, to prepare for the expected interview.
`That long forenoon passed heavily enough. Not an
iota of legal knowledge did it bring me. The dinner
hour came. I longed to know if Mr. Connington had
seen the editor; but the conversation, for the first time
since my arrival in Edinburgh turned upon foreign
politics
,
and argument ensued. I thought it inexpressibly
tedious. My abstraction was noticed, which I did not
regret, since it relieved my suspense. `Frank,' said the
dramatist, `your wits seem a wool-gathering. Rally,
man!you 're a critic, you know. I'm sorry my
editorial
friend has gone to Glasgow for a fortnight. I saw
him this morning, just as he was starting. Give my
regards to Mr. Graham,' said he; `I hope to form his
acquaintance on my returnand then, as you say he's
really a fine fellowI'll introduce him to Miss ; a
thing I would not do for many young men. The lady
has no time to waste, and hates promiscuous
acquaintances
.'
I was terribly disappointed. A fortnight's
delay
seemed an age. A proposal of my cousin suggested
consolation.`Frank,' said he, `I want you to know
my friend Bouvier the composer; he has a sanctum near
the painting-room of the theatrewe'll go up and see
him to-night, between the acts.'
`The platforms extending over the wings, above the
stage are called the flies. They command a view of the
actors and the orchestra. It was necessary to cross these,
on our way to the composer's studio. I looked down a
moment as we passed, and was delighted to find that while
the stage was completely under my cognizance, I myself
was invisible to the performers, unless indeed they should
take great pains to spy me out. I determined to become
intimate with the musical occupant of this curious region,
that I might at will come hither, and, unseen, behold the
Thespian. Mr. Bouvier, upon my kinsman's favorable
representation of my talents, begged me to write the
words adapted to some opera music he was preparing.
And thus was I unexpectedly furnished with a reasonable
excuse for frequenting the vicinity of the hallowed scene
of my favorite labors.
`The next day, at about noonthe hour I had
ascertained
she would be at rehearsal, I closed a huge volume
of commentaries, snatched up my hat, and, with a beating
heart, hastened to the theatre. I entered the private door,
passed through the corridors, by the range of
dressing-rooms
,
and, to my joy, encountered no one until I arrived
at the top of the stairs, where stood a knot of carpenters,
12
planning some stage device. They stared a little at my
appearance. `Where is Mr. Bouvier's room?' I inquired.
`This way, sir,' said one of the men, conducting me
across the apartment to a little door. The moment he
retired, I gently closed it behind me, and found myself
alone upon the flies. It was sometime before, in the kind
of twilight which prevailed, I could distinctly behold the
scene upon the stage. Near the foot-lights stood a small
table, upon which three or four candles were burning
amid a mass of papers, two or three books, and a standish.
Here sat a portly man who, I afterwards learned, was the
prompter; beside him was a lad technically
denominated
the call-boy; and standing about in groups, pacing in
couples to and fro, or ranged in order and reading their
several parts, were the performers. It was only now and
then that a phrase or two stole up to my ear from the
voices below, but the tones familiar to my dreams arose
not.Suddenly the readers paused and looked round, as
if a new personage should appear. The prompter
whispered
to the urchin at his side, and the boy ran towards
the green-room, shouting the name that was to me so
sacred. Presently the Thespian entered. I saw her for
the first time in the ordinary habit of her sex. Her dress
was simple, but becoming in the extreme. Her manner
of greeting the performers, and their obvious deference
towards her, confirmed me in the idea I had formed of
her lady-like demeanor in private life. Hearing some one
approach, I glided into Mr. Bouvier's room. But to this
post of observation I daily repaired. Thence I watched
every movement and caught every tone of the Thespian
O how fleetly sped the hours as I leaned in watchful
reverie
over the old oaken beam, and gazed down upon the
rehearsals! The superiority of my charmer among her
mates, her self-possessed dignity under the trying
circumstances
of her lotI saw and marked from my rie, and
fondly remembered ever. Sometimes I was tempted to
spring down into the midst of the group who were
blessed
with her presence. At such moments I turned aside
and paced the platform, then looked down again, and
wrestled with my impatience till she departed, and then
hurried into the street to catch a glimpse of her beautiful
figure, as it glided through the neighboring thoroughfares
to her home.
`The fortnight elapsed; the editor returned. It was a
fine, clear morningI remember it as if it were to-day.
I was earlier than usual at my post, and judged, from the
aspect of things below, that a quarter of an hour would
elapse before the performers would assemble. Helen
was there. I was at the office of the Post in a trice.
`Is Mr.  in?' I breathlessly asked. `He is,' was the
reply, and I was shown into the inner room.
`Good morning, sir,' I began. I am Mr. Graham,
the gentleman whom you kindly promised to introduce to
Miss . She is at the theatre now, sir; the
rehearsal
has not commenced. Can you conveniently
accompany
me at once?'
`Certainly, sir, with the greatest pleasure. I have to
see the lady myself. I brought a letter from her brother
in Glasgow.'
`How we got to the theatre, I cannot tell. One
over-powering
idea possessed me. I believed this introduction
was the turning point in my destiny. I answered only
in monosyllables to the editor's warm eulogiums of the
Thespian, and ran along almost dragging him, despite
his half articulated protestations against the pedestrianism
of country-bred Scotchmen. Emerging from the glare of
mid-day into the shadowy gloom of the theatre, we
stopped
to take breath and accustom our dimmed vision to the
change. My companion taking my hand, drew me
between
two scenes in about the centre line of the stage,
and there we began to observe.
`Is she here?' I asked faintly. Just then Helen
appeared
,
slowly walking up the stage, intent upon a
manuscript
.
She was dressed in a simple gown of black silk,
and over her neck was carelessly flung a shawl of richly
wrought lace of the same color. As she walked, the light
from a very high upper window fell directly upon her
features
;
and ever and anon, she lifted her full expressive
eye from the paper, and repeated to herself, as if to make
trial of her memory. When she came parallel with
us, my companion whispered her name. She turned
towards
us; he stepped forward, and was instantly
recognized
and kindly greeted. A few expressions passed
between
them among which such words as`news,' `cold,'
`Glasgow,' and others of an import so common-place
that they seemed to mock the solemn interest of my
feelings
,
when my companion beckoned me forward. I
approached with my hat in my hand and my heart in my
throat. `Miss , this is the gentleman of whom I
spoke to you,Mr. Francis Graham, of .' `I
am happy to see you, Mr. Graham,' returned the
Thespian
,
with a smile that thrilled me, and an accent that
seemed heavenly. I bowed repeatedly. I looked my
veneration and tenderness. I could not speak.
V.
`I had passed the Rubicon, and thenceforth obeyed
the impulse of my feelings fearlessly and freely. Every
night found me behind the wings. The best oranges
that searching could procure in Edinburgh, the fairest
roses of the public gardens, did I lay, as votive offerings,
on the shrine of my idolatry. Five memorable times I
attended the Thespian to her home. On three
memorable
evenings I sat beside her, in the midst of her family.
I was abundantly content. If any thing had been
necessary
to deepen my interest, it was afforded by the
acquaintance
I now formed with her character. She followed
her profession uncomplainingly, for the sake of those
dependent
for support upon her toils. During a morning
walk to Salisbury crags, I resolved on the succeeding
night to offer my hand to the Thespian. I determined
to marry her openly; to lead her before the public on her
farewell benefit. As I strolled back to the city, I was
composing the poetical address which I determined she
should speak on this occasion, when the door of my law
office, which I had mechanically reached, interrupted my
muse. I gravely entered, took down the proper
volume in course, opened it at the right place, and
seating
myself before the extended page, fixed my eyes
intently
12*
upon it, and was soon lost indreaming of Helen
Trevor.
`It was a lovely afternoon, the one preceding the
evening
of my intended declaration. I was in my chamber,
cutting the dead leaves from some wild flowers, just
brought me from the country. Helen was to play
Ophelia
that night, and these were destined for her `fennells,
columbines, and rue, her violets and daises.' There
was a noise in the passage. A sudden foreboding
oppressed
me. The door slowly opened, and in walked
my old aunt, the Professor of Moral Philosophy in
the University at St. Andrews, my cousin and Mr.
Connington
.
There was an awful gravity in their
countenances
.
The flowers dropped from my hands; I was
aghast with astonishment and anxiety. The intruders
silently
seated themselves. `Nephew,' said my aunt, in
the old lecture tone, but with unwonted severity of
manner
,
`I need not ask for whom those foolish weeds are
designed
;
I know all, sir. The disrespect you have shown
for the honor of your family, my honored kinsman has
informed
me of. I warned him never to reprimand you,
but always to notify me of your misdemeanors. This he
has done, in season, happily, to prevent farther mischief.
Your learned friend, here,and she pointed to the
professor
starts
to-morrow for France. We have decided
that he shall be the companion of your travels. Prepare
to accompany him, sir.'
`Suffice it to add, that I was forced from Edinburgh
without being permitted to see the Thespian. Nearly
five years have I been on the continent. Knowledge I
have devotedly pursued, but I was born to live and joy
in
feeling
. I have never entered a theatre since my
departure
from home, till to night, the anniversary of my
`first play.' I ventured, and you saw how I was
over-come
,
ay, and lured into repeating, for the first time
during
my exile, the tale you have so patiently heard.'
`Receive my earnest thanks, and all my sympathy,' I
replied; `but what became of the Thespian?'`She went
to America, and report says she is there married.'
`One query more ere you go'for he had risen to
depart
`deep
as is your grief, you evidently have a theory
that supports you. I have seen you cheerfulwhat is it?
He smiled, and taking a miniature edition of Childe
Harold
from his pocket, said, `It is written here;' then
grasping my hand, he repeated with great force and
pathos
,
the following lines:
Existence may be borne, and the deep root
Of life and sufferance make its firm abode
In bare and desolated bosoms: mute
The camel labors with the heaviest load,
And the wolf dies in silence: not bestowed
In vain should such examples be; if they,
Things of ignoble or of savage mood,
Endure and shrink not, we of nobler clay
May temper it to bear,it is but for a day.
MODENA.
There are those who lord it o'er their fellow-men
With most prevailing tinsel.
Keats
.
Of
all the strong holds of despotism at present
existing
in Italy, Modena excites in the mind of a republican
the greatest impatience. The narrow limits of the state
are in ludicrous contrast with the tyrannical
propensities
of the government. One cannot approach the neat
little capital and gaze through the vine-ranges of the
contiguous
plains, to the distant and snow-clad Appenines,
without dwelling regretfully upon the political condition
of a people, upon whose domain nature has lavished her
resources with a richness that would seem to ensure their
prosperity and happiness. The conduct of the Modenese
during the revolutionary excitement, which agitated this
part of Italy several years since, and which is now
alluded
to with a significant shrug, as
l'affare di trent`uno
, and
the sufferings consequent upon its failure, are such also
as to elicit the hearty sympathy of every true friend of
liberal
principles. The Grand Duke, when compelled to fly
under the escort of the single battalion of his troops, who
mained faithful to him, assured one of his old domestics,
who expressed much commiseration on the occasion, that
in three days he would return and quell the little
disturbance
.
For more than a month, however, the capital
remained
in the possession of the people, who displayed
during this exciting epoch, a singular respect for
individual
rights, and maintained a degree of order and good
faith, worthy of a more fortunate issue. Even the priests
assumed the tri-coloured cockade; and among the armed
citizens were many of the sturdy peasants from the
neighboring
hills. And when the fugitive prince returned from
Vienna, at the head of fifteen thousand Austrian troops, a
large body of the national guard displayed the most
commendable
bravery in defending those of the revolutionists
who were compelled to flee, conducting them in safety,
and not without several severe skirmishes, to Ancona,
whence they embarked for different ports in the
Mediterranean
and Adriatic. A series of executions,
imprisonments
and confiscations followed, and the traveller
continually
meets with the unhappy effects of this impotent
attempt to establish liberty, in the number of
impoverished
individuals, the restricted privileges of all classes, and
the increased rigor of the police. The manner in which
the plot was discovered was rather curious. One of the
conspirators was arrested on suspicion of theft, and
thinking
all was known, spoke so freely of the plan and
persons
pledged to its support, that every important detail
was soon revealed.
After this abortive revolution, no political event has
agitated the north of Italy, until the unexpected
occupation
of Ancona by the French. An occurrence which
recently took place there was the occasion of much
merriment
.
It appears that among the French officers, was
one who prided himself greatly upon his skill with the
broad-sword. In order to give scope to this talent, he
had deliberately bullied nearly all his colleagues, besides
a large number of Italian gentlemen into quarrels, and
having invariably come off triumphant, his arrogance was
proportionably increased. At length weary of the
peaceable
life he led and impatient for a new victim, he entered
the principal caff in Ancona, one evening when it was
fully occupied, and for want of a better subject, fixed his
regard upon an athletic and handsome priest who was
quietly reading at a table. Monsieur took a seat by his
side. The priest soon after called for a cup of coffee,
which the officer immediately took possession of. The
latter not doubting it was done through inadvertance,
renewed
the order; the Frenchman eagerly grasped the
second
cup also. Without losing his patience in the least,
the priest for the third time repeated his demand, and
again his tormentor unceremoniously appropriated the
beverage to himself. By this time, the singular behavior
of the duellist, had attracted the attention of every one
present; and the priest in an elevated but calm tone,
turning
to his tormentor, exclaimed, How unworthy a man
of true courage, to insult one whose profession forbids
resentment
!
The officer started to his feet in a rage
Priest, or no priest, said he, you have called me a
coward and I demand satisfaction. The priest had now
also risen and folding his robes about him, with
dignified
coolness he addressed his adversary. Sir, you
shall be satisfied. I believe among those of your
profession
,
it is customary for the challenged party, to choose
the place, time, and weapon. Accordingly, sir, let the
place be
here
, the time
now
, and the weapon
this
, and
with a single blow he hurled him upon the floor in the
centre of the room. The crest-fallen bully was glad to
make his escape, amid the jeers of the company.
A few plain tomb-stones, in an enclosure just before
reaching one of the gates, indicate the Hebrew burying
ground. The sight of these isolated graves but too
truly
illustrates the relentless persecution which still follows
the Jews in Italya spirit which was manifested with no
little severity by the reinstated Duke of Modena. It
having
been ascertained that four of the fraternity had taken
an humble part in the popular movement, a fine of six
hundred
thousand francs was levied on the whole sect, and
their number being very small in the Modenese territory,
the payment of the tribute reduced a large portion of the
Israelites to absolute beggary. A still more affecting
instance
of the penalties inflicted upon the liberals of
Modena
,
came under my observation. In the carriage which
conveyed me from the little duchy, was a lady of middle
age, the expression of whose countenance was so
indicative
of recent affliction, as to awaken immediate sympathy.
I remarked, too, that peculiar manner which evinces
superiority
to suffering, or rather a determination to meet
opposing
circumstances with decision of character and
moral
courage. No one who has ever had occasion to
notice
the uprising of a woman's spirit, after the first burst
of passionate sorrow over the mysterious destiny, so truly
described by one of the sweetest of female poets
`to make idols and to find them clay,'
can ever mistake the manner to which I allude. It is
evident
in the calm attention with which the routine of life's
duties are fulfilled, as if they no longer interested the
feelings
,
but were simply dictated by necessity. It is seen in
the long reveries which occupy the intervals of active
engagements
;
and it is to be read at a glance in the
tranquil
tone, the changeless expression, and the mild
composure
which touch with something of sanctity, the person
of one whose existence is bereft of its chief attraction. I
was soon persuaded that such was the case, with the lady
who sat beside me in the Modenese
voiture
. She
answered
my questions with that ready affability which
belongs
to the better class of Italians, and with the quick
intelligence
of a cultivated mind. For some time our
conversation
was of a general nature, until I learned that the
object of her journey was to remove a son from college,
who, for some years, had been pursuing his studies in
Tuscany This led us to speak of educationof its
momentuous
importance, and of its neglect in Italy. I
remarked
that it seemed to me that the prevailing corruption
of manners was attributable chiefly to the want of good
domestic culture; that the homes of the land were not the
sanctuaries for the mind and affections they should be,
because
expediency alone was the basis of most of the
connections
.
Signor, she replied, you speak truly, and
when, alas, there are those who have the independence
and the feeling to disregard the dominant system, and
create one of the sacred homes which you say grace your
native land, death soon severs the ties which were too
blessed to continue. Tears filled her eyes, and it was
long before she recovered her equanimity sufficiently again
to engage in conversation. I subsequently learned that
this lady was the widow of a distinguished scientific
professor
of Modena, who had ardently sympathised in the
vain attempt of his countrymen to enfranchise themselves
from the trammels of despotism. In consequence of his
prominence as a man of letters, it became necessary for
him on the unsuccessful termination of the struggle, to
leave the state. He accordingly fled to Corsica, where
he soon received from the Grand Duke of Tuscany, an
invitation to visit Florence, and the offer of a valuable
professorship. When this became known to the
Modenese
government, he was informed that if he did not
return
to his native state, his property would be confiscated;
while it was well known that on his re-appearance within
the precincts of the duchy, his head would pay the forfeit
of his attachment to freedom. He was, therefore, soon
joined by his family, and long continued to perform his
duties with distinguished success at Florence. By a
species
of compromise, his wife enjoys a limited portion of
her just income, by residing most of the year upon her
estates
,
the remainder going to increase the ducal treasury.
The husband had died a short time previous, and his
widow was then returning from one of her annual
sojourns
13
amid the scenes of her former happiness, a
requisition
to which parental love led her to submit, in order to
preserve the already invaded rights of her fatherless
children
.
The general policy of the Duke of Modena accords
with this spirit of petty tyranny. He is now carrying
into
execution many costly projects, some of which, indeed,
tend to embellish the city; but the means to defray them
are provided by taxes as contrary to the spirit of social
advancement
,
as they are onerous and unwise. It is
sufficient
to mention the tribute exacted from all foreign
artists
,
who execute works at the quarries of Carrara, a
measure
utterly unworthy an enlightened European ruler in
the nineteenth century. The countenance of this prince
struck me as altogether accordant with his character; and
the manifest servility of the vocalists at the court opera,
was something new and striking even in Italy. It was
not a little annoying, too, to hear in that splendid
spartito
of the Puritani
Suoni la tromba, e intrepido
Io pugnerai da forte;
Bello  affrontar la morte
Gridando libert
which thrills like the spirit of freedom, through the very
heart, the word loyalty substituted for liberty.
The ducal palace of Modena is truly magnificent.
Unfortunately
the grand saloon has proved unfit for the
festive
scenes it was designed to witness, from the
powerful
echo produced by its lofty and vaulted ceiling. Music,
and even the voice when slightly elevated, awakens such
a response as to create anything but an harmonious
impression
.
The walls of the splendid range of apartments,
of which this elegant hall constitutes the centre, are
adorned with beautiful frescos, and lined with the richest
paintings. Among the latter, is a fine crucifixion by
Guido, and the death of Abel by one of his most
promising
pupils. I examined this picture with interest when
informed that the author died very young. The meek
beauty of Abel's face, bowed down beneath the iron hold
of the first murderer, whose rude grasp is fiercely fixed
upon his golden hair, while the hand of the victim is laid
deprecatingly upon his brother's breast, abounds in that
expressive contrast which is so prolific a source of true
effect in art, and literature and life. The pleasing
impression
derived from dwelling upon the numerous
interesting
paintings here collected, is somewhat rudely
dispelled
when one emerges from the palace into the square,
and sees the soldiers parading before the gate, and
artillery
planted in the piazza, and turns his thoughts from the
ennobling emblems of genius, to the well appointed
machinery
of despostism.
In a chamber of the ancient tower, is preserved the old
wooden bucket which is said to have been the occasion of
a war between Bolgna and Modena. It is suspended
by its original chain from the centre of the wall, and is
regarded as a curious and valuable relic, having been
immortalized
by Tassoni in his celebrated poem La Secchia
Rapita. My memory, however, was busy with another
trophy memorialized in modern poetry. I remember
hearing a gentleman who had won some enviable laurels
in the field of letters, declare that the most gratifying
tribute he ever received, was the unaffected admiration
with which a country lass regarded him in a stage-coach,
after discovering that he was the author of a few verses
which had found their way into the reader used in the
public school she attended. This class book was the first
work which had unveiled to the ardent mind of the
maiden
,
the sweet mysteries of poetry, and this particular
piece had early fascinated her imagination, and been
transferred to her memory. In expressing her feelings
to the poet, she assured him that it had never occurred to
her that the author of these familiar lines was alive, far less
that he was so like other men, and, least of all, that she
should ever behold and talk with him. It seemed to her
a very strange, as it certainly was a delightful coincidence.
And such is the universal force of early associations, that
we all more or less share the feelings of this unsophisticated
girl; and in a country where education is pursued on a
system
which is prevalent with us, many minds derive
impressions
from school-book literature, which even the more
ripened taste and altered views of later life, cannot efface
Often have I thus read with delight one of the prettiest
sketches in Roger's Italy
If ever you should come to Modena,
Stop at the palace near the Reggio gate,
Dwelt in of old by one of the Orsini;
The noble garden terrace above terrce,
And rich in fountains, statues, cypresses,
Will long detain you, but before you go,
Enter the houseforget it not I pray,
And look a while upon a picture there.
'Tis of a lady in her earliest youth, &c.
Little did I think in the careless season of boyhood,
that the opportunity would ever be afforded me of
following
the poet's advice. Yet here I found myself in
Modena
,
and it seemed to me like an outrage upon better
feeling, as well as good taste, not to adopt the pleasant
counsel that rang in my ears, as if the kind-hearted
banker
poet inclined his white locks and whispered it himself.
I lost no time, therefore, in inquiring for this interesting
picture, but in vain. By one of the thousand vicissitudes
which are ever changing the relics of Italy to the eye of
the traveller, Ginevra's portrait had been removed from
its original position. The oldest cicerone in the place
assured me that he had ineffectually endeavored to trace
it. It was evidently a sore subject with him. `Many
an English traveller, signor,' said he, `has asked me
about this picture, and again and again have I labored to
discover it. It fell into the hands of a dealer in such
things, who does not remember how he disposed of it.'
So I was obliged to rest content with the legend, and
imagine the countenance of her whose strangely
melancholy
fate so awed the fancy of my childhood.
13*
A JOURNEY.
'Tis to join in one sensation
Business both and contemplation;
Active without toil or stress,
Passive without listlessness.
Leigh Hunt
.
Female
beauty and fine weather are, by no means,
every-day
blessings in Italy; but, when there encountered,
possess a magical perfection, which at once explains and
justifies all the eulogiums bestowed upon the land. And
it is the conjunction of these two attractions, which, at
some happy hour, imparts a charmed life and interest to
the traveller's experience. One of the last of these
fortunate
occasions I enjoyed, while traversing that beautiful
new road, that now extends the whole distance from Pisa
to Genoa, sometimes intersecting a fine range of the
Appenines
,
and at frequent intervals, following the shores of
the Mediterranean. It was a cloudless and balmy day.
Around us were the mountains, and the sea far away to
the left, visible from every summit, when halting at a
post-house
by the road-side, a melody suddenly struck our ears
attuned, as it were, to the very spirit of the scene.
Music
is a great relief to the soul, when filled with the
inspiration
of Nature; it is the natural language of sentiment,
and if at such times, its breathings unexpectedly greet us,
they are doubly grateful. The sweet strain which we
lingered
long to enjoy, proceeded from two peasant girls,
who were standing just within the threshold of a
neighboring
dwelling, accompanying themselves with a guitar.
They were gaily arrayed and decked with flowers. I
have seldom seen more perfect specimens of rustic beauty.
The face of the eldest, indeed, possessed a noble grace
which would have adorned a court. Her features were
perfectly regular, and seconded her music by the most
varying expression. Sometimes one voice rose in a clear,
joyous note, and then both mingled in a quick, chanting
measure. At length they ceased and smilingly sauntered
up the highway. We inquired the meaning of this
concert
,
and were told that these lovely girls were celebrating
the return of May, according to a custom in that region.
The vocalists are generally selected for their beauty and fine
voices, and pass many days, early in the month, going
from house to house, to pour forth their hymns. In such
usages there is refreshment. They prove that the poetic
element has not died out. How true to our better nature
is this going forth of the young and fair to welcome with
grateful songs, the advent of spring!
On this route I fell in with an unusual number of the
old soldiers of Napoleon. I have often been struck with
the enthusiasm, with which many of the Italians allude
to his genius and fate. A priest once hearing me
venture
some observations respecting him, which in his
view, were not quite orthodox, drew me aside, and with
the utmost solemnity, assured me it was very sacrilegious
to speak so confidently of one who had been
commissioned
by Heaven to consolidate Europe, to destroy the
tyrants
of Italy, and unite in a happy and prosperous whole
her divided and oppressed statesobjects, he added,
which would have been admirably accomplished, if Satan
had not tempted Buonaparte into Russia. A Genoese
captain, who had made several voyages to the East, told
me that his ship touched at St. Helena, the very day
Napoleon
died. He was surprised not to hear the usual gun,
and after waiting several hours without receiving the
customary
visit of inspection, went on shore, and when on
returning, he communicated the tidings, every sailor wept!
In Romagna, I travelled several days, in the wake of a
voiture containing a remarkably agreeable party; and we
invariably dined together on the road. During the
evening
,
there was always considerable pleasant conversation,
but one old gentleman, who was exceedingly affable to
every one else, treated me with the most marked reserve.
I puzzled myself, in vain, to account for his conduct,
when on the last evening we were together, he happened
to become engaged in a controversy with one of the
company
in regard to some law or custom of England.
After
a warm discussion, he appealed to me in support of
his assertions. I was obliged to confess my utter
ignorance
of the matter. He regarded me with the utmost
surprise, and observed that he could not understand how
an Englishman could be unacquainted with the subject.
I assured him I had no claims to the title. He
seemed
very incredulous and begged to know of what country
I was. The mention of America, seemed to awaken as
lively emotions in his heart as in that of orator Phillips.
His expression wholly changed. Throwing back his
cloak and deliberately rising from his chair, he
approached
me with an air of the greatest earnestness: Sir, he
exclaimed, forgive me. I have taken you for an
Englishman
,
and have never been able to endure one of that
nation, since its dastardly conduct towards Napoleon,
under
whom I served many years. An American! ah! that
is very different. In my garden at Parma, I have placed
two busts, which I daily contemplate with perfect
admiration
,Michael
Angelo, and George Washington; so
saying, he embraced me most cordially, and during the
remainder
of our journey, atoned for his previous silence,
by the most devoted courtesy.
At about noon we reached Massa. This is one of the
most picturesque of the minor Italian towns. It is
nearly
surrounded with high mountains, covered thickly with
olive-trees. Below lies a pretty vale whose wild fertility
is increased by a swift stream coursing through it. On
the hill above is an old fortress, and on the shelves of the
mountain a cluster of houses. An inscription garlanded
with weeds, on the gates, indicates its Roman origin.
The principal street is completely grass-grown, and as I
wandered there at noon-tide, looking up at the immense
government-house
,
so out of proportion to the town, the echo
of my footsteps was startling, and no human being
appeared
,
except here and there, an ancient figure whose white
locks, and worn visage harmonized perfectly with the
antique and deserted aspect of every thing around.
Yet nature smiles benignantly upon this secluded spot.
Several rich little gardens and many clusters of orange
trees, which here bloom all the year, gave evidence of the
peculiar mildness of the air. Completely sheltered by
the hills, admirably exposed to the sun, and visited by the
breeze from the Mediterranean, of which it commands a
beautiful view, one can scarcely imagine a more genial
retirement or a scene better adapted for romance,
especially
as the inn-keeper's daughters have long been
justly
celebrated for their beauty. The possession of Massa
was often warmly contested by the Pisans, Lucchese,
Florentines, Genoese, and innumerable princes and
bishops. Its castle has been repeatedly besieged. At
the present day, quietude and age brood with something of
sanctity over the picturesque town; and it reposes in the
midst of beauty so serene, that, on a fine summer day,
the heart of the returning traveller is beguiled by an
unwonted
spell, to linger and muse there over his past
enjoyments
or future prospects, in view of that element
which is soon to bear him, perhaps forever, from the
time-hallowed and tranquil precincts of the old world.
Carrara, which place we reached early in the
afternoon
,
is also begirt and overshadowed by the Appenine.
Some of the peaks seemed as bleak and snow-clad as
many of the Swiss mountains. In the heavy sides are
embedded the apparently inexhaustible quarries of
celebrated
marble, generally lying in alternate masses of black
and white. It is astonishing to observe how little the
inventions
of modern science have as yet been applied to
the working of these quarries. Serious accidents are of
frequent occurrence from the fall of rocks, and the road
down which they are transported is choked up and rugged
in the extreme. The loss of time and damage to the
material in consequence, may be easily imagined. The
people of Carrara live by their labors, variously directed,
in quarrying, sawing and removing the marble, and there
are many studios in the town where the rough work of
the sculptor is performed, and copies of celebrated statues
executed for sale. As I descended from the quarries, and
looked around upon the scattered fragments of marble,
there was something most interesting and impressive in
the thought that from this spot have proceeded the
material
of those countless creations of the chisel now
scattered
over the globe. How triumphant is the activity of
the human mind! how productive the energies of art!
From the rocky sides of these rugged hills, what shapes
of beauty and grace have arisen!the forms of heroes
and sages centuries since blended with the dust, the faces
of the loved whose mortal lineaments will be seen no
more, and creatures of imaginative birth radiant with
more than human loveliness. Donatello, Michael Angelo,
Canova, Thorwaldsen, Bartolini, and innumerable other
gifted names rush upon the heart and associate the
mountains
of Carrara with noble and lovely forms. We gaze
with reverence upon a spot which fancy peoples with an
unborn generation of the children of genius. A halo of
glory environs the hill-sides whence have gone forth so
many enduring symbols of the beautiful and the grand.
On reaching Sarzana, at night, it was rather difficult to
realize upon refering to the signatures on my passport,
that during the day's ride of less than forty miles, I had
passed through the territories of five Dukesa striking
evidence of the divided state of Italy. At dawn, the
following
day, we crossed the Maga in a broad, flat
ferry-boat
,
and as the grey light fell upon a time-tinted village
on an adjacent hill, the scene would have furnished a
pretty subject for a landscape, including the dingy stream
and motley cargo of quaintly-attired travellers,
weather-worn
peasants and white cattle. On landing, a carriage
passed us under the escort of four
gen d'armes
on horse
back, conducting an unfortunate party to the frontiers,
who had been discovered travelling without a passport. The
scenery grew more rich and variegated until in
descending
a hill, we came at once in view of the beautiful gulf
of Spezia. Upon its finely-cultivated borders, are several
low, massive and ancient forts. Not far from the shore
a spring of fresh water gushes up through the sea. In
the midst of the calm, blue bay, several fishing vessels lay
at anchor, distinctly reflected on the water. Along the
beach were sauntering dark-visaged men with long red
caps, and many sunburnt and savage-looking women,
with curions little straw hats, placed coquettishly upon the
side of their heads. Everywhere is the sea sublime, its
breezes invigorating its music plaintive; but when it flows
thus clear and broad to the shores of a southern land, there
is an unspeakable charm in its presence. The waves
seem to roll with conscious joy to the warm strand, and
throw up a shower of sparkling tears as they retreat, and
the cool, briny air steals over the fertile and sultry plains
like Valor bracing Love.
Here some of the happiest months of Shelley's life were
spent. He loved to go forth in his boat alone upon this
bay and commune with himself in the moonlight. Here
he enjoyed during the last year of his existence, the
society
of a few cherished associates, and here his wife and
friends vainly awaited, in agonizing suspense, his return
from that fatal expedition to Pisa whither he had gone to
welcome Hunt to Italy.
It was between the Arno and Serchio that Shelley's
boat went down, and on the shore near Via Reggio, that
his body was burned under the auspices of Lord Byron.
`A restless impulse urged him to embark
And meet lone Death on the drear ocean-waste;
For well he knew that mighty shadow love
The shining caverns of the populous deep.'
[2]
[2]
Alastor.
How appropriate to the beach of Spezia are his
touching
lines, written near Naples:
`I see the deep's untrampled floor
With green and purple sea-weed strown:
I see the waves upon the shore
Like light dissolved in star-showers thrown:
I sit upon the sands alone,
The lightning of the noontide ocean
Is flashing round me, and a tone
Arises from its measured motion,
How sweet did any heart now share in my emotion.'
14
GENOA.
The ocean-wave thy wealth reflected.
Rogers
.
`
The
beauty of an Italian sunset has
not
been
exaggerated
either by the pencil of Claude, or the pen of the
poets
,'
I musingly affirmed, while loitering down a long
curving
declivity, in the twilight of a warm summer evening.
The farthest range of hills my eager vision could descry,
were bathed in a rich purple, occasionally verging to a dark
blue tint, the adjacent sea glowed with saffron hues, while
the horizon wore the aspect of molten gold, fading
toward
the zenith, to a pale amber. The pensive whistle of
the
vetturino
came softened by the distance to my ear.
Before
me was the far-stretching road, and around the still
and lonely hills. A few hours previous, we had left the
little town of Borghetti, and on the ensuing day,
anticipated
repose within the precincts of that city, which enriched
with the spoils of a splendid commerce and brilliant
maritime
adventure, so long boasted the title of
superb;
that
city whose neighborhood gave birth to Columbus, and
who prides herself, in these more degenerate times, in
having produced the prince of fiddlers. The wide
sweeping
chain of the Appenines we had traversed, is covered
with rough bushes, the most meagre vegetation, and so
rock-ribbed as to have rendered the construction of the
road an enterprise of extreme difficulty. For a long
distance
there is no sign of life, but the venerable looking
goats clambering about in search of subsistence, and the
children that tend them, whose air and faces are painfully
significant of premature responsibility. Sometimes we
came in sight of the sea, calm as crystal, and dotted with
a few distant sails. It was easy to realize the bleak
and dangerous ride to which the traveller is here exposed
in winter. But the succeeding morning displayed a new
and richer vegetation. Aloes and fig-trees, remind one
of Sicily, a resemblance which the vicinity of the
Mediterranean
enhances. The first part of the day's ride, lies
along the margin of the water, and afterwards chiefly over
verdant hills, which often slope down to the shore. The
gulf of Sesto, as you withdraw from it, appears singularly
graceful. Its beach has a most symmetrical curve. So
placid was the water, that the town of St. Margueritto, seen
from above, was perfectly reflected as in a mirror, and the
picture resembled a miniature Venice. The scenery
throughout the ride, is remarkably variegated; and the
garniture of the country sufficiently blended between
vegetable
gardens, olive and fig orchards, and wild trees to
render it pleasingly various. Several grottoes are
passed
which are plastered over interiorly, in order to prevent
the springs from dripping; but the lover of the
picturesque
,
cannot but wish they had been left rough-hewn
like those of the Simplon. From the last of these,
Genoa
is seen far below on the borders of the sea. The
view is not comparable with that on approaching it by
water
.
It gives no idea of majesty. Clusters of lemon and
orange line the remainder of the way, as well as
innumerable
villas admirably exposed to the sea-breeze, but as
usual, lacking the vicinity of treesa charm which rural
taste can scarcely consent to yield, even though the
deficiency
is supplied by inviting verandahs.
There are decided maritime features, even upon first
entering Genoa. The mixed throng, the sun-burnt faces,
the garb and even the manners of the lower order,
immediately
bespeak a sea-port. From the extreme narrowness
of the streets, much of the actual beauty and richness of
the city is hid from the gaze. Even the numerous
palaces
do not at first strike the stranger, situated as they
frequently
are, in thoroughfares so confined as to afford no
complete view of their faades. Many a pretty garden
and cool arbor is placed upon a roof so lofty, or a terrace
so secluded, as to be wholly concealed from observation,
yet affording retired and delightful retreats, overlooking
the bay, and no less attractive to the meditative recluse
or the secret lovers, from being far above the crowd and
out of sight of the curious,the country in the very
heart of the city, a garden independent of territory! Many
of the peculiarities of Genoa, are fast losing themselves
in modern improvements. The streets are widening
every
year, and carriages, once quite unknown, are coming
daily in vogue. There is something here congenial with
the alleged sinister tastes of the Italians. The finest
caff
is in an obscure street. One is continually
stumbling
upon luxurious arrangements, and agreeable nooks,
where he least expects them; and the narrow lanes, the
hue of the marble, and the marine odors bring constantly
to mind the rival republic of the Adriatic. The churches
are far more rich in frescos and marble, than any other
work of art. In that of the Scuola Pia, however, there
are some exquisite basso-relievos by a Genoese. In one
of them the face of Mary is very sweet and graceful. The
palaces are the chief attraction of Genoa. In one we
admire
the profusion of gold and mirrors, with which the
lofty saloons are decorated; in another the magnificent
stair-case; here the splendid tints of the marble floor, and
there the fine old family portraits. These noble and
princely dwellings, eloquently speak to the stranger of the
wealth, luxury and taste, which once prevailed here; nor
judging by one example, should I imagine that their
empire
had ceased. Having occasion to seek an old baron
well known for his liberal taste, after roaming over his
immense garden, till weary of peeping into arbors and
temples, I found him in a cool grotto at breakfast with a
party of artists. His beautiful domain was once an
ancient
fortress. All the earth was transported thither, and
he has spared no pains to make it a paradise. On every
pretty knoll he has placed a bower or statue. Busts of
departed sages are reared beside murmuring fountains.
One little building is appropriated to his library; another
to scientific apparatus. One terrace rises above another,
bedecked with rose bushes and fragrant shrubs. From
this point you behold a beautiful vista, and from that look
down upon the public walk, around upon the city, or far
away on the wide blue sea. I would not recommend an
14*
asthmatic person to live in Genoa. There is too much
climbing necessary in perambulating the streets. The
women are often pretty and have in general a Spanish look.
Formerly they universally wore the long and graceful white
muslin veil flowing backward as the Milanese did the
black. Many have now adopted the more artificial style
of French costume. The
facchini
are uncommonly
impertinent
,
and the people for the most part, very saving
and quiet, rather proud and generally industrious.
Genoa
now exports little but silk or velvet, although she
continues to furnish the best mariners in the
Mediterranean
.
The Sardinian flag is often seen in the Brazils, and
West Indies, though rarely in the East.
Among the by-way oddities of the place are the
numerous
parrots and little naval officers arrayed in the
costume
of adults, although sometimes only nine years old.
In the street of the jewellers, there is a very pretty
Madona
about two centuries old, the painter of which was
killed
by his master from jealousy. The jewellers have
been offered large sums for this picture, but, considering
it as their guardian saint, they will not part with it
on any terms. In one of the thoroughfares a tablet
perpetuates the infamy of two traitors; and at
another
angle, as if to atone for the shameful record, an
inscription upon an ancient palace, sets forth that it
was the gift of Genoa to the brave Admiral Doria,
in acknowledgement of his courage and patriotism.
Opposite to this interesting monument is the church
where the bones of the gallant hero are said to repose.
BOLOGNA.
What solemn spirit doth inhabit here,
What sacred oracle hath here a home?
Galt
.
Italy
is a land of contrasts. Its various cities are not
only characterized by diversity in the schools of painting
and architecture; but the natural scenery, the climate and
the dialect and manners of the people are, alone, sufficient
strongly to identify the different towns. It is not a
little surprising in the view of one habituated to the
facilities
of communication existing in England and the United
States, to witness such striking contrasts between places
separated by a space of only one or two hundred miles;
and it is to be explained only by recurring to the original
distinctions of the different republics, and to the absence
of those motives for frequent intercourse which operate so
powerfully to equalise and assimilate commercial districts.
This contrariety is nowhere more observable than between
Florence and Bologna. We leave a city seated in the
midst of hills, over whose broad slopes, dotted with
gnarled, grey olive trees, are scattered innumerable villas;
where our eyes have grown familiar with the airy
architecture
of the bridges, the massive dome of the cathedral,
and the graceful lightness of the
campanile;
where
flower-girls
,
loitering pedestrians, and gay equipages give life
and variety to the scene, in spite of the gloomy style of
the palaces, and the unfinished faades of the churches.
A few hours are passed in winding amid the Appenines,
and we walk the streets of a capital, where long lines of
porticos shade the thoroughfares, were a half-barbarous
accent destroys the sweetness of the language, and a
certain
moroseness marks the manners of the people. There
is certainly a kind of natural language in cities as well as
in individuals, an inexplicable influence, which produces
a spontaneous impression upon our minds. Otherwise,
why is it that so many continental sojourners feel
perfectly
at home in the Tuscan metropolis, and quite out of
their element in many other cities of Italy, boasting more
interesting society, and a more agreeable round of
amusements
?
In the passage of the Appenines, a lover of
mountain scenery will not be without the means of
enjoyment
.
The picturesque defiles and wild ranges, the
barren peaks and fertile slopes, the pebly dells and broad
undulations, though on a comparatively small scale as
regards
grandeur, are yet sufficiently pleasing to yield that
sweet charm to the imagination which such scenery is
fitted
to inspire. The only remarkable object of natural
curiosity encountered in the route is a species of volcano.
It was a beautiful evening when we left the miserable village
where we were to lodge, and sought this singular spot.
We were in the very midst of the Appenines. The air
was cool and bracing, and over the western horizon,
lingered
the rich, rosy glow that succeeds a fine sunset, as if
the portals of heaven were half-opened to the longing
gaze. Along the rocky path above us, several peasant
girls were carrying vases of water on their heads from a
favorite spring, singing as they went, and their clear
voices came with a kind of wild melody to our ears. The
whole scene was calculated to convey that soothing idea
of the repose of pastoral life, which, at intervals, fascinates
even those least inclined to solitude. We found the
object
of our search in the midst of a stony soil. Flames,
evidently of ignited gas, issued from the ground in a
circle
of about ten feet in diameter. About the centre, the
largest flame was red, and burned steadily; but the others
were of a pale violet color and quivered incessantly,
seeming
to creep along the ground as the night breeze swept
over them. In truth the appearance of the fire was
precisely
that which we might imagine of the magic circle
of some ancient sorcerer; and the dreary loneliness of the
spot seemed finely adapted to the idea. The flames burn
more brightly after a rain, but no one in the neighborhood,
recollects any particular change in the volcano. It has
never been known to disgorge sulphurous matter, or
exhibit
any different phenomena than at present; but ever
burns with a constant and apparently inextinguishable
fire.
Porticos line all the principal streets of Bologna; and
however convenient their shelter may prove to a
pedestrian
on a rainy day, it requires no little time for the
stranger to become reconciled to the sombre impression
they prodace. The most extensive line of these arches
is that which leads from the city to the Church of St.
Luke, a distance of three miles. The promenade on a
fine day, displays at every turn, beautiful views of the
surrounding
plains; and the elevated position of the temple
of the patron saint of the Bolognese, approached by such
a noble range of porticos, strikes the traveller as a well
conceived
idea. The passion for this style of building has
extended to many of the adjacent towns, and the three
first tiers of the spacious threatre of Bologna present the
same favorite form. The gloomy aspect of this species
of street architecture, is enhanced by the solitude that
prevails in many parts of this extensive town;and late
in the evening, when the lamps shed a dazzling light at
intervals through the long and silent vistas of the less
frequented
ways, a scenic effect is produced favorable to
romantic
impressions. I remember being struck, upon
entering
the city after night-fall by one of its most solitary
gates, with the picture formed by a decrepid and withered
old woman, seated at the foot of one of the pillars of a
dark portico, roasting chesnuts. The lurid glare of her
charcoal fire shot up, in fitful flashes to the top of the
arch, bringing her haggard features into strong relief,
while all around was involved in deep shade.
Perhaps the most impressive of the traveller's
experience
in this unprepossessing city, is the view from the
summit of the old leaning tower in the piazza, and two
or three of the faces depicted on the inspired canvass of
the old masters in the academy. The eye of Raphael's
St. Cecilia, the expression of some of the figures in the
celebrated Massacre of the Innocents, and especially the
upturned and beaming look of Guido's Magdalen
crouched
at the foot of the cross, haunt the imagination long
after the eye has ceased to behold them. Sir Joshua
Reynolds always urged his scholars to make a long
sojourn
at Bologna. The most annoying feature in the
present aspect of this city, is the presence of the Austrian
troops, sputtering their gutturals in the
caffs
, parading
beneath the arcades, and drawn up in files in the saloon
of the theatre. Everywhere one encounters the
insignia
of military despotism, and, perhaps, to a liberal mind
the most painful associations are derived from the
appearance
of some of the fine-looking Swiss officerssons
of the mountains and recipients of nobler political
influences
than their fellows, and yet content to be the
hireling
oppressors of a foreign soil.
One of the richest palaces in Bologna, belongs to
Bacciochi
,
who espoused the sister of Napoleon, and there
is scarcely one of its splendid apartments unadorned with
some memorial of his person or life. Here is a portrait
exhibiting the free and fresh expression of irresponsible
youth; there the same brow appears shaded by a military
cap or glittering coronet; here that extraordinary
countenance
is exquisitely delineated upon a small surface of
ivory, and there elaborately carved in the centre of a
pietra
dura
table. In the centre of a richly-curtained cabinet
is his bust by Canova; over the fire-place of a
silken-hung
bed room, is his head encircled by rays; and on
the damask walls of the magnificent saloon, hangs his
full length portrait, splendidly arrayed in coronation robes.
In another apartment, we behold his statue in marble,
surrounded by those of his family; and on a slab, in an
adjoining room, we gaze on the same remarkable features
fixed in the still rigidity of death, in the form of a bronze
cast taken after his decease. It is enough to temper the
eagerness of the veriest enthusiast in pursuit of glory, to
wander through this quiet, lofty and elegantly decorated
palace
,
and as his eye rests upon these memorials, call to mind
successively the most wonderful epochs of Napoleon's life.
He seems almost to move before us, as the drama of his
memorable career is acted rapidly out in the imagination.
We remember his early achievements, his startling
victories
,
his suddenly acquired empire, the grandeur of his
projects, the immense sacrifice attending their fulfilment,
and, at length, the waning of his proud starhis fall, exile,
and death. How brief a period has sufficed to transfer
the deeds of Europe's modern conqueror to the calm
sphere of history, and enthrone his terrible name amid
the undreaded though solemn past!
Enterprise and genuis in most of the departments of
human effort meet with so little pecuniary encouragement
in Italy, that they almost invariably excite sympathy for
the ill-rewarded toil of the votary. An exception to this
rule I witnessed in Bologna, in the person of Rossini,
the composer, whose operas continue to yield him a
handsome
income. But a case more in accordance with the
prevailing spirit, is that of a Bolognese physician, who,
for several years, was attached to the military service in
Greece and Egypt. While in Nubia, at great expense,
and with incredible fatigue and danger, he succeeded in
excavating a pyramid, and bringing away the contents of
a sarcophagus which he discovered within. According to
the opinion of the most esteemed archeologists whom he
has consulted, this pyramid was erected seven hundred
years before the Christian era, by King Tahraka. The
collection consists chiefly of ornaments of the finest gold
rings, bracelets, and neck-laces, upon which are wrought
the various devices and emblems of Egyptian lore. Many
of these are exceedingly curious, and different from those
previously known. But the most singular circumstance
attending this excavation is, that among the articles
disinterred is a cameo, representing a head of Minerva,
executed in a style altogether beyond the epoch in the
history of art, from which the other objects evidently date.
In fact, there are obvious indications that the stone is of
Grecian workmanship. The only satisfactory solution
which has been given to this problem, is that the pyramid
although commenced during the reign of Tahraka, was
not completed until after an interval of three hundred
yearsa supposition which is confirmed by the difference
observable in the angle and quality of the stones. This
valuable collection still remains upon the hands of the
enterprising excavator, although it so richly merits a place
in some public museum, for which object it would doubtless
be purchasedas the poor physician regretfully declared
if it had been his lot to be a native of England or
France, instead of impoverished Italy.
One of the most remarkable of Catholic fertivals
called the Day of the Deadoccurred on the loveliest day
15
of my brief sojourn in Bologna. Nature breathed any
language rather than that of mortality and decay. The
road leading to the celebrated Campo Santo was thronged
with people walking beneath the glad sky, in holiday
attire; and there would have been one universal semblance
of gaiety, but for the moaning tones and wretched
appearance
of the beggars that lined the way. The numerous
arcades of the extensive burying place resounded with the
hum, bustle, and exclamations of a careless crowd, who
moved about like the multitude at a fair. But for the
countless busts of departed worthies, the numberless
inscriptions
,
and the echoes of the mass floating from one
of the open chapels, it would have been impossible to
believe, that this concourse had assembled ostensibly to
remember and honor the dead. To the view of a stranger
nothing could be more incongruous or strange than the
scene. The cypresses and cenotaphs assured him he was
in a burial place; while every moment he was jostled by
a hurrying group, and his ears saluted with peals of
discordant
laughter, the leering whisper of the courtezan, and
the stern reproof of the soldier. And yet in his answer
to the inquiries which curiosity promotes, he is told that
this day is conse crated to the departed, that this throng
have assembled to think of, and pray for them, and that
these tapers are placed by surviving friends around the
tombs of the loved and lost. There was something
jarring
to every nerve, something that mocked every hallowed
association in this rude contrast between the solemn
emblems of death, and the eager recklessness of life. I
suggested the idea of inexorable and unmitigable destiny,
rather than consoling faith. It was redolent of bitterness
and despair. It was as if men would confront the dark
doom of mortality with hollow laughter and raillery. So,
at least, the scene impressed one spectator, to whom it was
new; yet habit, or their peculiar creed, had apparently
associated it in the minds of the multitude with no such
shocking suggestions. It was affecting to notice, here and
there, a monument unilluminatedperhaps that of a
stranger, who died unhonored and unsoothed, or the
ancient
mausoleum of such who could claim kindred with
the place and the people, but whose memories inexorable
time had consigned to the dark abyss of forgetfulness.
LUCCA.
In the deep umbrage of the olive's shade.
Childe Harold
.
The
Lucchese look upon the mountains. Does not
this, in some measure, account for their love of liberty?
It may seem rather more fanciful than philosophic, but
one can scarcely perambulate, on a fine day, the
delightful
promenade, which surrounds the walls, and gaze on
the adjacent hills, without realizing, as it were, in the
tenor of his musings, something of the elevated and
inspiring
sentiment, so beautifully typified by their green
and graceful loftiness. `High mountains are a feeling;'
and were we to analyse the emotions they excite, surely
the sense of freedom would be prominent among them.
Not less in the spirit of wisdom than of poetry, should we
found a city among the hills. Let the souls of men
grow familiar with their sky-pointing summits, their blue
waving lines, the dark hugeness of their forms at
night-fall
,
and the rosy vestment thrown around them by the
morning. It was not an accidental combination that
made the Alps Tell's birth-place, or planted the home of
Hofer in the midst of the Tyrol. Originally a Roman
colony
,
Lucca, in the middle ages, was repeatedly bartered away
by successive masters, in consequence of the liberal
principles
of her inhabitants, until she succeeded while in the
possession
of Florence, in purchasing her freedom of Charles
IV, for two hundred thousand guilders. One of her first
self-created
rulers was Castruccio, a warrior pre-eminent for
consummate bravery; and, although involved in
numerous
wars, she maintained her independence till the time
of Napoleon. It was a happy circumstance for the
Lucchese
,
that the Emperor's sister who virtually governed
them, had learned from her brother Lucien while in Paris,
to love and respect the cause of Poetry and the Arts.
Elise delighted in exhibiting this new-born taste, by a
generous patronage of genius; and the traveller meets
with many affecting proofs of the attachment in which
her memory is still held by the people.
Well do the inhabitants of this little duchy, deserve the
appellative so long, by general consent, bestowed on
them, of the industrious. Fields of flax, and vegetable
patches of the most promising aspect, indicate to the
stranger his vicinity to Lucca. A rocky vein of soil and
many cliff-like hills affords genial ground for the olive,
and a certain superior quality in the fruit or peculiar care
exercised in the manufacture, renders the oil here
produced
,
preferable to that of any other district in Italy.
Within a few years, fortunes have been made by the
fabrication
of paper and silk. The hangings of the Palace,
indeed, furnish a striking proof of the degree of
excellence
15*
attained in the latter branch. This edifice is far
more rich, however, in works of art. There is a picture
by Annibal Carraci, representing the Woman taken in
Adultery. An expression of profound sorrow and
benevolence
illumes the Saviour's countenance. Hehas risen
from the stooping posture he had assumed in the presence
of the malignant accusers, and seems just to have
dismissed
the woman who, kneeling at his feet, is gazing
despairingly
upon his face. Her eyes are full of eloquent
sorrow. We can almost see the tears; but her anguish
is evidently too deep for weeping, while something like
the light of hope mingles with and beautifies her
expression
;
as if his forgiving accent had already fallen upon
ner soul. In the same apartment hangs another painting
remarkable for effective coloringChrist before Pilate,
by Gerardo delle Notti. The rays of a candle shine up
on the sharp Jewish features of the judge, and from amid
the dark shadows of the back-ground, beam forth, in calm
majesty, the serene lineaments of the accused. The
capo
d'opera
of this collection is a Holy Family by Raphael,
which some might be pardoned for esteeming above the
more celebrated one of the Pitti palace. The mother's
face is certainly more strictly Italian, and nothing can be
more sweetly eloquent than her downcast eyes meekly
bent upon the clinging child. Angelica Kaufman, who
learned painting from her father, and so speedily
surpassed
him in skill, is said to have greatly preferred ideal
female
figures, and, as her point of excellence was grace,
they were doubtless best adapted to her pencil. She
found, however, in real life, an admirable subject, in the
person of Amarilla Etrusca, an admired
improvisatrice
,
whose portrait taken at the moment of inspiration, graces
the Ducal gallery. It is a delightful and by no means a
common occurrence, in the annals of the arts, for one
gifted woman thus to celebrate another. The most
renowned
picture, however, at present existing here, is the
Assumption, by Fra Bartolomeo, in the Dominican
convent
.
A young artist from Rome, patronised by the Duke,
was my
cicerone
at Lucca, and, after viewing the palace,
we adjourned to his studio, to look over his designs.
Some of these indicate no ordinary talent. One of them
illustrates an instance of sudden vengeance recorded in
the history of Tuscany. Cosmo de Medici, as the story
runs, having discovered an intrigue between his wife and
a page, sent for a priest and executioner, and when all
was ready, called her into the apartment, made known
his discovery, and giving a signal, the favorite was
murdered
before her eyes. The moment chosen, is when the
enraged husband, having displayed an intercepted letter,
is uttering the fatal word. The scene was most vividly
sketched by the young painterthe deep but diverse
emotions
of the several parties, being most strongly depicted
in their attitudes and expression.
But the period of my sojourn at Lucca, was not
altogether
favorable to a quiet and leisure survey of her
attractions
.
It was the anniversary of a triennial
festa
in
a neighboring town, and the inviting weather, and
cheerful
faces of the throng swarming the gate, were enough to
lure even a passing traveller along the road to Pescia, the
birth-place of Sismondi. The
contadini
of this and the
adjacent villages crowded the streets. The men's faces
were generally sallow, or very brown from exposure to
the sun; and those which age had stamped with furrows,
and shaded with gray locks, resemble the impressive
heads so often introduced in the pictures of the old
masters
.
The female peasants have the same sun-burnt
appearance
,
being equally accustomed to work in the fields.
They wore enormous gold and silver ornaments, often
preserving, in this form, all their superfluous earnings.
On this occasion, too, their best mantillas were in
requisition
,
of a snowy whiteness, and frequently embroidered
with no little taste. This simple, but most becoming
head dress, is in beautiful contrast with their olive
complexions
and raven hair. It is a charming pastime for a
native of the North, to thread such an assemblage of the
rustic fair of the South. Sometimes a face is
encountered
,
so bland, innocent, and passively beautiful, but for the
rich jet eyes, as to revive the sweet impressions which
poetry inspires, of what an English poet considers the
most divine coincidence in existence`a lovely woman
in a rural spot.' To give variety to the otherwise pastoral
aspect of the scene, here and there, some exquisite from
an adjacent city, loiters along, and the venders endeavor
to call attention to their stalls, by loud and various cries.
Nuts, cheap toys, and pastry, comprise their
merchandise
.
And what are the ostensible amusements of such a
concourse? What spell preserves amid such a
heterogeneous
mass, so much order and mutual courtesy? Whence
the charm that gives rise to such merry peals of laughter,
that arrays so many faces with gladness? Nature,
indeed
,
smiles upon them; but they seldom know her
frowns. Doubtless, there is much delight in the simple
dolce far niente
, much spontaneous joy in the social
excitement
of the scene, to which the Italians of every
class are peculiarly susceptible. A
festa
in Italy,
however
,
must ever be more or less of a mystery to one
wedded
to a cold philosophy. And yet I pity the man who
can roam through such a village, at such a season, and
not breathe more freely, and catch a ray of pleasure from
the light-hearted triflers around him. He may be wise;
he must be heartless.
The
festa
of Pescia was ushered in, as usual, by a
religious
ceremonial. The principal church was arrayed
in crimson and gold, and illuminated with hundreds of
tapers. Mass was performed, and, for several hours, a
choir and an orchestra made the vaulted roof resound with
sacred melody. No peasant seemed satisfied till his brow
was moistened with the holy water, and his knees had
pressed the steps of the altar. The responses once
uttered
,
and the benediction received, they hastened again
into
the open air, to chat with their fellows from the
adjoining
district, or treat some favorite maiden to an ice.
In the afternoon, they flocked into the main street, to see
a race. Three or four horses, without riders, decked out
in gilt paper, and with briars shaking at their sides, are
started from a certain point. The crowd part before them,
and shout to quicken their career. No drunkenness is
seen, and the only apparent excess, is that of harmless
buffoonery. An illumination closed the
festa
. In the
evening, every window was studded with lights, and
as they gleamed upon the throng below, the village lost
every trace of its homely and every-day aspect, and
seemed
a spot consecrated to romance. Then, all the women
appeared beautiful. The hum of conversation swelled
upon the night-breeze, Laughter echoed through the
streets. Children danced over the pavement in transport.
Old men walked slowly, smiling to their friends. Lovers
side by side, grew bold in their endearments. Jokes
were bandied freely. All deemed the hour one of those
lapses in the monotonous tide of life, when the deep of
existence ripples sportively, lulling to momentary
oblivvion
all bitter memories, and throwing nought but bright
sparkles on the sands of time. Amid the surrounding
hills, from the shadowy olive-woods, numberless lamps
twinkled in fantastic groups. On their summits, lights
were arranged in the form of crosses. The sacred
symbol
glittered thus from afar, like the vision of
Constantine
in the sky. On the churches, the lamps followed the
lines of the architect, making them appear like temples
built of stars. And above all, in the midst of the solemn
firmament, the full moon sailed in unclouded beauty, as
if to smile upon and hallow the transient reign of human
festivity.
LEAF FROM A LOG.
`Once more upon the waters!'
Childe Harold
.
Pictures
of sea-life generally present the two extremes
of truth. When drawn by the professional mariner, the
shadows are often kept wholly out of view, and when
depicted by one to whom the element itself and all the
associations of shipboard are uncongenial, we have Dr.
Johnson's summary opinion re-echoed with the
endorsement
of experience. Life at sea, as everywhere else, is
a chequered scene. Nothing can exceed the melancholy
of a cloudy day on the ocean, to the heart of one fresh
from endeared localities. The grey sky, the chilly air
and the boundless, dark mass of water rolling in sullen
gloom, fill the mind with sombre images. And when
night comes over the deep and the voyager retires to his
cabin, to muse over the friends and sweet places of the
earth left behind,the creaking of the strained timbers,
the swaying of the flickering lamp, and the gurgling of
the waves at the stern, deepen the desolate sensations
that weigh upon his heart. On the other hand,
what can give more buoyancy to the spirits than a
bright, clear day at sea, when with a fair wind and every
sail filled, the noble vessel rushes gallantly through the
water? It must be confessed, however, that there are
few occasions of more keen enjoyment than going on
shore, after a long voyage. Life seems renewed, and
old impressions become fresh when the loneliness of the
ocean is all at once exchanged for the busy haunts of
men, the narrow deck for the crowded street, the
melancholy
expanse of waves for the variegated garniture of
earth. When naught has met the eye for many weeks
but sea and sky, when the social excellencies of a party
have been too largely drawn upon to be keenly relished,
and the novelties of voyaging have become familiar, the
hour of landing is anticipated with an eagerness only to
be realized by experience.
It was with no little impatience that we awaited the
lawn after casting anchor in the bay of Gibraltar. In
his instance delay was more irksome, as our
arrangements
precluded more than a day's sojourn on the
celebrated
rock. We found the town in a state of unusual
excitement from a report which was current, of the near
approach of the troops of Don Carlos. The people of
Saint Roque, the nearest Spanish town, were flocking
into the gates, many of the poorer classes laden with
their household effects. Never, to me, were the
contrasts
between sea and land more striking. The wild
cry of the mariners had scarcely died away upon our
ears, when they were greeted with the hum of
commerce
,
and the enlivening strains of martial music. As
we proceeded, groups of Jews were seen moving towards
the synagogue, their dark robes and grey beards
blending
with the bright uniforms of the English officers who
gravely trod the crowded pavement. A swarthy peasant
with a steeple-crowned hat, was violently beating his
mules in the middle of the street, while directly under
the wall, a Spanish lady, with graceful steps, glided on
to mass. But our attention was soon completely
absorbed
in a survey of the fortifications. Many hours
were spent in clambering over the rock, now pausing to
note the picturesque aspect of a Moorish castle, and
now to admire the marvellous vegetation of a little
garden
,
planted on a narrow shelf of the fortress. Here a
luxuriant aloe threw up its blue and spear-like leaves
above the grey stone; and there, a venerable goat was
perched motionless upon a projecting cliff. We
wandered
through the extensive galleries cut in the solid rock,
one moment struck with the immense resources of
nature
,
and the next, delighted by some admirable device
of art. The light streaming the loop-holes, the large
dark cannon, and the extraordinary number and extent
of these galleries, fill the mind with a kind of awe.
At one of the most central points, we paused and gazed
down upon the bay. Our vessel seemed dwindled to the
size of a pleasure-boat. Opposite, appeared the town of
Algeciras, and immediately below, the neutral land
between
the Spanish and British territory. This is the
duelling-ground of the garrison, and near by is a cluster
16
of graves. The water was covered with foam. The
wind swept with a melancholy roar round the immense
rock. Our voices echoed through the long, vaulted
archway
.
As we clustered about the cannon, looking forth
from that dizzy height upon the extensive prospect, while
our guide rehearsed the capabilities of the position, and
pointed out the memorable points of the landscape, we
fully realized the impregnable strength of Gibraltar.
Before
dusk we were under way, and rounding the majestic
rock, soon lost sight of its scattered lights and huge form
towering through the twilight. The American Consul
bade us adieu at the pier, and the facilities he had
afforded
us during the day, led me to reflect upon the
importance
of this office abroad, and the singular neglect of our
government to its claims. Politicians, among us, are so
absorbed in temporary questions and immediate objects,
that it is difficult to attract their attention to any foreign
interest. Yet, in a patriotic point of view, there are
few subjects more worthy of the consideration of political
reformers, than our consular system. Of the utter
indifference
with which these offices are regarded, there
are many evidences. A very gentlemanly man who had
fulfilled the duties of United States Consul, at one of the
Mediterranean ports, for more than twenty years, was
waited upon one morning, by a stranger, who demanded
the seal and books of the consulate, showing a
commission
empowering him to fill the station. Common
decency, to say nothing of civility, would require that
this gentleman should have received some official notice
of his expulsion. But the most curious circumstance
in the case was, that, after a month had elapsed, the new
consul renewed his call, and stating he found the fees
inadequate to his support, destroyed his commission,
and departed. Another old incumbent, deservedly
popular
,
discovered, for the first time, through the public prints,
that his office had been abolished for more than a year.
At present, these offices are chiefly held by merchants,
whose personal interests are continually liable to conflict
with their duty as public servants. Our consuls, too,
usually depend upon fees for remuneration, and a large
part of these are paid by travellers. Those who make
several successive visits to the same city, paying, at each
departure, for the consul's signature to their passports,
cannot but feel annoyed at a tax from which other
strangers
are exempt. If salaries were instituted, proportioned
to the labor and importance of each station, and liberal
enough to secure the services of able men, the result, in
every point of view, would be excellent. Generous and
enlightened views of national intercourse, are now
rapidly
prevailing, and our country should be the first to give
them a practical influence. The French system is
progressive
,
and the consuls are, therefore, regularly
educated
for their duty. The English consuls are
accustomed
to furnish the home-department with useful statistica'
information, which is of eminent service to the merchant
manfacturer, and political economist. If these inquiries
were extended to scientific and other general subjects, it is
easy to perceive how extensively useful the consular
office
might become. If there is any country, which, in
the present condition of the world, should be worthily
represented
,
it is the United States. The extent of our
commercial relations, and the rapid increase of American
travellers require it; but the honor of a young and
prosperous
nation, and fidelity to the important principles of
freedom and popular education we profess, are still higher
reasons. Men of intelligence and observation, who shall
command the respect of their countrymen, and of the
courts to which they are sent, should be placed at these
posts of duty. Party feeling should be waived in such
appointments. They should be regarded not merely as
affording protection and facilitating intercourse, but as
involving high responsibility, and furnishing occasion for
various usefulness. Our consuls should have the
interests
of their country at heart, not only as diplomatists
but, if possible, as men of literature and science, and, at
all events, as enlightened and generous patriots.
Day after day, we proceeded constantly in view of the
Spanish coast. It was delightful, at early morning, to
trace the fine outline of the mountains, broken,
occasionally
,
by a watch-tower, or, at sunset, behold the rich glow
gather upon their summits, and suffuse their misty robes
with beautiful hues. The still grandeur of the hills of
Spain thus bathed in softened tints, was in striking
contrast
to the civil feud then devastating the country.
Leaning
over the bulwarks, I loved to gaze upon these
magnificent
boundaries of a chivalrous land, and muse upon the
decayed splendor of the Alhambra, the rich humor of Don
Quixote, or the wrongs and triumphs of Columbus. On
a clear and delightful morning, we came in view of Malta.
Perhaps there is no spot of such diminutive extent, that
can boast an equal renown. Although a mere
calcareous
rock, its commanding position early attracted the
arms of the Cathagenians, who were dispossessed by
the Romans. The island was occupied, in the middle
ages, by the Saracens and Normans, and in 1530,
conferred
,
by Charles V., upon the knights of Saint John,
who had been expelled from Rhodes by the Turks.
Thenceforth, Malta exhibited a new aspect.
Fortifications
of great extent and admirable construction arose.
The one small stream of fresh water was carried to
Valetta
by an acqueduct of a thousand arches. The noble
church dedicated to the patron saint of the order arose. A
hospital was built to accommodate two thousand patients,
and the vessels used in its service, were of solid silver.
Earth from Sicily, was spread over the rock, which soon
presented tints of lively green to contrast with the
greyish-yellow
hue of the forts, and the deep blue of the sea.
As we were not permitted immediately to land, I had
ample
opportunity to contemplate the interesting scene.
Several vessels of war were lying in the harbor, their large,
dark hulls casting broad and imposing shadows. The
castles of Saint Angelo and Saint Elmo, presented their
batteries at opposite angles, reviving the associations of
the memorable sieges which the knights so courageously
sustained. On one of these occasions, when the
position
of the enemy intervened between the two forts, their
situation is described as trying in the extreme. The
waves were dyed with blood. The bodies of the knights
who perished at Saint Elmo, floated to the foot of Saint
Angelo, and were buried there. Many of them were
horribly
16*
mangled, and the cross cut in derision upon their
breasts. At night, the fire wheels and other engines,
illuminated
the scene of battle. The brave champions of
Christianity, met, for the last time, in their council hall,
wounded and spent with fatigue, and, having partaken of
the last religious rite, vowed to sacrifice themselves, and
return once more to the defence. When the moon arose,
and poured her tranquil light upon the harbor, its
peaceful
beauty rendered such retrospections more difficult to
realize. The water rippled playfully around the mossy
walls of the forts. The mild lustre fell serenely upon the
tile covered roofs of the town, and bathed the lofty dome
of the Cathedral. The crowd passed cheerfully along
the quay, and the echo of a mariner's song alone
disturbed
the silence of night. Now and then a boat shot
across the bay with its complement of passengersa
priest, a soldier, and one or two female figures, shrouded
in black silk. It was impossible to peruse the scene and
not revert to those fierce struggles between the crescent
and the cross, and dwell upon the devoted enthusiasm
which led so many of the young and the brave to assume
the black mantle and holy symbol of Christian
knighthood
.
The inspiration of a Southern night aided the
imagination in conjuring from the bosom of the quiet
waters
,
the buried tales of romantic valor. Such dreams
were soon dispelled upon landing, for the Nix Mangare
stairs leading to the town, are always thronged with the
most importunate beggars. In the principal street, some
laborers were digging the foundation of a house. The
cellar is made by merely throwing out the calcareous soil
which forms very good material for building. When
used, however, for floors, it is necessary to harden the
surface
of the Malta stone with varnish or oil. A friend of
mine, at Palermo, who paved his house with this
material
,
and neglected thus to prepare it, discovered his mistake
in a very unpleasant manner. Soon after taking
possession
of his residence, he gave a ball. After the third or
fourth dance, the gentlemen's coats were white with
powder
,
the air of the rooms was filled with fine dust, and the
next day, every one of the company complained of a sore
throat. We lodged at a hotel, formerly a knight's
palace
,
every apartment of which is of noble dimensions,
and richly decorated. The Grand Master's residence,
the splendid armory, the long lines of bastions, and the
monuments in the church of Saint John, are the most
interesting
memorials of the knights. The old pits
excavated
for preserving grain, which has been thus kept for
an entire century, are still used for a similar purpose.
A column on one of the ramparts, commemorates the
services
of Sir Alexander Ball, to whom Coleridge pays so
high a tribute in the Friend. The gay uniforms of the
English officers give a lively air to the narrow streets of
Malta. At the opera, between the acts, the orchestra
perform
God save the King, and every individual rises
and remains attentively standing until the music ceases
This silent recognition of national feeling, in a foreign
land is impressive and touching. Malta will not long
detain the curious traveller, when so near more
interesting
localities. But while the novelty of its peculiar
features
is fresh to the mind, they cannot fail to amuse.
There is a remarkable unity in the associations of the
place, connected as they are, almost exclusively with the
knights. A great variety in costume, and sundry
singularities
in the habits and dialects of the natives, afford a
fund of entertainment for a few days' sojourn. The
Maltese
still complain loudly of their grievances, and have
but recently succeeded in obtaining the freedom of their
press. Their African origin is strongly indicated in their
complexions and cast of features. Yet not unfrequently,
from one of the grotesque balconies, a dark eye gleams,
or a form is visible, which stays the steps, and provokes
the sigh of the stranger.
THOUGHTS ON THE POETS.
GOLDSMITH.
It
is sometimes both pleasing and profitable to recur to
those characters in literary history who are emphatically
favorites, and to glance at the cause of their popularity.
Such speculations frequently afford more important results
than the mere gratification of curiosity. They often lead
to a clearer perception of the true tests of genius, and
indicate the principle and methods by which the common
mind may be most successfully addressed. The advantage
of such retrospective inquiries is still greater at a period
like the present, when there is such an obvious tendency
to innovate upon some of the best established theories of
taste; when the passion for novelty seeks for such
unlicensed
indulgence, and invention seems to exhaust itself
rather upon forms than ideas. In literature, especially,
we appear to be daily losing one of the most valuable
elementssimplicity. The prevalent taste is no longer
gratified with the natural. There is a growing appetite
for what is startling and peculiar, seldom accompanied by
any discriminating demand for the true and original; and
yet, experience has fully proved that these last are the
only permanent elements of literature; and no healthy
mind, cognizant of its own history, is unaware that the
only intellectual aliment which never palls upon the taste,
is that which is least indebted to extraneous
accompaniments
for its relish.
It is ever refreshing to revert to first principles. The
study of the old masters may sometimes make the modern
artist despair of his own efforts; but if he have the genius
to discover, and follow out the great principle upon which
they wrought, he will not have contemplated their works
in vain. He will have learned that devotion to nature
is the grand secret of progress in art, and that the success
of her votaries depends upon the singleness, constancy,
and intelligence of their worship. If there is not
enthusiasm
enough to kindle this flame in its purity, nor energy
sufficient to fulfil the sacrifice required at that high
altar, let not the young aspirant enter the priesthood of
art. When the immortal painter of the Transfiguration
was asked to embody his ideal of perfect female loveliness,
he repliedthere would still be an infinite distance between
his work and the existent original. In this profound and
vivid perception of the beautiful in nature, we perceive
the origin of those lovely creations, which, for more than
three hundred years, have delighted mankind. And it is
equally true of the pen as the pencil, that what is drawn
from life and the heart, alone bears the impress of
immortality
.
Yet the practical faith of our day is diametrically
opposed to this truth. The writers of our times are
constantly
making use of artificial enginery. They have, for
17
the most part, abandoned the integrity of purpose and
earnest directness of earlier epochs. There is less faith,
as we before said, in the natural; and when we turn from
the midst of the forced and hot bed products of the
modern
school, and ramble in the garden of old English
literature
,
a cool and calm refreshment invigorates the
spirit, like the first breath of mountain air to the weary
wayfarer.
There are few writers of the period more generally
beloved
than Dr. Goldsmith. Of his contemporaries,
Burke excelled him in splendor of diction, and Johnson
in depth of thought. The former continues to enjoy a
larger share of admiration, and the latter of respect, but
the labors of their less pretending companion have
secured
him a far richer heritage of love. Of all
posthumous
tributes to genius, this seems the most truly
desirable
.
It recognizes the man as well as the author. It is
called forth by more interesting characteristics than
talent
.
It bespeaks a greater than ordinary association of
the individual with his works, and looking beyond the
mere embodiment of his intellect, it gives assurance of an
attractiveness in his character which has made itself felt
even through the artificial medium of writing. The
authors
are comparatively few, who have awakened this
feeling
of personal interest and affection. It is common,
indeed
,
for any writer of genius to inspire emotions of
gratitude
in the breasts of those susceptible to the charm, but
the instances are rare in which this sentiment is vivified
and elevated into positive affection. And few, I
apprehend
,
among the wits and poets of old England, have
more widely awakened it than Oliver Goldsmith. I have
said this kind of literary fame was eminently desirable.
There is, indeed, something inexpressibly touching in the
thought of one of the gifted of our race, attaching to
himself
countless hearts by the force of a charm woven in
by-gone
years, when environed by neglect and
discouragement
.
Though a late, it is a beautiful recompense,
transcending
mere critical approbation, or even the reverence
men offer to the monuments of mind. We can conceive
of no motive to effort which can be presented to a man of
true feeling, like the hope of winning the love of his kind
by the faithful exhibition of himself. It is a nobler
purpose
than that entertained by heartless ambition. The
appeal is not merely to the judgment and imagination, it
is to the universal heart of mankind. Such fame is
emphatically
rich. It gains its possessor warm friends
instead
of mere admirers. To establish such an
inheritance
in the breast of humanity, were indeed worthy of
sacrifice and toil. It is an offering not only to
intellectual
but to moral graces, and its possession argues for the
sons of fame holier qualities than genius itself. It
eloquently
indicates that its subject is not only capable of
interesting the general mind by the power of his
creations
,
but of captivating the feelings by the earnest beauty
of his nature. Of all oblations, therefore, we deem it the
most valuable. It is this sentiment with which the lovers
of painting regard the truest interpreters of the art. They
wonder at Michael Angelo but love Raphael, and gaze
upon the pensively beautiful delineation he has left us of
himself, with the regretful tenderness with which we look
upon the portrait of a departed friend. The devotees of
music, too, dwell with glad astonishment upon the
celebrated
operas of Rosini and some of the German
composers
,
but the memory of Bellini is absolutely loved. It is
well remarked by one of Goldsmith's biographers, that the
very fact of his being spoken of always with the epithet
poor attached to his name, is sufficient evidence of the
kind of fame he enjoys. Whence, then, the peculiar
attraction
of his writings, and wherein consists the spell
which has so long rendered his works the favorites of so
many and such a variety of readers?
The primary and all-pervading charm of Goldsmith is
his truth. It is interesting to trace this delightful
characteristic
,
as it exhibits itself not less in his life than in his
writings. We see it displayed in the remarkable
frankness
which distinguished his intercourse with others, and
in that winning simplicity which so frequently excited the
contemptuous laugh of the worldly-wise, but failed not to
draw towards him the more valuable sympathies of less
perverted natures. All who have sketched his biography
unite in declaring, that he could not dissemble; and we
have a good illustration of his want of tact in concealing
a defect, in the story which is related of him at the time
of his unsuccessful attempt at medical practice in
Edinburgh
when,
his only velvet coat being deformed by a
huge patch on the right breast, he was accustomed, while
in the drawing room, to cover it in the most awkward
manner with his hat. It was his natural truthfulness
which led him to so candid and habitual a confession of
his faults. Johnson ridiculed him for so freely describing
the state of his feelings during the representation of his
first play; and, throughout his life, the perfect honesty of
his spirit made him the subject of innumerable practical
jokes. Credulity is perhaps a weakness almost
inseparable
from eminently truthful characters. Yet, if such is the
case, it does not in the least diminish our faith in the
superiority
and value of such characters. Waiving all moral
considerations, we believe it can be demonstrated that
truth is one of the most essential elements of real
greatness
,
and surest means of eminent success.
Management
,
chicanery and cunning, may advance men in the
career of the world; it may forward the views of the
politician
,
and clear the way of the diplomatist. But when
humanity is to be addressed in the universal language of
genius; when, through the medium of literature or art,
man essays to reach the heart of his kind, the more
sincere
the appeal, the surer its effect; the more direct the
call, the deeper the response. In a word, the more
largely
truth enters into a work, the more certain the fame of
its author. But a few months since, I saw the Parisian
populace crowding around the church where the remains
of Talleyrand lay in state, but the fever of curiosity alone
gleamed from their eyes, undimmed by tears. When
Goldsmith died, Reynolds, then in the full tide of
success
,
threw his pencil aside in sorrow, and Burke turned
from the fast-brightening vision of renown, to weep.
Truth is an endearing quality. None are so beloved
as the ingenuous. We feel in approaching them that the
look of welcome is unaffectedthat the friendly grasp is
from the heart, and we regret their departure as an actual
17*
loss. And not less winningly shines this high and
sacred
principle through the labours of genius. It
immortalizes
historyit is the true origin of eloquence, and
constitutes the living charm of poetry. When Goldsmith
penned the lines
To me more dear, congenial to my heart,
One native charm than all the gloss of art,
he furnished the key to his peculiar genius, and recorded
the secret which has embalmed his memory. It was the
clearness of his own soul which reflected so truly the
imagery of life. He did but transcribe the unadorned
convictions that glowed in his mind, and faithfully traced
the pictures which nature threw upon the mirror of his
fancy. Hence the unrivalled excellence of his
descriptions
.
Rural life has never found a sweeter eulogist. To
countless memories have his village landscapes risen
pleasantly, when the murmur rose at eventide.
Where do we not meet with a kind-hearted philosopher
delighting in some speculative hobby, equally dear as the
good Vicar's theory of Monogamy? The vigils of many
an ardent student have been beguiled by his portraiture of
a country clergymanbrightening the dim vista of
futurity
as his own ideal of destiny; and who has not, at
times, caught the very solace of retirement from his
sweet apostrophe?
The genius of Goldsmith was chiefly fertilized by
observation
.
He was not one of those who regard books
as the only, or even the principal sources of knowledge
He recognised and delighted to study the unwritten lore
so richly spread over the volume of nature, and shadowed
forth so variously from the scenes of every-day life and
the teachings of individual experience. There is a class
of minds, second to none in native acuteness and
reflective
power, so constituted as to flourish almost
exclusively
by observation. Too impatient of restraint to endure
the long vigils of the scholar, they are yet keenly alive to
every idea and truth which is evolved from life. Without
a tithe of that spirit of application that binds the German
student for years to his familiar tomes, they suffer not a
single impression which events or character leave upon
their memories to pass unappreciated. Unlearned, in a
great measure, in the history of the past, the present is
not allowed to pass without eliciting their intelligent
comment
.
Unskilled in the technicalities of learning, they
contrive to appropriate, with surprising facility, the
wisdom
born of the passing moment. No striking trait of
characterno remarkable effect in naturenone of the
phenomena of social existence, escape them. Like
Hogarth
,
they are constantly enriching themselves with
sketches from life; and, as he drew street-wonders upon
his thumb-nail, they note and remember, and afterwards
elaborate and digest whatever of interest experience
affords
.
Goldsmith was a true specimen of this class.
He vindicated, indeed, his claim to the title of scholar, by
research and study; but the field most congenial to his
taste, was the broad universe of nature and man. It was
his love of observation which gave zest to the roving life
he began so early to indulge. His boyhood was passed
in a constant succession of friendly visits. He was ever
migrating from the house of one kinsman or friend to
that of another; and on these occasions, as well as when
at home, he was silently but faithfully observing. The
result is easily traced in his writings. Few authors,
indeed
,
are so highly indebted to personal observation for
their materials. It is well known that the original of the
Vicar of Wakefield was his own father. Therein has he
embodied in a charming manner his early recollections of
his parent, and the picture is rendered still more
complete
in his papers on the Man in Black. The
inimitable
description, too, of the Village Schoolmaster,
is drawn from the poet's early teacher; and the veteran,
who shouldered his crutch and told how fields were
won, had often shared the hospitality of his father's roof.
The leading incident in She Stoops to Conquer, was
his own adventure; and there is little question, that, in
the quaint tastes of Mr. Burchell, he aimed to exhibit
many of his own peculiar traits. But it is not alone in
the leading characters of his novel, plays and poems, that
we discover Goldsmith's observing power. It is equally
discernible throughout his essays and desultory papers.
Most of his illustrations are borrowed from personal
experience
,
and his opinions are generally founded upon
experiment. His talent for fresh and vivid delineation,
is ever most prominently displayed when he is describing
what he actually witnessed, or drawing from the rich fund
of his early impressions or subsequent adventures. No
appeal to humor, curiosity, or imagination, was
unheeded
;
and it is the blended pictures he contrived to
combine
from these cherished associations, that impart so
lively an interest to his pages. One moment we find
him noting, with philosophic sympathy, the pastimes of a
foreign peasantry, and, another, studying the operations
of a spider at his garret window,now busy in
nomenclating
the peculiarities of the Dutch, and anon alluding to
the exhibition of Cherokee Indians. The natural effect
of this thirst for experimental knowledge, was to beget a
love for foreign travel. Accordingly, we find that
Goldsmith
,
after exhausting the narrow circle which his
limited
means could compass at home, projected a
continential
tour, and long cherished the hope of visiting the East.
Indeed, we could scarcely have a stronger proof of his
enthusiasm
,
than the long journey he undertook and actually
accomplished on foot. The remembrance of his
romantic
wanderings over Holland, France, Germany, and
Italy, imparts a singular interest to his writings. It was
indeed worthy of a true poet that, enamored of nature and
delighting in the observation of his species, he should
thus manfully go forth, with no companion but his flute,
and wander over these fair lands hallowed by past
associations
and existent beauty. A rich and happy era despite
its moments of discomfort, to such a spirit, was that year
of solitary pilgrimage. Happy and proud must have been
the imaginative pedestrian, as he reposed his weary frame
in the peasant's cottage beside the murmuring Loire;
and happier still when he stood amid the green valleys of
Switzerland, and looked around upon her snow-capt hills,
hailed the old towers of Verona, or entered the gate of
Florencethe long-anticipated goals to which his weary
footsteps had so patiently tended. If any thing could
enhance the pleasure of musing amid these scenes of
poetic interest, it must have been the consciousness of
having reached them by so gradual and self-denying a
progress. There is, in truth, no more characteristic
portion
of Goldsmith's biography, than that which records
this remarkable tour; and there are few more striking
instances of the available worth of talent. Unlike the
bards of old, he won not his way to shelter and hospitality
by appealing to national feeling; for the lands through
which he roamed were not his own, and the lay of the last
Minstrel had long since died away in oblivion. But he
gained the ready kindness of the peasantry by playing the
flute, as they danced in the intervals of toil; and won the
favor of the learned by successful disputation at the
convents
and universitiesa method of rewarding talent
which was extensively practised in Europe at that period.
Thus, solely befriended by his wits, the roving poet
rambled
over the continent, and, notwithstanding the
vicissitudes
incident to so precarious a mode of seeing the world,
to a mind like his, there was ample compensation in the
superior opportunities for observation thus afforded. He
mingled frankly with the people, and saw things as they
were. The scenery which environed him flitted not
before
his senses, like the shifting scenes of a panorama,
but became familiar to his eye under the changing aspects
of time and season. Manners and customs he quietly
studied, with the advantage of sufficient opportunity to
institute
just comparisons and draw fair inferences. In
short, Goldsmith was no tyro in the philosophy of travel;
and, although the course he pursued was dictated by
necessity
,
its superior results are abundantly evidenced
throughout his works. We have, indeed, no formal
narrative
of his journeyings; but what is better, there is
scarcely a page thrown off, to supply the pressing wants
of the moment, which is not enriched by some pleasing
reminiscence or sensible thought, garnered from the
recollection
and scenes of that long pilgrimage. Nor did
he fail to embody the prominent impressions of so
interesting
an epoch of his chequered life, in a more
enduring
and beautiful form. The poem of The Traveller,
originally sketched in Switzerland, was subsequently
revised
and extended. It was the foundation of
Goldsmith's
poetical fame. The subject evinces the taste of
the author. The unpretending vein of enthusiasm which
runs through it, is only equalled by the force and
simplicity
of the style. The rapid sketches of the several
countries
it presents, are vigorous and pleasing; and the
reflections
interspersed, abound with that truly humane
spirit, and that deep sympathy with the good, the beautiful,
and the true, which distinguishes the poet. This
production
may be regarded as the author's first deliberate
attempt
in the career of genius. It went through nine
editions
during his life, and its success contributed, in a
great measure, to encourage and sustain him in future and
less genial efforts.
The faults which are said to have deformed the character
of Goldsmith, belong essentially to the class of foibles
rather than absolute and positive errors. Recent
biographers
agree in the opinion, that his alleged devotion to
play has either been grossly exaggerated, or was but a
temporary mania; and we should infer from his own
allusion to the subject, that he had, with the flexibility of
disposition that belonged to him, yielded only so far to
its seductions as to learn from experience the supreme
folly of the practice. It is at all events certain, that his
means were too restricted, and his time, while in London
too much occupied, to allow of his enacting the part of a
regular and professed gamester; and during the latter
and most busy years of his life, we have the testimony
of the members of the celebrated club to which he was
attached, to the temperance and industry of his habits.
Another, and in the eyes of the world, perhaps, greater
weakness recorded of him, was a mawkish vanity,
sometimes
accompanied by jealousy of more successful
competitors
for the honors of literature. Some anecdotes,
illustrative of this unamiable trait, are preserved, which
would amuse us, were they associated with less noble
endowments
or a more uninteresting character. As it is,
however, not a few of them challenge credulity, from their
utter want of harmony with certain dispositions which he
is universally allowed to have possessed. But it is one
of the greatest and most common errors in judging of
character, to take an isolated and partial, instead of a
broad and comprehensive view of the various qualities
which go to form the man, and the peculiar circumstances
that have influenced their development. Upon a candid
retrospect of Goldsmith's life, it appears to us that the
display of vanity, which in the view of many are so
demeaning
,
may be easily and satisfactorily explained.
Few men possess talent of any kind unconsciously. It
seems designed by the Creator, that the very sense of
capacity should urge genius to fulfil its mission, and
support its early and lonely efforts by the earnest conviction
of ultimate success. To beings thus endowed, the
neglect
and contumely of the worldthe want of sympathy
the feeling of misappreciation, is often a keen sorrow
felt precisely in proportion to the susceptibility of the
individual, and expressed according as he is ingenuous
and frank. In the case of Goldsmith, his long and
solitary
struggle with povertyhis years of obscure toil
his ill-success in every scheme for support, coupled as
they were with an intuitive and deep consciousness of
mental power and poetic gifts, were calculated to render
him painfully alive to the superior consideration bestowed
upon less deserving but more presumptuous men, and the
unmerited and unjust disregard to his own claims. Weak
it undoubtedly was, for him to give vent so childishly to
such feelings, but this sprung from the spontaneous honesty
of his nature. He felt as thousands have felt under
similar circumstances, but, unlike the most of men, he
knew not the art of concealment. Indeed, this
free-spoken
and candid disposition was inimical to his success
in more than one respect. He was ever a careless talker,
unabled to play the great man, and instinctively preferring
the spontaneous to the formal, and thinking aloud to
studied and circumspect speech. The exquisite
sensibility
to contempt, too, which he confesses belonged to
him, frequently induced an appearance of conceit, when
no undue share existed. The truth is, the legitimate pride
81
of talent, for want of free and natural scope, often
exhibited
itself in Goldsmith greatly to his disadvantage. The
fault was rather in his destiny than himself. He ran
away from college with the design of embarking for
America, because he was reproved by an unfeeling tutor
before a convivial party of his friends; and descended to
a personal rencontre with a printer, who impudently
delivered
Dodsley's refusal that he should undertake an
improved edition of Pope. He concealed his name when
necessity obliged him to apply for the office of usher;
and received visits and letters at a fashionable
coffee-house
,
rather than expose the poorness of his lodgings.
He joined the crowd to hear his own ballads sung when
a student; and openly expressed his wonder at the
stupidity
of people, in preferring the tricks of a mountebank
to the society of a man like himself. While we smile at,
twe cannot wholly deride such foibles, and are constrained
o say of Goldsmith as he said of the Village Pastor
And e'en his failings leaned to virtue's side.
It is not easy to say, whether the improvidence of our
poet arose more from that recklessness of the future,
characteristic
of the Irish temperament, or the singular
confidence
in destiny which is so common a trait in men of
ideal tendencies. It would naturally be supposed, that
the stern lesson of severe experience would have
eventually
corrected this want of foresight. It was but the
thoughtlessness of youth which lured him to forget amid
the convivialities of a party, the vessel on board which he
had taken passage and embarked his effects, on his firs
experiment in travelling; but later in life, we find him
wandering out on the first evening of his arrival in
Edinburgh
,
without noting the street or number of his lodgings;
inviting a party of strangers in a public garden to take tea
with him, without a sixpence in his pocket; and
obstinately
persisting, during his last illness, in taking a favorite
medicine, notwithstanding it aggravated his disease. A
life of greater vicissitude it would be difficult to find in
the annals of literature. Butler and Otaway were,
indeed
,
victims of indigence, and often perhaps, found
themselves, like our bard, in a garret writing for bread,
and expecting every moment to be dunned for a
milk-score
,
but the biography of Goldsmith displays a greater
variety of shifts resorted to for subsistence. He was
successively
an itinerant musician, a half-starved usher, a
chemist's
apprentice, private tutor, law-student, practising
physician, eager disputant, hack-writer, and even, for a
week or two, one of a company of strolling players. In
the history of George Primrose, he is supposed to have
described much of his personal experience prior to the
period
when he became a professed
litterateur
. We
cannot
but admire the independent spirit he maintained
through all these struggles with adverse fortune.
Notwithstanding
his poverty, the attempt to chain his talents
to the service of a political faction by mercenary motives
was indignantly spurned, and when his good genius
proved
triumphant, he preferred to incribe its first
acknowledged
offspring to his brother, than, according to the
servile habits of the day, dedicate it to any aristocratic
patron, that thrift might follow fawning. With all his
incapacity for assuming dignity, Goldsmith never seems
to have forgotten the self-respect becoming one of nature's
nobility.
The high degree of excellence attained by Goldsmith
in such various and distinct species of literary effort, is
worthy of remark. As an essayist, he has contributed
some of the most pure and graceful specimens of English
prose discoverable in the whole range of literature. His
best comedy continues to maintain much of its original
popularity, notwithstanding the revolutions which public
taste has undergone since it was first produced; and
The Hermit is still an acknowledged model in
ballad-writing
.
If from his more finished works, we turn to
those which were thrown off under the pressing
exigencies
of his life, it is astonishing what a contrast of
subjects
employed his pen. During his college days, he was
constantly writing ballads on popular events, which he
disposed of at five shillings each, and subsequently, after
his literary career had fairly commenced, we find him
sedulously
occupied in preparing prefaces, historical
compilations
,
translations, and reviews for the booksellers; one
day throwing off a pamphlet on the Cock-Lane ghost,
and the next inditing Biographical Sketches of Beau
Nash; at one moment, busy upon a festive song, and at
another deep in composing the words for an Oratorio. It
is curious, with the intense sentiment and finished
pictures
of fashionable life with which the fictions of our
day abound, fresh in the memory, to open the Vicar of
Wakefield. We seem to be reading the memoirs of an
earlier era, instead of a different sphere of life. There
are no wild and improbable incidents, no startling views,
and with the exception of Burchell's incognito, no
attempt
to excite interest through the attraction of mystery.
And yet, few novels have enjoyed such extensive and
permanent favor. It is yet the standard work for
introducing
students on the continent to a knowledge of our
language, and although popular taste at present demands
quite a different style of entertainment, yet Goldsmith's
novel is often reverted to with delight, from the vivid
contrast
it presents to the reigning school; while the
attractive
picture it affords of rural life and humble virtue, will
ever render it intrinsically dear and valuable.
But the Deserted Village is, of all Goldsmith's
productions
,
unquestionably the favorite. It carries back
the mind to the early season of life, and re-asserts the
power of unsophisticated tastes. Hence, while other poems
grow stale, this preserves its charm. Dear to the heart
and sacred to the imagination, are those sweet
delineations
of unperverted existence. There is true pathos in
that tender lament over the superseded sports and ruined
haunts of rustic enjoyment, which never fails to find a
response
in every feeling breast. It is an elaborate and
touching
epitaph, written in the cemetery of the world, over what
is dear to all humanity. There is a truth in the eloquent
defence of agricultural pursuits and natural pastimes, that
steals like a well-remembered strain over the heart
immersed
in the toil and crowds of cities. There is an
unborn
beauty in the similes of the bird and her unfledged
offspring, the hare that pants to the place from whence
at first he flew, and the tall cliff that lifts its awful form,
18*
which, despite their familiarity, retain their power to
delight
.
And no clear and susceptible mind can ever lose
its interest in the unforced, unexaggerated and
heart-stirring
numbers, which animate with pleasure the pulses of
youth, gratify the mature taste of manhood, and fall with a
soothing sweetness upon the ear of age. We are not
surprised at the exclamation of a young lady who had been
accustomed to say, that our poet was the homliest of men,
after reading the Deserted VillageI shall never
more think Dr. Goldsmith ugly! This poem passed
through five editions in as many months, and from its
domestic
character became immediately popular throughout
England. Its melodious versification is doubtless, in a
measure, to be ascribed to its author's musical taste, and
the fascinating ease of its flow is the result of long study
and careful revision. Nothing is more deceitful than the
apparent facility observable in poetry. No poet exhibits
more of this characteristic than Ariosto, and yet his
manuscripts
are filled with erasures and repetitions. Few
things appear more negligently graceful than the
well-arranged
drapery of a statue, yet how many experiments
must the artist try before the desired effect is produced.
So thoroughly did the author revise the Deserted
Village
,
that not a single original line remained. The
clearness and warmth of his style is, to my mind, as
indicative
of Goldsmith's truth, as the candor of his
character
or the sincerity of his sentiments. It has been said
of Pitt's elocution, that it had the effect of impressing one
with the idea that the man was greater than the orator.
A similar influence it seems to me is produced by the
harmonious versification and elegant diction of
Goldsmith
.
It is not, indeed, by an analysis, however critical, of
the intellectual distinctions of any author, that we can
arrive at a complete view of his genius. It is to the
feelings
that we must look for that earnestness which gives
vigor to mental efforts, and imparts to them their peculiar
tone and coloring. And it will generally be found that
what is really and permanently attractive in the works of
genius, independent of mere diction, is to be traced
rather
to the heart than the head. We may admire the
original
conception, the lofty imagery or winning style of a
popular author, but what touches us most deeply is the
sentiment
of which these are the vehicles. The fertile
invention
of Petrarch, in displaying under such a variety of
disguises the same favorite subject, is not so moving as
the unalterable devotion which inspires his fancy and
quickens his muse. The popularity of Mrs. Hemans is
more owing to the delicate and deep enthusiasm than to
the elegance of her poetry, and Charles Lamb is not less
attractive for his kindly affections than for his quaint
humor. Not a little of the peculiar charm of Goldsmith,
is attributable to the excellence of his heart. Mere
talent would scarcely have sufficed to interpret and display
so enchantingly the humble characters and scenes to
which his most brilliant efforts were devoted. It was his
sincere and ready sympathy with man, his sensibility to
suffering in every form, his strong social sentiment and
his amiable interest in all around, which brightened to his
mind's eye, what to the less susceptible is unheeded and
obscure. Naturally endowed with free and keen
sensibilities
,
his own experience of privation prevented them
from indurating through age or prosperity. He
cherished
throughout his life an earnest faith in the better
feelings
of our nature. He realized the universal beauty
and power of Love; and neither the solitary pursuits of
literature, the elation of success, nor the blandishments of
pleasure or society, ever banished from his bosom the
generous and kindly sentiments which adorned his
character
.
He was not the mere creature of attainment, the
reserved scholar or abstracted dreamer. Pride of
intellect
usurped not his heart. Pedantry congealed not the
fountains of feeling. He rejoiced in the exercise of
all those tender and noble sentiments which are so much
more honorable to man than the highest triumphs of
mind. And it is these which make us love the man not
less than admire the author. Goldsmith's early sympathy
with the sufferings of the peasantry, is eloquently
expressed
in both his poems and frequently in his prose writings.
How expressive that lament for the destruction of the
`Ale-House'that it would
`No more impart
An hour's importance to the poor man's heart.'
There is more true benevolence in the feeling which
prompted such a thought, than in all the cold and
calculating
philosophy with which so many expect to elevate
the lower classes in these days of ultra-reform. When
shall we learn that we must sympathize with those we
would improve? At college, we are told, one bitter night
Goldsmith encountered a poor woman and her infants
shivering at the gate, and having no money to give them
bringing out all his bed clothes to keep himself from
freezing
,
cut open his bed and slept within it. When hard at
work earning a scanty pittance in his garret, he spent every
spare penny in cakes for the children of his poorer
neighbors
,
and when he could do nothing else, taught them
dancing, by way of cheering their poverty.
Notwithstanding
his avowed antipathy to Baretti, he visited and
relieved him in prison; and when returning home with
the 100 received from his book-seller for the `
Deserted
Village,' upon being told by an acquaintance he fell
in with, that it was a great price for so little a thing,
replied
,
`perhaps it is more than he can afford,' and
returning
offered to refund a part. To his poor countrymen
he was a coustant benefactor, and while he had a shilling
was ready to share it with them, so that they familiarly
styled him `our doctor.' In Leyden, when on the point
of commencing his tour, he stripped himself of all his
funds to send a collection of flower-roots to an uncle who
was devoted to botany; and on the first occasion that
patronage
was offered him, declined aid for himself, to
bespeak
a vacant living for his brother. In truth, his life
abounds in anecdotes of a like nature. We read one
day of his pawning his watch for Pilkington, another of
his bringing home a poor foreigner from Temple gardens
to be his amanuensis, and again of his leaving the
card-table
to relieve a poor woman, whose tones as she
chanted
some ditty in passing, came to him above the hum of
gaiety and
indicated to his ear distress
.. Though the
frequent
and underserved subject of literary abuse, he was
never known to write severely against any one. His
talents were sacredly devoted to the cause of virtue and
humanity. No malignant satire ever came from his
pen. He loved to dwell upon the beautiful vindications in
nature of the paternity of God, and expatiate upon the
noblest and most universal attributes of man. `If I
were to love you by rule,' he writes to his brother, `I
dare say I never could do it sincerely.' There was in his
nature, an instinctive aversion to the frigid, ceremonial and
meaningless professions which so coldly imitate the
language
of feeling. Goldsmith saw enough of the world,
to disrobe his mind of that scepticism born of custom
which `makes dotards of us all.' He did not wander
among foreign nations, sit at the cottage fire-side, nor
mix in the thoroughfare and gay saloon, in vain Travel
liberalized his views and demolished the barriers of local
prejudice. He looked around upon his kind with the
charitable judgment and interest born of an observing
mind and a kindly heart`with an infinite love, an
infinite
pity.' He delighted in the delineation of humble
life, because he knew it to be the most unperverted.
Simple pleasures warmed his fancy because he had
learned
their preminent truth. Childhood with its innocent
playfulness, intellectual character with its tutored wisdom,
and the uncultivated but `bold peasantry,' interested him
alike. He could enjoy an hour's friendly chat with his
fellow-lodgerthe watchmaker in Green Arbor court
not less than a literary discussion with Dr. Johnson. `I
must own,' he writes, `I should prefer the title of the
ancient
philosopher, viz.; a Citizen of the Worldto that
of an Englishman, a Frenchman, an European, or that
of any appellation whatever.' And this title he has nobly
earned, by the wide scope of his sympathies and the
beautiful pictures of life and nature universally
recognized
and universally loved, which have spread his name
over the world. Pilgrims to the supposed scene of the
Deserted Village have long since carried away every
vestige
of the haw-thron at Lissoy, but the laurels of
Goldsmith
will never be garnered by the hand of time, or
blighted by the frost of neglect, as long as there are minds
to appreciate, or hearts to reverence the household lore
of English literature.
POPE.
That
system of compensation which is thought by
many to balance the apparent inequalities of human
destiny
,
is strikingly illustrated in the case of Alexander
Pope. Born in obscurity, he achieved a great reputation,
extremely feeble in frame, his mind was singulurly
energetic
,
cut off by deformity from many accomplishments,
he gave to his intellectual efforts an unrivalled elegance.
Who would have imagined, in contemplating the delicate
and misshapen child, that life, by any possibility, could
prove any thing to him but a weary experience, whose
monotony
would be totally unrelieved? Yet glance at the
adventures
of his poetical career, and in number and
variety
they will be found equal to those of many a hale knight
or wild votary of fashion. At what a tender age he
renounced
the dictation of masters, assumed the reins of
education, and resolutely launched into the profession of
a poet! How soon he was engaged in a quarrel with
Ambrose
Phillips, and what a long satirical contest ensued
with Dennis and Cibber! Then followed his intimacy
with Lady Montague; their fierce encounters of wit;
their friendship, correspondence, and mutual enmity.
These and similar scenes of literary animosity, were
brightened by friendly intercourse with Gay, Swift, and
Bolingbroke: and relieved by long periods of study and
composition, visits to noblemen, short journeys, and
domestic
duties. And thus the weak and diminutive poet
managed to rise above the dull existence his organization
seemed to ensure, and to find abundance of interest in
the excitement of critical warfare and the pursuit of
poetical
renown. It is a wonderful evidence of the power of
mind, that this blighted germ of humanitywho was
braced in canvass in order to hold himself uprightput
to bed and undressed all his life like a childoften unable
to digest the luxuries he could not deny himself, or to
keep his eyes open at the honorable tables to which his
talents alone gave him accessshould yet be the terror of
his foes, the envy of his rivals, and the admiration of his
friends. He could not manage the sword he so
ostentatiously
displayed in society, but he wielded a pen whose
caustic satire was amply adequate to minister either to his
self-defence or revenge. He was `sent into this
breathing
world but half made up,' and calls his existence `a
long disease;' but nature atoned for the unkindness, by
endowing him with a judgment marvellous for its refined
correctness. He could not enjoy with his neighbors the
healthful exercises of the chase; but while they were
pursuing
a poor hare, with whose death ended the sport, his
mind was borne along in a race of rhyme destined to
carry
his name with honor to posterity. He never laughed
19
heartily; but while weaving his heroics, forgot pain,
weariness and the world. In the street, he was an object
of pityat his desk, a king. His head was early
deprived
of hair, and ached severely almost every day of his life;
but his eyes were singularly expressive, and his voice
uncommonly melodious. In youth he suffered the
decrepitude
of age, but at the same time gave evidence of
mental
precocity and superior sense. He was unequal to a
personal rencontre with those who ridiculed his works;
but he has bestowed upon them an immortal vengeance in
the Dunciad. His unfortunate person shut him out from
the triumphs of gallantry, but his talents and reputation
long secured him the society and professed friendship of
the most brilliant woman of the day; and obtained for
him, during most of his life, the faithful care and
companionship
of Martha Blount. He never knew the
buoyancy
of spirit which good health induces, but was very
familiar
with that keen delight that springs from successful
mental enterprize. He could not command the
consideration
attached to noble birth; but, on the strength of his
intellectual endowments, he was always privileged to tax
the patience of his titled acquaintance for his own
convenience
and pleasure.
Men of letters have been called a race of creatures of
a nature between the two sexes. Pope is a remarkable
exemplification of the idea. There is a tone of decided
manliness in the strong sense which characterizes his
productions, and a truly masculine vigor in the patient
application with which he opposed physical debility. His
disposition on the other hand was morbidly vain. He
was weak enough to indulge an ambition for
distinguished
acquaintance, and a most effeminate caprice swayed
his attachments and enmities. Another prominent trait
increased his resemblance to the female sex. I allude to
a quality which the phrenologists call secretiveness. In
its healthy exercise its operation is invaluable. To its
influence is ascribed much of that address and tact, in
which women are so superior to men. The latter, in
ordinary
affairs, generally adopt a very direct course. They
confide in strength rather than policy. They overlook
lesser means in the contemplation of larger ends. This,
indeed, is partly owing to their position. Nature always
gives additional resources where the relation is that of the
pursued rather than the pursuer. Hence, the insight
into
character, the talent for observation, the skill in
tracing
motives and anticipating results, which belong to
women
.
It is the abuse, however, of this trait that is
obvious
in Pope. There seems little question that he was an
artful man. He made use of the most unnecessary
stratagems
to compass a simple favor. His cunning, indeed,
was chiefly directed to the acquisition of fame; but
nothing
subtracts more from our sense of reputation, than
a conviction that it is an exclusive end to its possessor.
Truly great men never trouble themselves about their
fame. They press bravely on in the path of honor and
leave their renown to take care of itself. It succeeds as
certainly as any law of nature. All elevated spirits have
a calm confidence in this truth. Washington felt it in
the darkest hour of the revolution, and Shakespeare
unconsciously
realized it, when he concluded his last play,
and went quietly down to finish his days in the country.
Pope was a gifted mortal, but he was not of this
calibre
.
He thought a great deal about his reputation. He was
not satisfied merely to labor for it, and leave the result.
He disputed its possession inch by inch with the critics,
and resorted to a thousand petty tricks to secure its
enjoyment
.
The management he displayed in order to
publish
his letters, is an instance in point. No one can read
them without feeling they were written for more eyes
than those of his correspondents. There is a labored
smartness, a constant exhibition of fine sentiment, which
is strained and unnatural. His repeated deprecation of
motives of aggrandizement, argues, `a thinking too
precisely'
on the very subject; and no man, whose chief
ambition
was to gain a few dear friends, would so habitually
proclaim it. These tender and delicate aspirations live
in the secret places of the heart. They are breathed in
lonely prayers, and uttered chiefly in quiet sighs. Scarcely
do they obtain natural expression amid the details of a
literary correspondence. True sentiment is modest. It
may tinge the conversation and give a feeling tone to the
epistle, but it makes not a confessional of every
sentry-box
,
or gallery. The letters of Pope leave upon the
mind an impression of affectation. Doubtless they
contain
much that is sincere in sentiment and candid in
opinion
,
but the general effect lacks the freedom and
heartiness
of genuine letter-writing. Many of the bard's
foibles should be ascribed to his bodily ailments, and the
indulgence which he always commanded. Nor should
we forget that he proved himself above literary servility
and was, in many instances, a most faithful friend, and
always an exemplary son. Pope was the poet of wit
and fancy, rather than of enthusiasm and imagination.
His invention is often brilliant, but never grand. He
rarely excites any sentiment of sublimity, but often one of
pleasure. There is little in his poetry that seems the
offspring
of emotion. He never appears to have written
from overpowering impulse. His finest verses have an
air of premeditation. We are not swept away by a torrent
of individual passion as in Byron, nor melted by a
natural
sentiment as in Burns, nor exalted by a grandeur of
imagery as in Milton. We read Pope with a regular
pulse. He often provokes a smile, but never calls forth a
tear. His rationality approves itself to our
understanding
,
his fancifulness excites our applause; but the
citadel
of the soul is uninvaded. We perceive, unawares
perhaps
,
that books have quickened the bard's conception far
more than experience. It may be fairly doubted whether
Pope possessed, in any great degree, the true poetical
sensibility
to nature. He thought more of his own domains
than becomes a true son of the muse, and had a most
unpoetical regard for money, as well as contempt for
poverty
.
His favorite objects of contemplation were
Alexander
Pope and Twickenham. We cannot wonder that
he failed as an editor of Shakspeare. Few objects or
scenes of the outward world awoke feelings in his bosom
too deep for tears. He never claimed such fellowship
with the elements as to fancy himself `a portion of the
tempest.' It is true he describes well; but where the
materials of his pictures are not borrowed, they resemble
19*
authentic nomenclatures more than genial sketches. He
does not personify nature with the ardor of a votary. He
never follows with a lover's perception the phases of a
natural phenomenon. The evening wind might have
cooled his brow forever, ere he would have been prompted
to trace its course with the grateful fondness of Bryant.
He might have lived upon the sea coast, and never
revelled
in its grandeur as did the Peer, and passed a daisy
every
day, nor felt the meek appeal of its lowly beauty, as
did the Ploughman. Even in his letters, Pope depicts
scenery with a very cool admiration; and never seems
to associate it with any sentiment of moral interest.
Where any thing of this appears, it is borrowed. The
taste of Pope was evidently artificial to the last degree.
He delighted in a grotto decked out with looking-glass and
colored stones, as much as Wordsworth in a
mountain-path
,
or Scott in a border antiquity. The Rape of the
Lock is considered his most characteristic production, and
abounds with brilliant fancy and striking invention.
But to what is it devoted? The celebration of a trivial
incident in fashionable life. Its inspiration is not of the
grove, but the boudoir. It is not bright with the radiance
of truth, but with the polish of art. It breathes not the
fragrance of wild-flowers, but the fumes of tea. It
displays
not the simple features of nature, but the
paraphernalia
of the toilet. We know what the heroine wears and
what she does, but must conjecture her peculiar
sentiments
,
and make out of the details of her dress and
circumstances
,
an idea of her character.
On her white breast, a sparkling cross she wore
Which Jews might kiss and infidels adore.
Faultless lines indeed, and they ring most
harmoniously
;
but the poet of feeling would have thrilled us with
his description of Belinda's charms, and the poet of
imagination
would have carried us beneath both the cross and
the bosom it adorned, to the young heart of the maiden,
and made us `leap on its pants triumphant.' Yet this
poem is an extraordinary proof of Pope's fancy. He has
invented a long story out of a single and not very
interesting
fact; and he has told this tale in language the most
choice, and rhymes the most correct. The poem is like
the fruits and flowers of precious stones set in the
exquisite
pietra dura
tables of Italy,clear, fanciful, rarely
combined, but unwarmed with any glow of nature; and
better calculated to awaken admiration than excite
sympathy
.
It is usual to speak of Pope as a poet of the past
one whose peculiarities have given place to a new order
of things. But we have ever representatives of his school,
both in literature and life. Men who have cultivated their
manners to an elegant degree of plausibility, orators who
have become masters of an engaging elocution, the
grace of which wins us from criticism and reflection,
poets who have perfectly learned how to versify, and have
more sense than sensibility, more wit than enthusiasm,
more fancy than imaginative power;such are legitimate
disciples of Pope. They are useful, attractive, often
delightful
beings, and effect much in their way; but
humanity
can be `touched to finer issues' than these
conventional
though brilliant accomplishments. The truthful
aspirant
,
the mind elevated by great views and aims, the
spontaneous and overflowing soulsuch spirits as Milton,
Burns, Coleridge, and Lamb, awaken a profounder regard.
The Essay on Man contains many truisms, a long array
of common-place facts, and a few interesting truths. The
theory it unfolds, whether the poet's or borrowed, affords
little consolation to an ardent and sensitive mind. Pope
cherished no very tender or comprehensive views of his
race. His observation enabled him only to `catch the
manners living as they rise;' and accordingly many of
his couplets have passed into proverbs. He inquires
`of God above, or man below,
What can we reason, but from what we know?'
A curious query for a poet whose distinction it is to
enjoy
the insight of a generous imagination, and whose
keen sympathies take him constantly from the narrow
limits of the actual, soften the angles of mere logical
perception
;
and `round them with a sleep'the sweet and
dreamy repose of poetical reverie. Pope sings not of
Hopes and fears that kindle hope,
An undistinguishable throng,
And gentle wishes long subdued,
Subdued and cherished long.
The Epistle to Abelard breathes, indeed, the tremulous
faith of love, and paints, not uneffectively, the struggle of
that passion in a vestal's heart, but the bard himself
refers
us to the original letter for the sentiment of the
poem. Even the pious invocation of `The Dying
Christian
to his Soul,' was written with a view to other
effusions
of a similar nature. The Translations and
Imitations
of Pope, greatly outweigh his original piecesa
sufficient proof that poetry was to him more of an art than
an impulse. The Iliad, however little it may credit his
scholarship and fidelity to the original, is truly an
extraordinary
evidence of his facility in versifying, and of his
patient industry. Pope's ideal lay almost wholly in
language
.
He thought that
`True expression like the unchanging sun,
Clears and improves whate'er it shines upon,
It gilds all objects, but it alters none.'
To him we are mainly indebted for a new revelation of
the capabilities of English heroic verse. He gave the
most striking examples of his favorite theory, that `sound
should seem an echo to the sense.' He carried out the
improvement in diction which Dryden commenced; and
while Addison was producing beautiful specimens of
reformed
prose, Pope gave a polish and point to verse
before
unknown. When the vast number of his couplets
are considered, their fastidious correctness is truly
astonishing
.
How many examples occur to the memory
of his correct and musical rhymes, ringing like the clear
chimes of a favorite bell through a frosty atmosphere!
How often do we forget the poverty of the thoughtthe
familiarity of the imagethe triteness of the truths they
convey, in the fascinating precision of the verse! It
becomes
,
indeed, wearisome at length from sameness; and
to be truly enjoyed must be only resorted to occasionally.
The poetical diction of Pope resembles mosaic-work.
His words, like the materials of that art, are fitted
together
with a marvellous nicety. The pictures formed are
vivid, exact, and skilful. The consummate tact thus
displayed
charms the fancy, and suggests a degree of patient
and tasteful labor which excites admiration. The best
mosaic paintings have a fresh vivacity of hue, and a
distinctness
of outline, which gratifies the eye; but we yield
a higher tribute to the less formal and more spiritual
products
of the pencil. And such is the distinction between
Pope and more imaginative poets. The bright enamel
of his rhymes, is like a frozen lake over which we glide,
as a skaiter before the wind, surrounded by a glittering
landscape of snow. There is a pleasing exhilaration in
our course, but little glow of heart or exultation of soul.
The poetry of a deeper and less artificial school is like
that lake on a summer evening, upon whose tide we float
in a pleasure-boat, looking upon the flowering banks, the
warm sunset, and the coming forth of the stars. To
appreciate
justly the perfection to which Pope carried the
heroic verse, it is only necessary to consider how few
subsequent rhymers have equalled him. He created a
standard in this department which is not likely soon to
be superseded. Other and less studied metres have since
come into vogue, but this still occupies and must retain
an important place. It is doubtless the best for an
occasional
poem intended for oral delivery. Few can manage
the Spenserian stanza with effect, and blank verse often
wearies an audience. There is a directness in the
heroic
metre admirably adapted for immediate impression.
The thought is converged to bright sallies within its brief
limits, and the quickly succeeding rhymes sweeten the
sentiment to the ear. Finely chosen words are very
effective
in the heroic measure, and images have a striking
relievo. For bold appeal, and keen satire, this medium
is unsurpassed; and it is equally susceptible of touching
melody. Witness Byron's description of the dead
Medora
,
and Campbell's protest against scepticism. Rogers
and our own Sprague have won their fairest laurels in
heroic
verse. With this school of poetry, Pope is wholly
identified. He most signally exhibited its resources, and
to him is justly ascribable the honor of having made it
the occasion of refining the English language. He
illustrates
the power of correctnessthe effect of precision.
His example has done much to put to shame careless
habits of expression. He was a metrical essayist of
excellent
sense, rare fancy, and bright wit. He is the
apostle of legitimate rhyme, and one of the true masters
of the art of verse.
COWPER.
In the gallery of the English poets, we linger with
peculiar emotion before the portrait of Cowper. We
think of him as a youth, `gigling and making giggle' at
his uncle's house in London, and indulging an attachment
destined to be sadly disappointed; made wretched by the
idea of a peculiar destiny; transferred from a circle of
literary roysterers to the gloomy precincts of an Insane
Asylum; partially restored, yet shrinking from the
responsibilities
incident to his age; restless, undecided,
desponding even to suicidal wretchedness, and finally
abandoning a world for the excitement and struggles of
which he was wholly unfit. We follow him into the
bosom of a devoted family; witness with admiration the
facility he exhibits in deriving amusements from trifling
employmentsgathering every way-side flower even in
the valley of despair, finding no comfort but in `
self-deception
,'
and finding this in `self-discipline.' We
behold
his singular re-appearance in the world in the
capacity
of an author,genius reviving the ties that
misfortune
had broken. We trace with delight his intellectual
career in his charming correspondence with Hayley, Hill,
and his cousin, the vividness of his affections in his
poem to his mother's picture, the play of his fancy in
John Gilpin, his reflective ingenuity in the Task. We
recall the closing scenethe failing faculties of his faithful
companion,
[3]
[3]
Thy indistinct expressions seem
Like language uttered in a dream,
Yet me they charm, whate'er their theme,
My Mary.
his removal from endeared scenes, his sad
walks by the sea-shore, his patient, but profound
melancholy
and peaceful deathwith the solemn relief that
ensues from the termination of a tragedy. And when
we are told that an expression of holy surprise settled
on the face of the departed, we are tempted to exclaim
with honest Kent
O, let him pass! he hates him
That would upon the rack of this rude world,
Stretch him out longer.
At an age when most of his countrymen are confirmed
in prosaic habits, William Cowper sat down to versify.
No darling theory of the art, no restless thirst for fame,
no bardic frenzy prompted his devotion. He sought in
poetic labor oblivion of consciousness. He strove to
make a Lethe of the waters of Helicon. The gift of a
beautiful mind was maried by an unhappy temperament;
the chords of a tender heart proved too delicate for the
winds of life; and the unfortunate youth became an
intellectual
hypochondriac. In early manhood, when the
20
first cloud of insanity had dispersed, he took, as it were,
monastic vowsand turned aside from the busy metropolis,
where his career began, to seek the solace of rural
retirement
.
There, the tasteful care of a conservatory, the
exercise of mechanical ingenuity, repose, seclusion and
kindness, gradually restored his spirit to calmness; and
then the intellect demanded exercise, and this it found in
the service of the muse. Few of her votaries afford a
more touching instance of suffering than the bard of
Olney. In the records of mental disease, his case has a
melancholy prominencenot that it is wholly isolated,
but because the patient tells his own story, and hallows
the memory of his griefs by uniform gentleness of soul
and engaging graces of mind. To account for the misery
of Cowper, is not so important as to receive and act upon
the lesson it conveys. His history is an ever-eloquent
appeal in behalf of those, whose delicate organization
and sensitive temper expose them to moral anguish.
Whether his gloom is ascribable to a state of the brain as
physiologists maintain, to the ministry of spirits as is
argued by the Swedenborgians, or to the influence of a
creed as sectarians declare, is a matter of no comparative
momentsince there is no doubt the germs of insanity
existed in his very constitution. I cannot bear much
thinking, he says. The meshes of the brain are
composed
of such mere spinner's threads in me, that when a
long thought finds its way into them, it buzzes and twangs
and bustles about at such a rate as seems to threaten the
whole contexture. Recent discoveries have proved that
there is more physiological truth in this remark, than the
unhappy poet could ever have suspected. The ideas
about which his despair gathered, were probably
accidental
.
His melancholy naturally was referred to certain
external causes, but its true origin is to be sought among
the mysteries of our nature. The avenues of joy were
closed in his heart. He tells us, a sportive thought
startled
him. It is as if a harlequin should intrude himself
into the gloomy chamber were a corpse is deposited.
In reading his productions, with a sense of his mental
condition, what a mingling of human dignity and woe is
present to the imagination! A mind evolving the most
rational and virtuous conceptions, yet itself the prey of
absurd delusions; a heart overflowing with the truest
sympathy for a sick hare, yet pained at the idea of the
church-honors paid to Handel; a soul gratefully
recognizing
the benignity of God, in the fresh verdure of the
myrtle, and the mutual attachment of doves, and yet
incredulous
of his care for its own eternal destiny! What
a striking incongruity between the thoughtful man,
expatiating
in graceful numbers upon the laws of Nature
and the claims of Religion, and the poor mortal deferring
to an ignorant school-master, and hunted by spiritual
hounds in the night-season; the devout poet celebrating
his maker's glory, and the madman trembling at the
waxing
moon; the affectionate friend patient and devoted,
and the timid devotee deprecating the displeasure of a
clergyman, who reproved his limited and harmless
pleasures
!
It has been objected to Hamlet, that the sportiveness of
the prince mars the effect of his thoughtfulness. It is
natural when the mind is haunted and oppressed by any
painful idea which it is necessary to conceal, to seek
relief
,
and at the same time increase the deception, by a kind
of playfulness. This is exemplified in Cowper's letters.
Such thoughts, he says, as pass through my head
when I am not writing, make the subject of my letters to
you. One overwhelming thought, however, was gliding
like a dark, deep stream beneath the airy structures he
thus reared to keep his mind from being swept off by its
gloomy current. To this end, he surrendered his pen to
the most obvious pleasantry at hand, and dallied with the
most casual thoughts of the moment, as Hamlet talks
about the old true-penny in the cellerage, when the
idea of his father's spirit is weighing with awful
mysteriousness
upon his heart, and amuses himself with joking
Old Polonius, when the thought of filial revenge is
swaying
the very depths of his soul. Cowper speculates on
baloons, moralizes on politics, chronicles the details of
his home-experience, even to the accidents resulting from
the use of a broken table, with the charming air of
playfulness
that marks the correspondence of a lively girl.
How often are these letters the proofs of rare heroism!
How often were those flowers of fancy watered by a
bleeding heart! By what an effort of will was his mind
turned from its forebodings, from the dread of his
wretched
anniversary, from the one horrible idea that darkened
his being, to the very trifles of common-life, the every-day
circumstances which he knew so well how to array with
fresh interest and agreeable combination! Cowper's
story indicates what a world of experience is contained in
one solitary life. It lifts the veil from a single human
bosom, and displays all the elements of suffering,
adventure
and peace, which we are apt to think so dependant
upon outward circumstances! There is more to be
learned from such a record than most histories afford.
They relate things
en masse
, and battles, kings and courts
pass before us, like mists along a mountain-range; but
in such a life as that of Cowper, we tremble at the
capacity
of woe involved in the possession of sensibility, and
trace with awe and pity the mystery of a mind
diseased
.
The anatomy of the soul is, as it were, partially
disclosed. Its conflicting elements, its intensity of
reflection
,
its marvellous action fill us with a new and more
tender reverence. Nor are the darker shades of this
remarkable
mental portrait unrelieved. To the reader of
his life, Cowper's encounter with young Unwin, under
the trees at Huntingdon, is as bright a gleam of destiny
as that which visited his heart at Southampton. At the
very outset of his acquaintance with this delightful family,
he calls them comfortable people. This term may
seem rather humble compared with such epithets as `
brilliant
,'
`gifted' and `interesting;' but to a refined mind
it is full of significance. Would there were more
comfortable
people in the world! Where there is rare talent
in a companion, there is seldom repose. Enthusiasm is
apt to make very uncomfortable demands upon our
sympathies
,
and strong-sense is not infrequently accompanied
by a dogmatical spirit. Erudite society is generally
devoid
of freshness, and poetical spirits have the reputation
of egotism. However improving such companions may
20*
be, to sensitive persons they are seldom comfortable.
There is a silent influence in the mere presence of every
one, which, whether animal magnetism is true or not,
makes itself felt, unless the nerves are insensible; and
then there is a decided character in the voice and manner,
as well as in the conversation. In comfortable people,
all these are harmonized. The whole impression is
cheering. We are at ease, and yet gratified; we are
soothed and happy. With such companionship was
Cowper
blessed in the Unwins. No `stricken deer' that ever
left the herd of men, required such a solace more. We
cannot wonder it proved a balm. The matronly figure
of Mrs. Unwin and her `sweet, serene face,' rise before
the fancy as pictures of actual memory. We see her
knitting
beside the fire on a winter day, and Cowper writing
opposite; hear her friendly expostulation when he
overtasked
his mind, and see the smile with which she `
restored
his fiddle,' when rest made it safe to resume the
pen. We follow them with a gaze of affectionate respect
as they walk at noon along the gravel-walk, and honor the
maternal solicitude that sustains her patient vigils beside
the sick-bed of the bard. In imagination we trace her
demeanor
,
as with true female tact she contrived to make the
people regard her charge only with reverence. Like a
star of peace and promise, beams the memory of this
excellent
woman upon Cowper's sad history; and Lady
Hesketh and `Sister Anne' are the lesser, but still
benignant
luminaries of that troubled sky. Such glimpses of
woman vindicate her true rights more than all the
rhetoric
of Mary Wolstonecraft. They prove her claim to
higher respect than can attach to the trophies of valor or
genius. They exhibit her in all the dignity of pure
affection
,
in the discharge of duties and the exercise of
sentitiment
more exalted than the statesman or soldier can ever
boast. They throw around Olney more sacred
associations
than those which consecrate Vaucluse. Not to a
selfish passion, not to ambitious display, not to petty
triumphs
did these women minister, but to a kindred nature
whose self-sustaining energies had been weakened, to a
rare spirit bereft of a hope, to a noble heart
over-shadowed
by despair. It was an office worthy of angels; and
even on earth was it thus fulfilled.
It is not surprising that Byron denied to Cowper the
title of poet. To an impassioned imagination, the tone
of his writings cannot but appear subdued even to
absolute
tameness. There are, however, in his poems flights
of fancy, fine comparisons and beautiful descriptive
sketches
,
enough to quicken and impart singular interest to the
`still life' so congenial to his muse. He compared her
array not inaptly to a quaker-costume. Verse was
deliberately
adopted by Cowper at a mature age, as a medium
of usefulness. His poetry is not therefore the overflowing
of youthful feeling, and his good judgment probably
warned
him to avoid exciting themes, even had his inclination
tended in that direction. He became a lay-preacher in
numbers. His object was to improve men, not like the
bard of Avon by powerfully unfolding their passions, nor
like Pope by pure satire; but rather through the quiet
teachings of a moralist. He discourses upon hunting,
cards, the abuses of the clerical profession and other
prevailing
follies, like a man who is convinced of the vanity
of worldly pleasure and anxious to dispel its illusions from
other minds. His strain is generally characterized by
good-sense, occasionally enlivened by quiet humor, and
frequently exhibits uncommon beauties of style and
imagery
.
It is almost invariably calm. Moral indignation is
perhaps the only very warm sentiment with which it
glows. It may be questioned whether Cowper's previous
experience was the best adapted to educate a reformer.
He was a member of a society of wits, called the `
Nonsense
Club;' and from what we can learn of his associates,
it is highly probable that the moderate pursuit of pleasure
was a spectacle very unfamiliar to his youth. Hence,
perhaps, the severe light in which he viewed society, and
the narrow system upon which he judged mankind.
`Truths that the theorist could never reach,
And observation taught me I would teach.'
It is obvious that the poet's observation was remarkably
nice and true in certain departments of life, but his early
diffidence, few companions and retiring habits must have
rendered his view of social characteristics, partial and
imperfect
.
His pictures of spiritual pride and clerical
foppery
are indeed life-like, but prejudice blinded him to
many of the redeeming traits of human nature, and the
habit of judging all men by the mere light of his own
consciousness
prevented him from realizing many of their
real wants, and best instincts. His notions on the
subject
of music, the drama, life in cities, and some other
subjects, were one-sided and unphilosophical. He
generally
unfolds the truth, but it is not always the whole
truth. There is, too, a poetic remedy for human error,
that his melancholy temper forbade his applying. It is
derived
from the religion of hope, faith in manthe
genial
optimism which some later bards have delightfully
advocated. To direct men's thoughts to the redeeming
aspects of life, to celebrate the sunshine and the flower as
types of Eternal goodness and symbols of human joy, to
lead forth the sated reveller and make him feel the glory
of the stars and the freshness of the breeze, to breathe into
the ear of toil the melodies of evening, to charm the
votary
of fashion by endearing portraitures of humble virtue
these have been found moral specifics, superior to formal
expostulation or direct appeal. Cowper doubtless exerted
a happy influence upon his contemporaries, and there is
and order of minds to which his teachings are peculiarly
adapted. He speaks from the contemplative air of rural
retirement. He went thither to muse on the perishing
pleasures of life, to prove that
The only amaranthine flower on earth,
Is Virtue; the only lasting treasure, Truth.
In favor of these principles he addressed his countrymen,
and the strain was worthier than any that had long struck
their ears. Gradually it found a response, confirmed the
right intentions of lowly hearts, and carried conviction to
many a thoughtful youth. There was little, however, in
this improved poetry, of the richest music of humanity,
or of the electrifying cheerfulness of true inspiration, and
hence, much of it has lost its interest, and the bard of
Olney is known chiefly by a few characteristic gems of
moral meditation and graphic portraiture. Our
obligations
then to Cowper as a teacher, are comparatively
limited
.
He was conscious of a good design, and felt
himself
a sincere advocate.
`But nobler yet, and nearer to the skies,
To feel one's self in hours serene and still,
One of the spirits chosen by Heaven to turn
The sunny side of things to human eyes.'
The most truly poetic phases of Cowper's verse, are the
portions devoted to rural and domestic subjects. Here he
was at home and alive to every impression. His
disposition
was of that retiring kind that shrinks from the world,
and is free and at ease only in seclusion. To exhibit
himself, he tells us, was `mortal poison,' and his favorite
image to represent his own condition, was drawn from
the touching instinct which leads a wounded deer to quit
the herd and withdraw into lonely shades to die. He
desired
no nearer view of the world than he could gain from
the `busy map of life'a newspaper; or through the `
loop-holes
of retreat, to see the stir of the great Babel and not
feel the crowd.' I knew a lady whose feelings in this
respect strongly resembled those of Cowper, who assured
me, she often wished herself provided like a snail, that she
might peep out securely from her shell, and withdraw in a
moment from a stranger's gaze behind an impenetrable
shield. Such beings find their chief happiness in the
sacred
privacy of home. They leave every public shrine to
keep a constant vigil at the domestic altar. There burns
without ceasing, the fire of their devotion. They turn
from the idols of fashion to worship their household gods.
The fire-side, the accustomed window, the familiar
garden
bound their desires. To happy domestic influences
Cowper owed all the peace of mind he enjoyed. He
eulogized
the blessing with grateful sincerity.
O friendly to the best pursuits of man,
Friendly to thought, to virtue and to peace,
Domestic life in rural leisure passed!
Constant occupation without care, was his ideal of
existence. Even winter was endeared by its
home-enjoyments
.
I crown thee king of intimate delights
Fire-side enjoyments, home-born happiness.
It was here that the poet struck a responsive chord in the
hearts of his countrymen. He sung of the sofaa
memorial
of English comfort; of home the castle of English
happiness and independence;of the newspaperthe
morning and evening pastime of Englishmen;of the
`hissing urn' and `the cups that cheer, but not inebriate'
the peculiar luxury of his native land;of the `
parlor-twilight
,'
the `winter evening,' the `noon-day walk'all
subjects consecrated by national associations. Goldsmith
and Thompson are the poets of rural life, and Cowper
completes the charming triumvirate. The latter's love for
the country was absolute.
I never framed a wish, or formed a plan,
That flattered me with hopes of earthly bliss,
But there I laid the scene.
His description of the pursuits of horticulture, winter
landscapes and rustic pleasures, eloquently betray this
peculiar fondness for the scenery and habits of rural life.
Many of these pictures are unique, and constitute
Cowper's
best title to poetic fame.
SHELLEY
Was cradled into poetry by wrong,
And learned in suffering what he taught in song.
It
is now about eighteen years since the waters of the
Mediterranean closed over one of the most delicately
organized
and richly endowed beings of our era. A scion
of the English aristocracy, the nobility of his soul threw
far into the shade all conventional distinctions; while his
views of life and standard of action were infinitely
broader
and more elevated than the narrow limits of caste.
Highly imaginative, susceptible and brave, even in
boy-hood
he reverenced the honest convictions of his own
mind above success or authority. With a deep thirst for
knowledge, he united a profound interest in his race.
Highly philosophical in his taste, truth was the prize for
which he most earnestly contended; heroical in his
temper
,
freedom he regarded as the dearest boon of existence;
of a tender and ardent heart, love was the grand hope and
consolation of his being, while beauty formed the most
genial element of his existence.
21
Of such a nature, when viewed in a broad light, were
the elements of Shelley's character. Nor is it difficult
to reconcile them with the details of his opinions and the
tenor of his life. It is easy to imagine a state of society
in which such a being might freely develope, and
felicitously
realize principles and endowments so full of
promise
;
while, on the other hand, it is only necessary to
look around on the world as it is, or back upon its past
records, to lose all surprise that this fine specimen of
humanity
was sadly misunderstood and his immediate
influence
perverted. The happy agency which as an
independent
thinker and humane poet might have been
prophecied
of Shelley, presupposed a degree of
consideration
and sympathy, not to say delicacy and reverence, on
the part of society, a wisdom in the process of education,
a scope of youthful experience, an entire integrity of
treatment
,
to be encountered only in the dreams of the
Utopian. To have elicited in forms of unadulterated
good the characteristics of such a nature, when his
being
overflowed, the world should have been to him,
As a golden chalice to bright wine
Which else had sunk into the thirsty dust.
[4]
[4]
Prometheus Unbound.
Instead of this, at the first sparkling of that fountain, the
teachings of the world, and the lessons of life, were
calculated
to dam up its free tide in the formal
embankments
of custom and power. What wonder, then, that
it overleaped such barriers, and wound waywardly aside
into solitude, to hear no sound save its own dashings?
The publication of the posthumous prose
Essays, Letters from Abroad, Translations and Fragments. By
Percy Bysshe Shelley. Edited by Mrs. Shelley: London. 1810.
of Shelley,
is chiefly interesting from the fact that it perfectly
confirms
our best impressions of the man. We here trace
in his confidential letters, the love and philanthropy to
which his muse was devoted. All his literary opinions
evidence the same sincerity. His refined admiration of
nature, his habits of intense study and moral independence,
have not been exaggerated. The noble actions ascribed
to him by partial friends, are proved to be the natural
results
of his native feelings. The peculiar sufferings of
body and mind, of experience and imagination, to which
his temperament and destiny subjected him, have in no
degree been overstated. His generosity and high ideal
of intellectual greatness and human excellence, are more
than indicated in the unstudied outpourings of his
familiar
correspondence.
Love, according to Shelley, is the sum and essence of
goodness. While listening to the organ in the Cathedral
of Pisa, he sighed that charity instead of faith was not
regarded as the substance of universal religion. Self he
considered as the poisonous burr which especially
deformed
modern society; and to overthrow this dark
idolatry, he embarked on a lonely but most honorable
crusade. The impetuosity of youth doubtless gave to
the style of his enterprise an aspect startling to some of
his well-meaning fellow-creatures. All social reformers
must expect to be misinterpreted and reviled. In the
case of Shelley, the great cause for regret is that so few
should have paid homage to his pure and sincere
intentions
;
that so many should have credited the countless
slanders heaped on his name; and that a nature so gifted
and sensitive, should have been selected as the object of
such wilful persecution. The young poet saw men
reposing
supinely upon dogmas, and hiding cold hearts
behind
technical creeds, instead of acting out the sublime
idea of human brotherhood. His moral sense was
shocked
at the injustice of society in heaping contumely upon
an erring woman, while it recognizes and honors the
author
of her disgrace. He saddened at the spectacle so
often
presented, of artificial union in married life, the
enforced
constancy of unsympathizing beings, hearts dying
out in the long struggle of an uncongenial bond. Above
all, his benevolent spirit bled for the slavery of the mass
the superstitious enthralment of the ignorant many. He
looked upon the long procession of his fellow-creatures
plodding gloomily on to their graves, conscious of social
bondage, yet making no effort for freedom, groaning
under
self-imposed burdens, yet afraid to cast them off,
conceiving
better things, yet executing nothing. Many have
felt and still feel thus. Shelley aspired to embody in
action
,
and to illustrate in life and literature the reform
which his whole nature demanded. He dared to lead
forth at a public ball the scorned victim of seduction, and
appal the hypocritical crowd by an act of true moral
courage
.
As a boy, he gave evidence of his attachment to
liberty by overthrowing a system of school tyranny; and
this sentiment, in after life, found scope in his Odes to
the Revolutionists of Spain and Italy. He fearlessly
discussed
the subject of marriage, and argued for
abolishing
an institution which he sincerely believed perverted
the very sentiment upon which it is professedly based.
If I have conformed to the usages of the world, on the
score of matrimony, says one of his letters, it is that
disgrace always attaches to the weaker sex. In relation
to this and other of his theories, the language of a fine
writer in reference to a kindred spirit is justly applicable
to Shelley. He conceived too nobly for his fellows
he raised the standard of morality above the reach of
humanity
;
and, by directing virtue to the most airy and
romantic
heights, made her paths dangerous, solitary, and
impracticable. Shelley entertained a perfect disgust for
the consideration attached to wealth, and observed, with
impatient grief, the shadow property throws over modest
worth and unmonied excellence. Upon this sentiment,
also, he habitually acted. The maintenance of his
opinions
cost him, among other sacrifices, a fine estate. So
constant and profuse was his liberality towards
impoverished
men of letters, and the indigent in general, that he
was obliged to live with great economy. He subjected
himself to serious inconvenience while in Italy, to assist
a friend in introducing steam-navigation on the
Mediterranean
.
It was his disposition to glory in and support
true merit wherever he found it. He was one of the first
to recognize the dawning genius of Mrs. Hemans, to
whom he addressed a letter of encouragement when she
was a mere girl. He advocated a dietetic reform, from a
strong conviction that abstinence from spirituous liquors
and animal food, would do much to renovate the human
21*
race. Upon this idea his own habits were based. But
the most obnoxious of Shelley's avowed opinions, was
his non-concurrence in the prevalent system of Religion.
To the reflective student of his writings, however, the
poet's atheism is very different from what interested
critics
have made it. School and its associations were
inexpressibly
trying to his free and sensitive nature; and
a series of puzzling questions of a metaphysical
character
,
which he encountered in the course of his recreative
reading, planted the seeds of skepticism in his mind,
which enforced religious observances and unhappy
experience
soon fertilized. Queen Mab, the production
of a collegian in his teens, is rather an attack upon a
creed than Christianity; and was never published with
the author's consent. It should be considered as the
crude outbreak of juvenile talent eager to make trial of
the new weapons furnished by the logic of Eton. Yet it
was impertinently dragged into notice to blight the new
and rich flowers of his maturer genius, and meanly
quoted
against Shelley in the chancery suit by which he was
deprived of his children. Instead of smiling at its
absurdities
,
or rejecting, with similar reasoning its arguments,
the force of authority, the very last to alarm such a spirit,
was alone resorted to. What wonder if the ardent boy's
doubts of the popular system was increased, his views of
social degradation confirmed; that he came to regard
custom
as the tyrant of the universe, and proposed to abandon
a world from whose bosom he had been basely spurned?
If an intense attachment to truth, and an habitual spirit
of disinterestedness constitute any part of religion,
Shelley
was eminently religious. For the divine character
portrayed in the Gospels, he probably, in his latter years,
had a truer reverence than the majority of Christians.
If we are to credit one of his most intimate friends, the
Beatitudes constituted his delight and embodied his
principles
of faith. As far as the Deity is worshipped by a
profound sensibility to the wonders and beauty of his
universe, a tender love of his creatures and a cherished
veneration for the highest revelations of humanity, the
calumniated poet was singularly devout. Fools rush
in where angels fear to tread, is true of human conduct
not less in its so called religious than its other aspects.
We live in an atmosphere of doubt. To attain to clear
and unvarying convictions, in regard to the mysteries of
our being, is not the lot of all. There are those who
cannot choose but wonder at the unbounded confidence
of theologians. It is comparatively easy to be a
churchgoer
,
to conform to religious observances, to acquiesce in
prevailing opinions; but to how many all this is but a
part of the mere machinery of life! There are those who
are slow to profess and quick to feel, who can only bow
in meekness, and hope with trembling. Shelley's nature
was peculiarly reverential, but he entertained certain
speculative
doubtsand with the ordinary displays of
Christianity
he could not sympathize. The popular conception
of the Divinity did not meet his wants; and so the world
attached to him the brand of atheist, and, under this
anathema
,
hunted him down. The shapings of our
Heavens
,
says Lamb, are the modificatiens of our constitu
tions. Shelley's ideal nature modified his religious
sentiment
.
I loved, I know not what; but this low sphere
And all that it contains, contains not thee:
Thou whom seen nowhere, I feel everywhere,
Dim object of my soul's idolatry.
[5]
[5]
The Zucca.
His Hymn to Intellectual Beauty is instinct with the
spirit of pure devotion, directed to the highest conception
of his nature. Unthinking, indeed, is he who can for a
moment believe that such a being could exist without
adoration
.
Dr. Johnson says that Milton grew old without
any visible worship. The opinions of Shelley are no
more to be regarded as an index to his heart, than the
blind bard's quiet musings as a proof that the fire of
devotion
did not burn within. Shelley's expulsion from
college
,
for questioning the validity of Christianity, or
perhaps
more justly, asserting its abuses, was the turning
point in his destiny. This event, following immediately
upon the disappointment of his first attachment, stirred
the very depths of his natureand in all probability,
transformed the future man, from a good English squire,
to a politician and reformer. Then came his premature
marriage, to which impulsive gratitude was the blind
motive
,
the bitter consequences of his error, his divorce and
separation from his children, his new and happy
connection
founded on true affection and intellectual sympathy,
his adventurous exile and sudden death. How long, we
are tempted to ask in calmly reviewing his life, will it re
quire, in this age of wonders, for the truth to be recognized
that opinions are independent of the will, and therefore
not, in themselves, legitimate subjects of moral
approbation
or blame? It has been said that the purposes of
men most truly indicate their characters. Where can we
find an individual in modern history of more exalted aims
than Shelley? While a youth, he was wont to stray from
his fellows, and thoughtfully resolve
To be wise
And just and free and mild.
[6]
[6]
Revolt of Islam.
When suffering poverty in London, after his
banishment
,
his benevolence found exercise in the hospitals,
which he daily visited to minister to the victims of pain
and disease. The object of constant malice, he never
degenerated into a satirist.
Alas, good friend, what profit can you see
In hating such a hateless thing as me?
There is no sport in hate, when all the rage
Is on one side.
Of your antipathy
If I am the Narcissus, you are free
To pine into a sound with hating me.
Sonnet.
Though baffled in his plans, and cut off from frequent
enjoyment by physicial anguish, love and hope still
triumphed over misanthropy and despair. He was adored
by his friends, and beloved by the poor. Even Byron
curbed his passions at Shelley's wise rebuke, hailed him
as his better angel, and transfused something of his
elevated
tone into the later emanations of his genius.
Fearless he was and scorning all disguise,
What he dared do or think, though men might start,
He spoke with mild yet unaverted eyes;
Liberal he was of soul and frank of heart;
And to his dearest friends, who loved him well,
Whate'er he knew or felt he would impart.
[7]
[7]
Prince Athanase.
And yet this is the man who was disgraced and banned
for his opinionsdeemed by a court of his country
unworthy
to educate his own childrendisowned by his
kindred, and forced from his native land! What a
reflection
to a candid mind, that slander long prevented
acquaintance
and communion between Shelley and Lamb!
How disgusting the thought of those vapid faces of the
travelling English, who have done more to disenchant
Italy than all her beggars, turned in scorn from the poet,
as they encountered him on the Pincian or Lung'Arno!
With what indignation do we think of that beautiful head
being defaced by a blow! Yet we are told, when Shelley
was inquiring for letters at a continental post-office, some
ruffian, under color of the common prejudice, upon
hearing
his name, struck him to the earth.
As a poet Shelley was strikingly original. He
maintained
the identity of poetry and philosophy; and the
bent of his genius seems to have been to present
philosophical
speculations, and beautiful idealisms of moral
excellence, in poetical forms. He was too fond of looking
beyond the obvious and tangible to form a merely
descriptive
poet, and too metaphysical in his taste to be a purely
sentimental one. He has neither the intense egotism of
Byron, nor the simple fervor of Burns. In general, the
scope of his poems is abstract, abounding in wonderful
displays of fancy and allegorical invention. Of these
qualities, the Revolt of Islam is a striking example. This
lack of personality and directness, prevents the poetry of
Shelley from impressing the memory like that of Mrs.
Hemans or Moore. His images pass before the mind like
frost-work at moonlight, strangely beautiful, glittering and
rare, but of transient duration, and dream-like interest.
Hence, the great body of his poetry can never be
popular
.
Of this he seemed perfectly aware. Prometheus
Unbound, according to his own statement, was composed
with a view to a very limited audience; and the Cenci,
which was written according to more popular canons of
taste, cost him great labor. The other dramas of Shelley
are cast in classical moulds, not only as to form but in
tone and spirit; and scattered through them are some of
the most splendid gems of expression and metaphor to be
found in the whole range of English poetry. Although
these classical dramas seem to have been most congenial
to the poet's taste, there is abundant evidence of his
superior
capacity in more popular schools of his art. For
touching beauty, his Lines written in Dejection near
Naples, is not surpassed by any similar lyric; and his
Sky-Lark is perfectly buoyant with the very music it
commemorates. Julian and Maddalo was written
according
to Leigh Hunt's theory of poetical diction, and is
a graceful specimen of that style. But The Cenci is
the greatest evidence we have of the poet's power over his
own genius. Horrible and difficult of refined treatment
as is the subject, with what power and tact is it developed!
When I beheld the pensive loveliness of Beatrice's
portrait
at the Barbarini palace, it seemed as if the painter
had exhausted the ideal of her story. Shelley's tragedy
should be read with that exquisite painting before the
imagination. The poet has surrounded it with an
interest
surpassing the limner's art. For impressive effect
upon the reader's mind, exciting the emotions of terror
and pity which tragedy aims to produce, how few
modern dramas can compare with The Cenci!
Perhaps
Adonais is the most characteristic of Shelley's
poems. It was written under the excitement of sympathy;
and while the style and images are peculiar to the poet, an
uncommon degree of natural sentiment vivifies this elegy.
In dwelling upon its pathetic numbers, we seem to trace
in the fate of Keats, thus poetically described, Shelley's
own destiny depicted by the instinct of his genius.
O, weep for Adonais!The quick Dreams,
The passion-winged Ministers of thought,
Who were his flocks, whom near the living streams
Of his young spirit he fed, and whom he taught
The love which was its music, wander not,
Wander no more.
`O gentle child, beautiful as thou wert,
Why didst thou leave the trodden paths of men
Too soon, and with weak hands though mighty heart,
Dare the unpastured dragon in his den,
Defenceless as thou wert, oh! where was then
Wisdom the mirror'd shield, or scorn the spear?
Or hadst thou waited the full cycle, when
Thy spirit should have fill'd its crescent sphere,
The monsters of life's waste had fled from thee like deer.
Nor let us weep that our delight is fled
Far from these carrion-kites that scream below;
He wakes or sleeps with the enduring dead;
Thou canst not soar where he is sitting now.
Dust to the dust! but the pure spirit shall flow
Back to the burning fountain whence it came,
A portion of the Eternal.
He has outsoar'd the shadow of our night;
Envy and calumny, and hate and pain,
And that unrest which men miscall delight,
Can touch him not and torture not again;
From the contagion of the world's slow stain
He is secure, and now can never mourn
A heart grown cold, a head grown gray in vain;
Nor, when the spirit's self has ceased to burn,
With sparkless ashes load an unlamented urn.
The inheritors of unfulfilled renown,
Rose from their thrones built beyond mortal thought
Far in the Unapparent.
`Thou art become as one of us,' they cry.
And he is gather'd to the kings of thought
Who waged contention with their time's decay,
And of the past are all that cannot pass away.
Life, like a dome of many-color'd glass,
Stains the white radiance of Eternity,
Until Death tramples it to fragments.
My spirit's bark is driven
Far from the shore, far from the trembling throng
Whose sails were never to the tempest given.
22
The elements of Shelley's genius were rarely mingled.
The grand in nature delighted his muse. Volcanoes and
glaciers, Alpine summits and rocky caverns filled his
fancy
.
It was his joy to pass the spring-days amid the ruined
baths of Caracalla, and to seek the corridors of the
Coliseum
at moonlight. He loved to watch the growth of
thunder-showers, and to chronicle his dreams.
German
literature, to which he was early attracted,
probably
originated much of his taste for the wild and
wonderful
.
Plato and the Greek poets, sculpture and solitude,
fed his spirit. Such ideas as that of will unconquered by
tyranny, the brave endurance of suffering, legends like
the Wandering Jewthe poetry of evil as depicted in
the Book of JobParadise Lost, the story of
Prometheus
,
and the traditions of The Cenci, interested
him profoundly. He revelled in the tempestuous
loveliness
of terror. The sea was Shelley's idol. Some of
his happiest hours were passed in a boat. The easy
motion
,
Active without toil or stress,
Passive without listliness,
probably soothed his excitable temperament; while the
expause of wave and sky, the countless phenomena of
cloud and billow, and the awful grandeur of storms
entranced
his soul. Hence his favorite illustrations are drawn
from the sea, and many of them are as perfect pearls of
poesy as ever the adventurous diver rescued from the deep
of imagination. Nor were they obtained without severe
struggle and earnest application. Shelley's life was in
tense, and although only in his thirtieth year when his
beloved element wrapped him in the embrace of death, the
snows of premature age already flecked his auburn locks;
and, in sensation and experience, he was wont to say, he
had far outsped the calendar. Shelley was a true
disciple
of love. He maintained with rare eloquence the
spontaneity and sanctity of the passion, and sought to
realize the ideal of his affections with all a poet's
earnestness
.
Alastor typifies the vain search.
Timethe great healer of wounded heartsthe mighty
vindicator of injured worthis rapidly dispersing the
mists which have hitherto shrouded the fame of Shelley.
Sympathy for his sufferings, and a clearer insight into his
motives, are fast redeeming his name and influence.
Whatever views his countrymen may entertain, there
is a kind of living posterity in this young republic,
who judge of genius by a calm study of its fruits,
wholly uninfluenced by the distant murmur of local
prejudice
and party rage. To such, the thought of Shelley is
hallowed by the aspirations and spirit of love with which
his verse overflows; and in their pilgrimage to the old
world, they turn aside from the more august ruins of Rome,
to muse reverently upon the poet, where
One keen pyramid with wedge sublime,
Pavilioning the dust of him who plann'd
This refuge for his memory, doth stand
Like flame transform'd to marble; and beneath,
A field is spread, on which a newer band
Have pitched in Heaven's smile their camp of death,
Welcoming him we love with scarce extinguish'd breath.
[8]
[8]
Adonais.
Note
.This article having been censured and misunderstood, the
following letter was afterwards published in the magazine in which it
appeared.
Your letter informing me of the manner in which
some of your readers have seen fit to regard my remarks
on Shelley, is at hand. I am at a loss to conceive how
any candid or discriminating mind can view the article
in question as a defence of Shelley's opinions. It was
intended rather to place the man himself in a more just
point of view, than that which common prejudice assigns
him. I only contend that mere opinionsespecially those
of early youth, do not constitute the only or the best
criterion of character. I have spoken in defence rather
of Shelley's tendencies and real purposes, than of his
theories, and endeavored to vindicate what was truly lovely
and noble in his nature. To these gifts and graces the
many have long been blinded. We have heard much of
Shelley's atheistical philosophy and little of his benevolent
heart, much of his boyish infidelity and little of his kind
acts and elevated sentiments. That I have attempted to
call attention to these characteristics of the poet, I
cannot
regret; and to me such a course seems perfectly
consistent with a rejection of his peculiar views of society
and religion. These we know were in a great degree
visionary and contrary to well established principles of
human nature. Still they were ever undergoing
modifications
,
and his heart often anticipated the noblest
teachings
of faith. A careful study of the life and writings
of Shelley, will narrow the apparent chasm between
him and the acknowledged ornaments of our race. It
will lead us to trace much that is obnoxious in his views
to an aggravated experience of ill, and to discover in
the inmost sanctuary of his soul much to venerate
and love, much that will sanctify the genius which
the careless and bigoted regard as having been wholly
desecrated.
One of your correspondents says I do not pretend to
be minutely acquainted with the details of his life, having
never read his letters recently published. And yet,
confessedly ignorant of the subject, as he is, he yet goes on
to repeat and exaggerate the various slanders which have
been heaped upon the name of one who I still believe
should rank among the most noble characters of modern
times. It is not a little surprising that while, in all
questions
of science, men deem the most careful inquiry
requisite
to form just conclusions, in those infinitely more
subtle and holy inquiries which relate to human character,
they do not scruple to yield to the most reckless prejudice.
Far otherwise do I look upon such subjects. When an
individual has given the most undoubted proof of high
and generous character, I reverence human nature too
much to credit every scandalous rumor, or acquiesce in
the suggestions of malevolent criticism, regarding him.
Had your correspondent examined conscientiously the
history of Shelley, he would have discovered that he never
abandoned his wife, and thus drove her to self-destruction.
They were wholly unfit companions. Shelley married her
from gratitude, for the kind care she took of him in
illness
.
It was the impulsive act of a generous but
thoughtless
youth. They separated by mutual consent, and
sometime elapsed before she committed suicide. That
22*
event is said to have overwhelmed Shelley with grief, not
that he felt himself in any manner to blame, but that he
had not sufficiently considered his wife's incapacity for
self-government, and provided by suitable care for so
dreadful an exigency. After this event, Shelley married
Miss Godwin, with whom he enjoyed uninterrupted
domestic felicity during the short remainder of his life.
His conduct accorded perfectly with the views, and, in a
great measure, with the practice of Milton. With that
prying injustice, which characterizes the English press,
in relation to persons holding obnoxious opinions, the
facts were misrepresented, and Shelley described as one of
the most cruel monsters. So much for his views of
Religion
and Marriage. A Friend to Virtue is shocked
at my remark, that opinions are not in themselves
legitimate
subjects of moral approbation or censure. He
should have quoted the whole sentence. The reason
adduced is, that they are
independent of the will
.
This I maintain to be correct. I know not what are the
grounds upon which A Friend of Virtue estimates his
kind. For myself, it is my honest endeavor to look
through the web of opinion, and the environment of
circumstances, to the
heart
. Intellectual constitutions
differ essentially. They are diversified by more or less
imagination and reasoning power, and are greatly
influenced
by early impressions. Accordingly, it is very
rarely that we find two individuals who think precisely
alike on any subject. Even in the same person opinions
constantly change. Their formation originally depends
upon the peculiar traits of mind with which the individual
is endowed. His particular moral and mental experience
afterward modifies them, so that, except as far as faithful
inquiry goes, he is not responsible in the premises. We
must then look to the heart, the native disposition, the
feelings, if we would really know a man. Thus
regarded
,
Shelley has few equals. Speculatively he may have
been an Atheist; in his inmost soul he was a Christian.
This may appear paradoxical, but I believe it is more
frequently
the case than we are aware. An inquiring,
argumentative
mind, may often fail in attaining settled
convictions
;
while at the same time the moral nature is so
true and active, that the heart, as Wordsworth says, may
do God's work and know it not. Thus I believe it
was with Shelley. Veneration was his predominant
sentiment
.
His biographer and intimate friend, Leigh
Hunt, says of him, He was pious towards nature
towards
his friendstowards the whole human race
towards
the meanest insect of the forest. He did himself
an injustice with the public, in using the popular name
of the Supreme Being inconsiderately. He identified it
solely with the most tyrannical notions of God, made
after
the worst human fashion; and did not sufficiently
reflect
that it was often used by a juster devotion to express
a sense of the Great Mover of the Universe. An
impatience
in contradicting worldly and pernicious notions of
a supernatural power, led his own aspirations to be
unconstrued
.
As has been justly remarked by a writer
eminent for his piety`the greatest want of religious
feeling
is not to be found among the greatest infidels, but
among those who only think of religion as a matter of
course.' The more important the proposition, the more
he thought himself bound to investigate it; the greater the
demand upon his assent, the less upon their own
principles
of reasoning he thought himself bound to grant it.
Logical training was the last to which such a nature as
Shelley's should have been subjected. Under this
discipline
at Oxford, he viewed all subjects through the
medium
of mere reason. Exceedingly fond of argument,
in a spirit of adventurous boldness he turned the
weappons
furnished him by his teachers, against the venerable
form of Christianity, and wrote Queen Mab. Be it
remembered
,
however, he never published it. The MSS
was thus disposed of without his knowledge, and against
his will. Yet at this very time his fellow-student tells us
that Shelley studied fifteen hours a-daylived chiefly
upon bread, in order to save enough from his limited
income
to assist poor scholarsstopped in his long walks
to give an orange to a gipsey-boy, or purchase milk for
a destitute childtalked constantly of plans for the
amelioration
of societywas roused to the warmest
indignation
by every casual instance of oppressionyielded up
his whole soul to the admiration of moral excellence
and worshipped truth in every form with a singleness of
heart, and an ardor of feeling, as rare as it was inspiring.
He was, according to the same and kindred testimony,
wholly unaffected in manner, full of genuine modesty,
and possessed by an insatiable thirst for knowledge.
Although
a devoted student, his heart was unchilled by
mental application. He at that time delighted in the
Platonic doctrine of the prexistence of the soul, and loved
to believe that all knowledge now acquired is but
reminiscence
.
Gentle and affectionate to all, benevolent to a
fault, and deeply loved by all who knew him, it was his
misfortune to have an early experience of ill, to be thrown
rudely upon the worldto be misunderstood and
slandered
,
and especially to indulge the wild speculations of an
ardent mind without the slightest
worldly prudence
.
Shelley, phrenologically speaking, had no organ of
cautiousness
.
Hence his virtues and graces availed him not
in the world, much as they endeared him to those who
enjoyed his intimacy. In these remarks I would not be
misunderstood. I do not subscribe to Shelley's opinions.
I regret that he thought as he did upon many subjects for
his own sake as well as for that of society. The great
mass of his poetry is not congenial to my taste. And
yet these considerations do not blind me to the rare
quality
of his geniusto the native independence of his mind
to the noble aspirations after the beautiful and the true,
which glowed in his soul. I honor Shelley as that rare
charactera
sincere
man. I venerate his generous
sentiments
.
I recognise in him qualities which I seldom find
among the passive recipients of opinionthe tame
followers
of routine. I know how much easier it is to
conform
prudently to social institutions; but, as far as my
experience goes, they are full of error, and do great
injustice
to humanity. I respect the man who in sincerity
of purpose discusses their claims, even if I cannot
coincide
in his views. Nor is this all. I cannot lose sight
of the fact, that Shelley's nature is but partially revealed
to us. We have as it were a few stray gleams of his
wayward orb. Had it fully risen above the horizon
instead
of being prematurely quenched in the sea, perchance
its beams would have clearly reflected at last, the holy
effulgence
of the Star of Bethlehem. Let us pity, if we will, the
errors of Shelley's judgment; but let not prejudice blind
us to his merits. His life, says his wife, was spent
in arduous study, and in acts of kindness and affection.
To see him was to love him. Surely there is a
redeeming
worth in the memory of one whose bosom was ever
ready to support the weary brow of a brotherwhose
purposes were high and truewhose heart was enamored
of beauty, and devoted to his race:
if this fail,
The pillared firmament is rottenness,
And earth's base built on stubble.
BURNS.
There
are certain sentiments which give the world
assurance of a
man
. They are inborn, not acquired.
Before them fade away the trophies of scholarship and the
badges of authority. They are the most endearing of
human
attractions. No process of culture, no mere grace of
manner, no intellectual endowment, can atone for their
absence, or successfully imitate their charms. These
sentiments redeem our nature; their indulgence
constitutes
the better moments of life. Without them we grow
mechanical in action, formal in manner, pedantic in mind.
With them in freshness and vigor, we are true,
spontaneous
,
morally alive. We reciprocate affection, we
luxuriate
in the embrace of nature, we breathe an atmosphere of
love, and glow in the light of beauty. Frankness, manly
independence, deep sensibility and pure enthusiasm are
the characteristics of the true man. Against these
fashion
,
trade and the whole train of petty interests wage an
unceasing war. In few hearts do they survive; but
wherever recognized they carry every unperverted soul
back to childhood and up to God. They vindicate
human nature with irresistible eloquence, and like the
air of mountains and the verdure of valleys, allure
us from the thoroughfare of routine and the thorny
path of destiny. When combined with genius, they
utter an appeal to the world, and their possessor
becomes
a priest of humanity, whose oracles send forth an
echo even from the chambers of death. Such is
Robert
Burns
. How refreshing, to turn from the
would-be-prophets
of the day, and contemplate the inspired ploughman!
No mystic emblems deform his message. We have no
hieroglyphics to decipher. We need no philosophic critic
at our elbow. It is a brother who speaks to us;no
singular
specimen of spiritual pride, but a creature of flesh
and blood. We can hear the beatings of his brave heart,
not always like a muffled drum, but often with the joy
of solemn victory. We feel the grasp of his
toil-hardened
hand. We see the pride on his brow, the tear in his
eye, the smile on his lip. We behold not an effigy of
buried learning, a tame image from the mould of fashion,
but a free, cordial, earnest man;one with whom we can
roam the hills, partake the cup, praise the maiden, or
worship the stars. He is a human creature, only
overflowing
with the characteristics of humanity. To him
belong in large measure the passions and the powers of
his race. He professes no exemption from the common
lot. He pretends not to live on rarer elements. He
expects
not to be ethereal before death. He conceals not
his share of frailty, nor turns aside from penance. He
takes `with equal thanks' a sermon or a song. No one
prays more devoutly; but the same ardor fires his earthly
loves. The voice that wales a portion with judicious
care, anon is attuned to the convivial song. The same
eye that glances with poetic awe upon the hills at
twilight
,
gazes with a less subdued fervor on the winsome
features of the Highland lassie. And thus vibrated the
poet's heart from earth to heaven,from the human to the
godlike. Rarely and richly were mingled in him the
elements of human nature. His crowning distinction is
a larger soul; and this he carried into all things,to the
altar of God and the festive board, to the ploughshare's
furrow and the letter of friendship, to the martial lyric
and the lover's assignation. That such a soul should
arise in the midst of poverty is a blessing. So do men
learn that all their appliances are as nothing before the
creative
energy of nature. They may make a Parr; she
alone can give birth to a Burns. It is to be rejoiced at
that so noble a brother was born in a clay-built cottage.
Had his eyes first opened in a palace, so great a joy would
not have descended upon the lowly and the toil-worn.
These can now more warmly boast of a common lineage.
Perchance, too, that fine spirit would have been meddled
with till quite undone, had it first appeared in the
dwelling
of a wealthy citizen. Books and teachers, perhaps,
would have subdued its elastic freedom,artificial society
perverted its heaven-born fire. Better that its discipline
was found in labor and sorrow, rather than in social
restraint and conformity. Better that it erred through
excess
of passion, than deliberate hypocrisy. So rich a
stream is less marred by overflowing its bounds than by
23
growing shallow. It was nobler to yield to temptation
from wayward appetite than through malignity or
design
.
More worthy is it that melancholy should take
the form of a sad sympathy with nature, than a bitter
hatred
of man; that the flowers of the heart should be
blighted by the heat of its lava-soil, than wither in the
deadening air of artificial life. Burns lost not the
susceptibility
of his conscience, or the sincerity and
manliness
of his character. In a higher sphere of life, these
characteristics would have been infinitely more exposed.
The muse of Burns is distinguished by a pensive
tenderness
.
His mind was originally of a reflective cast. His
education, destiny and the scenery amid which he lived
deepened this trait, and made it prevailing. True
sensibility
is the fertile source of sadness. A heart constantly
alive to the vicissitudes of life and the pathetic appeals of
nature, cannot long maintain a lightsome mood. From
his profound feeling sprang the beauties of the Scottish
bard. He who could so pity a wounded hare and elegize
a crushed daisy, whose young bosom favorites were Sterne
and Mackenzie, lost not a single sob of the storm, nor
failed to mark the gray cloud and the sighing trees. In
this intense sympathy with the mournful, exists the germ
of true poetical elevation. The very going out into the
vastly sad, is sublime. Personal cares are forgotten;
and as Byron calls upon us to forget our petty misery
in view of the mighty ruins of Rome, so the dirges of
Nature invite us into a grand funereal hall, where mortal
sighs are lost in mightier wailing. This element of
pensiveness
distinguishes alike the poetry and character of
Burns. He tells us of the exalted sensations he
experienced
on an autumn morning, when listening to the
cry of a troop of grey plover or the solitary whistle of the
curlew. The elements raged around him as he
composed
Bannockburn, and he loved to write at night, or
during a cloudy day, being most successful in a
gloamin'
shot at the muses.
There was a through and pervading honesty about
Burns,that freedom from disguise and simple truth of
character, to the preservation of which rustic life is
eminently
favorable. He was open and frank in social
intercourse
,
and his poems are but the sincere records and
outpourings of his native feelings.
Just now I've ta'en the fit o' rhyme,
My barmie noddle's working prime
My fancy yerkit up sublime
Wi' hasty summon:
Hae ye a leisure-moment's time
To hear what's comin?
Hence he almost invariably wrote from strong emotion.
My passions, he says, raged like so many devils
until they found vent in rhyme. This entire
truthfulness
is one of the greatest charms of his verse. For the
most part song, satire and lyric come warm from his
heart. Insincerity and pretension completely disgusted
him. Scarcely does he betray the slightest impatience of
his fellows, except in exposing and ridiculing these traits.
Holy Willie's prayer and a few similar effusions were
penned as protests against bigotry and presumption.
Burns was too devotional to bear calmly the abuses of
region
.
God knows, I'm not the thing I should be,
Nor am I even the thing I could be,
But twenty times, I rather would be,
An' atheist clean
Than under Gospel colors hid be,
Just for a screen.
But satire was not his element. Rather did he love to
give expression to benevolent feeling and generous
affection
.
The native liberality of his nature cast a mantle of
charity over the errors of his kind, in language which, for
touching simplicity, has never been equalled.
Then gently scan your brother man,
Still gentler sister woman;
Tho' they may gang a kennin wrang;
To step aside is human:
One point must still be greatly dark,
The moving why they do it:
And just as lamely can ye mark,
How far perhaps they rue it.
Wha made the heart, 'tis
He
alone
Decidedly can try us,
He knows each chordits various tone,
Each spring, its various bias:
Then at the balance let's be mute,
We never can adjust it;
What's
done
we partly may compute,
But know not what's resisted.
Burns had a truly noble soul. He cherished an honest
ride. Obligation oppressed him, and with all his
rusticity
he firmly maintained his dignity in the polished
circles
of Edinburgh. Like all manly hearts, while he
keenly felt the sting of poverty, his whole nature
recoiled
from dependence. He desired money, not for the
distinction
and pleasure it brings, but chiefly that he might
be free from the world. He recorded the creed of the
true man;
To catch dame Fortune's golden smile,
Assiduous wait upon her;
And gather gear by ev'ry wile
That's justified by honor;
Not for to hide it in a hedge,
Not for a train-attendant;
But for the glorious privilege
Of being independent.
His susceptibility to Nature was quick and impassioned.
He hung with rapture over the hare-bell, fox-glove,
budding
birch and hoary hawthorn. Though chiefly alive to
its sterner aspects, every phase of the universe was
inexpressibly
dear to him.
O Nature! a' thy shows an' forms
To feeling, pensive hearts hae charms!
Whether the simmer kindly warms,
Wi' life an' light,
Or winter howls, in gusty storms,
The lang, dark night!
How delightful to see the victim of poverty and care thus
yield up his spirit in blest oblivion of his lot. He walked
beside the river, climhed the hill and wandered over the
moor, with a more exultant step and more bounding heart
than ever conqueror knew. In his hours of sweet reverie,
all consciousness was lost of outward poverty, in the
richness
23*
of a gifted spirit. Then he looked upon creation as
his heritage. He felt drawn to her by the glowing bond
of a kindred spirit. Every wild-flower from which he
brushed the dew, every mountain-top to which his eyes
were lifted, every star that smiled upon his path, was a
token and a pledge of immortality. He partook of their
freedom and their beauty; and held fond communion
with their silent loveliness. The banks of the Doon
became
like the bowers of Paradise, and Mossgiel was as a
glorious kingdom.
Gie me ae spark o' Nature's fire,
That's a' the learning I desire;
Then tho' I drudge thro' dub an' mire
At pleugh or cart,
My muse, tho' hamely in attire,
May touch the heart.
That complete self-abandonment, characteristic of poets,
belonged strikingly to Burns. He threw himself, all
sensitive
and ardent as he was, into the arms of Nature.
He surrendered his heart unreservedly to the glow of
social
pleasure, and sought with equal heartiness the peace
of domestic retirement.
But why o' death begin a tale?
Just now we're living sound and hale,
Then top and maintop crowd the sail,
Heave care o'er side!
And large, before enjoyment's gale,
Let's tak the tide.
This life has joys for you and I,
And joys that riches ne'er could buy,
And joys the very best.
There's a' the pleasures o' the heart,
The lover and the frien;
Ye hae your Meg, your dearest part,
And I my darling Jean!
He sinned, and repented, with the same singleness of
purpose, and completeness of devotion. This is
illustrated
in many of his poems. In his love and grief, in his
joy and despair, we find no medium;
By passion driven;
And yet the light that led astray
Was light from heaven.
Perhaps the freest and deepest element of the poetry of
Burns, is love. With the first awakening of this passion
in his youthful breast, came also the spirit of poetry.
My heart, says one of his letters, was complete
tinder
,
and eternally lighted up by some goddess or other.
He was one of those susceptible men to whom love is no
fiction or fancy; to whom it is not only a strong
necessity
,
but an overpowering influence. To female
attractions
he was a complete slave. An eye, a tone, a
grasp of the hand, exercised over him the sway of
destiny
.
His earliest and most blissful adventures were
following
in the harvest with a bonnie lassie, or picking
nettles out of a fair one's hand. He had no armor of
philosophy wherewith to resist the spell of beauty.
Genius
betrayed rather than absolved him; and his soul found
its chief delight and richest inspiration in the luxury of
loving.
O happy love! where love like this is found.
O heart-felt raptures! bliss beyond compare!
I've paced much this weary
mortal round
,
And sage experience bids me this declare
If heaven a draught of heavenly pleasure spare,
One cordial in this melancholy vale,
'Tis when a youthful, loving, modest pair,
In others' arms breathe out the tendar tale,
Beneath the milk-white thorn, that scents the evening gale.
And yet the love of Burns was poetical chiefly in its
expression
.
He loved like a man. His was no mere
sentimental
passion, but a hearty attachment. He sighed
not over the pride of a Laura, nor was satisfied with a
smile of distant encouragement. Genuine passion was
only vivified and enlarged in his heart by a poetical mind.
He arrayed his rustic charmer with few ideal attractions.
His vows were paid to
A creature not too bright or good
For human nature's daily food;
For transient sorrows, simple wiles,
Praise, blame, love, kisses, tears and smiles.
Her positive and tangible graces were enough for him.
He sought not to exalt them, but only to exhibit the
fervor
of his attachment. Even in his love was there this
singular honesty. Exaggerated flattery does not mark
his amatory poems, but a warm expression of his
passionate
regard, a sweet song over the joys of affection.
Perhaps
no poet has better depicted true love, in its most
common manifestation. Of the various objects of his
regard
,
the only one who seems to have inspired any
purely
poetical sentiment was Highland Mary. Their solemn
parting on the banks of the Ayr, and her early death, are
familiar to every reader of Burns. Her memory seemed
consecrated to his imagination, and he has made it
immortal
by his beautiful lines to Mary in Heaven. Nor
was the Scottish bard unaware how deep an inspiration
he derived from the gentler sex. He tells us that when he
desired to feel the pure spirit of poetry and obey
successfully
its impulse, he put himself on a regimen of
admiring
a fine woman.
Health to the sex, ilk guid chiel says,
Wi' merry dance in winter days,
An' we to share in common;
The gust o' joy, the balm of woe,
The soul o' life, the heaven below,
Is rapture-giving woman.
And of all the agencies of life there is none superior to
this. Written eloquence, the voice of the bard, the music
of creation, will often fail to awaken the heart. We
cannot
always yield ourselves to the hidden spell. But in the
soft light of
her
eye genius basks, till it is warmed into a
new and sweeter life. The poet is indeed kindled by
communion with the most lovely creation of God, He
is subdued by the sweetest of human influences. His
wings are plumed beside the fountain of love, and he soars
thence to heaven.
The poetical temperament is now better and more
generally
understood than formerly. Physiologists and moral
philosophers have labored, not without success, to diffuse
correct ideas of its laws and liabilities. Education now
averts, in frequent instances, the fatal errors to which
beings
thus organized are peculiarly exposed. No one has
more truly described some features of the poet's fate
than the author of Tam O'Shanter and the Cotter's
Saturday
Night:
Creature, though oft the prey of care and sorrow,
When blest to-day, unmindful of to-morrow;
A being formed t' amuse his graver friends,
Admired and praisedand there the homage ends;
A mortal quite unfit for fortune's strife,
Yet oft the sport of all the ills of life;
Prone to enjoy each pleasure riches give,
Yet haply wanting wherewithal to live;
Longing to wipe each tear, to heal each groan,
Yet frequent all unheeded in his own.
The love of excitement, the physical and moral
sensibility
,
the extremes of mood, which belong to this class of
men, require a certain discipline on the one hand and
indulgence
on the other, which is now more readily
accorded
.
Especially do we look with a more just eye upon the
frailties of poets. It is not necessary to defend them.
They are only the more lamentable from being connected
with high powers. But it is a satisfaction to trace their
origin to unfavorable circumstances of life and peculiarities
of organization. Burns labored under the disadvantage
of a narrow and oppressive destiny, opposed to a
sensitive
and exalted soul. From the depths of obscure
poverty
he awoke to fame. Strong and adroit as he was at
the several vocations of husbandry, he possessed no tact
as a manager or financier. With the keenest relish for
enjoyment, his means were small, and the claims of his
family unceasing. Susceptible to the most refined
influences
of nature, quick of apprehension, and endowed with
a rich fancy, his animal nature was not less strongly
developed
.
His flaming heart lighted not only the muse's
torch, but the tempest of passion. He often sought to
drown care in excess. He did not faithfully struggle
with the allurements which in reality he despised. How
deeply he felt the transitory nature of human enjoyment,
he has told us in a series of beautiful similes:
But pleasures are like poppies spread,
You seize the flow'r, its bloom is shed;
Or like the snow falls in the river,
A moment whitethen melts for ever;
Or like the borealis race,
That flit ere you can point their place;
Or like the rainbow's lovely form
Evanishing amid the storm.
Tossed on the waves of an incongruous experience,
elevated
by his gifts, depressed by his condition, the heir of
fame, but the child of sorrowgloomy in view of his
actual
prospects, elated by his poetic visions,the life of
Burns was no ordinary scene of trial and temptation.
While we pity, let us reverence him. Let us glory in
such fervent song as he dedicated to love, friendship,
patriotism
and nature. True bursts of feeling came from
the honest bosom of the ploughman. Sad as was his
career
at Dumfries, anomalous as it seems to picture him
as an exciseman, how delightful his image as a noble
peasant and ardent bard! What a contradiction between
his human existence and his inspired soul! Literature
enshrines few more endeared memorials than the poems
of Burns. His lyre is wreathed with wild-flowers. Its
tones are simple and glowing. Their music is like the
cordial breeze of his native hills. It still cheers the
banquet
,
and gives expression to the lover's thought. Its
pensive melody has a twilight sweetness; its tender
ardor
is melting as the sunbeams. Around the cottage and
the moor, the scene of humble affection, the rite of lowly
piety, it has thrown a hallowed influence, which embalms
the memory of Burns, and breathes perpetual masses for
his soul.
WORDSWORTH.
In
an intellectual history of our age, the bard of Rydal
Mount must occupy a prominent place. His name is so
intimately associated with the poetical criticisms of the
period, that, even if his productions are hereafter
neglected, he cannot wholly escape consideration. The
mere facts of his life will preserve his memory. It will
not be forgotten that one among the men of acknowledged
genius in England, during a period of great political
excitement
,
and when society accorded to literary success
the highest honors, should voluntarily remain secluded
amid the mountains, the uncompromising advocate of
a theory, from time to time sending forth his effusions,
as uncolored by the poetic taste of the time, as statues
from an isolated quarry. It has been the fortune of
Wordsworth, like many original characters, to be almost
wholly regarded from the two extremes of prejudice and
admiration. The eclectic spirit, which is so appropriate
to the criticism of Art, has seldom swayed his
commentators
.
It has scarcely been admitted, that his works may
please to a certain extent, and in particular traits, and in
24
other respects prove wholly uncongenial. Whoever
recognizes
his beauties is held responsible for his system;
and those who have stated his defects; have been unfairly
ranked with the insensible and unreasonable reviewers
who so fiercely assailed him at the outset of his career.
There is a medium ground, from which we can survey
the subject to more advantage. From this point of
observation
,
it is easy to perceive that there is reason on
both sides of the question. It was natural and just that
the lovers of poetry, reared in the school of Shakspeare,
should be repelled at the outset by a new minstrel, whose
prelude was an argument. It was like being detained at
the door of a cathedral by a dull
cicerone
, who, before
granting admittance, must needs deliver a long homily
on the grandeur of the interior, and explain away its
deficiencies
.
Let us enter, we impatiently exclaim: if
the building is truly grand, its sublimity needs no
expositor
;
if it is otherwise, no reasoning will render it
impressive
.
The idea of adopting for poetical objects the
real language of men, when in a state of vivid sensation,
was indeed, as Coleridge observes, never strictly
attempted
;
but there was something so deliberate, and even cold,
in Wordsworth's first appeal, that we cannot wonder it
was unattractive. Byron and Burns needed no
introduction
.
The earnestness of their manner secured instant
attention. Their principles and purposes were matters
of after-thought. Whoever is even superficially
acquainted
with human nature, must have prophecied a doubtful
reception to a bard, who begins by calmly stating his
reasons for considering prose and verse identical, his
wish to inculcate certain truths which he deemed
neglected
,
and the several considerations which induced him to
adopt rhyme for the purpose. Nor is this feeling wholly
unworthy of respect, even admitting, with Wordsworth,
that mere popularity is no evidence of the genuineness of
poetry. Minds of poetical sensibility are accustomed to
regard the true poet as so far inspired by his experience,
as to write from a spontaneous enthusiasm. They regard
verse as his natural elementthe most congenial form of
expression. They imagine he can scarcely account
wholly to himself, far less to others, for his diction and
imagery,any farther than they are the result of emotion
too intense and absording to admit of any conscious or
reflective process. Even if poetry takes its origin
from emotion recollected in tranquillity, it must be of
that earnest and tender kind, which is only occasionally
experienced. Trust, therefore, was not readily accorded
a writer who scarcely seemed enamored of his Art, and
presented a theory in prose to win the judgment, instead
of first taking captive the heart by the music of his lyre.
Nor is this the only just cause of Wordsworth's early
want of appreciation. He has not only written too much,
from pure reflection, but the quantity of his verse is
wholly out of proportion to its quality. He has too often
written for the mere sake of writing. The mine he
opened
may be inexhaustible, but to him it is not given to
bring to light all its treasures. His characteristics are
not universal. His power is not unlimited. On the
contrary, his points of peculiar excellence, though rare,
are comparatively few. He has endeavored to extend his
range beyond its natural bounds. In a word, he has
written too much, and too indiscriminately. It is to be
feared that habit has made the work of versifying
necessary
,
and he has too often resorted to it merely as an
occupation
.
Poetry is too sacred to be thus mechanically
pursued. The true bard seizes only genial periods, and
inciting themes. He consecrates only his better
moments
to the divinest of arts. He feels that there is a
correspondence between certain subjects and his
individual
genius, and to these he conscientiously devotes his
powers. Wordsworth seems to have acted on a different
principle. It is obvious to a discerning reader that his
muse is frequently whipped into service. He is too often
content to indite a series of common-place thoughts, and
memorialize topics which have apparently awakened in
his mind only a formal interest. It sometimes seems as
if he had taken up the business of a bard, and felt bound
to fulfil its functions. His political opinions, his
historical
reading, almost every event of personal experience,
must be chronicled, in the form of a sonnet or blank
verse. The language may be chaste, the sentiment
unexceptionable
,
the moral excellent, and yet there may be
no poetry, and perhaps the idea has been often better
expressed in prose. Even the admirers of Wordsworth
are compelled, therefore, to acknowledge, that with all his
unrivalled excellencies, he has written too many
Such lays as neither ebb nor flow,
Correctly cold, and regularly slow.
Occasional felicities of style do not atone for such frequent
desecration of the muse. We could forgive them in a
less-gifted minstrel; but with one of Wordsworth's genius
it is more difficult to compromise. The number of his
indifferent attempts shade the splendor of his real merit.
The poems protected by his fame, which are uninspired
by his genius, have done much to blind a large class of
readers to his intrinsic worth. Another circumstance has
contributed to the same result. His redeeming graces
often
,
from excess, become blemishes. In avoiding the
tinsel of a meretricious style, he sometimes degenerates
into positive homeliness. In rejecting profuse ornament,
he often presents his conceptions in so bald a manner as
to prove utterly unattractive. His simplicity is not
unfrequently
childish, his calmness stagnation, his pathos
puerility. And these impressions, in some instances,
have been allowed to outweigh those which his more
genuine qualities inspire. For when we reverse the
picture
,
Wordsworth presents claims to grateful admiration,
second to no poet of the age; and no susceptible and
observing
mind can study his writings without yielding him
at least this cordial acknowledgment. It is not easy to
estimate the happy influence Wordsworth has exerted
upon
poetical taste and practice, by the example he has given
of a more simple and artless style. Like the sculptors
who lead their pupils to the anatomy of the human frame,
and the painters who introduced the practice of drawing
from the human figure, Wordsworth opposed to the
artifificial
and declamatory, the clear and natural in diction.
He exhibited, as it were, a new source of the elements of
expression. He endeavored, and with singular success,
24*
to revive a taste for less exciting poetry. He boldly tried
the experiment of introducing plain viands, at a banquet
garnished with all the art of gastronomy. He offered to
substitute crystal water for ruddy wine, and invited those
accustomed only to a sound of revelry by night, to go
forth and breathe the air of mountains, and gaze into the
mirror of peaceful lakes. He aimed to persuade men
that they could be moved by gentler excitements than
those of luxury and violence. He essayed to calm their
beating hearts, to cool their fevered blood, to lead them
gently back to the fountains that go softly. He bade
them repose their throbbing brows upon the lap of Nature.
He quietly advocated the peace of rural solitude, the
pleasure
of evening walks among the hills, as more salutary
than more ostentatious amusements. The lesson was
suited to the period. It came forth from the retirement
of Nature as quietly as a zephyr; but it was not lost in
the hum of the world. Insensibly it mingled with the
noisy strife, and subdued it to a sweeter murmur. It fell
upon the heart of youth, and its passions grew calmer.
It imparted a more harmonious tone to the meditations of
the poet. It tempered the aspect of life to many an eager
spirit, and gradually weaned the thoughtful from the
encroachments
of false taste and conventional habits. To
a commereial people it portrayed the attractiveness of
tranquillity. Before an unhealthy and flashy literature,
it set up a standard of truthfulness and simplicity. In an
age of mechanical triumph, it celebrated the majestic
resources
of the universe.
To this calm voice from the mountains, none could
listen without advantage. What though its tones were
sometimes monotonous?they were hopeful and serene.
To listen exclusively, might indeed prove wearisome; but
in some placid moments those mild echoes could not but
bring good cheer. In the turmoil of cities, they refreshed
from contrast; among the green fields, they inclined the
mind to recognize blessings to which it is often
insensible
.
There were ministers to the passions, and apostles
of learning, sufficient for the exigencies of the times.
Such an age could well suffer one preacher of the
simple
,
the natural and the true; one advocate of a wisdom
not born of books, of a pleasure not obtainable from
society
,
of a satisfaction underived from outward activity.
And such a prophet proved William Wordsworth.
Sensibility to Nature is characteristic of poets in
general
.
Wordsworth's feelings in this regard have the
character
of affection. He does not break out into ardent
apostrophes like that of Byron addressed to the Ocean, or
Coleridge's Hymn at Chamouni; but his verse breathes
a constant and serene devotion to all the charms of
natural
sceneryfrom the mountain-range that bounds the
horizon, to the daisy beside his path:
If stately passions in me burn,
And one chance look to thee I turn,
I drink, out of an humbler urn,
A lowlier pleasure;
The homely sypmathy that heeds
The common life our nature breeds,
A wisdom, fitted to the needs
Of hearts at leisure.
He does not seem so much to resort to the quiet scenes of
the country for occasional recreation, as to live and
breathe only in their tranquil atmosphere. His interest
in the universe has been justly called personal. It is not
the passion of a lover in the dawn of his bliss, nor the
unexpected delight of a metropolitan, to whose sense rural
beauty is arrayed in the charms of novelty; but rather the
settled, familiar, and deep attachment of a friend:
Though absent long,
These forms of beauty have not been to me
As is a landscape to a blind man's eye:
But oft in lonely rooms, and 'mid the din
Of towns and cities, I have owed to them
In hours of weariness sensations sweet,
Felt in the blood, and felt along the heart;
And passing even into my purer mind
With tranquil restoration.
The life, both inward and outward, of Wordsworth, is
most intimately associated with lakes and mountains.
Amid them he was born, and to them has he ever looked
for the necessary aliment of his being. Nor are his
feelings
on the subject merely passive or negative. He has
a reason for the faith that is in him. To the influences
of Nature he brings a philosophic imagination. No
transient
pleasure, no casual agency, does he ascribe to the
outward world. In his view, its functions in relation to
man are far more penetrating and efficient than has ever
been acknowledged. Human education he deems a
process
for which the Creator has made adequate provision
in this goodly frame of earth and sea and sky.
He had small need of books; for many a Tale
Traditionary, round the mountains hung;
And many a legend peopled the dark woods,
Nourished Imagination in her growth,
And gave the Mind that apprehensive power,
By which it is made quick to recognize
The moral scope and aptitude of things.
One impulse from a vernal wood
May teach you more of man,
Of moral evil and of good,
Than all the sages can.
Accordingly, both in details and combination, Nature has
been the object of his long and earnest study. To
illustrate
her unobserved and silent ministry to the heart, has
been his favorite pursuit. From his poems might be
gleaned a compendium of mountain influences. Even
the animal world is viewed in the same light. In the
much-ridiculed Peter Bell, Susan, and the White Doe of
Rylstone, we have striking instances. To present the
affecting points of its relation to mankind has been one of
the most daring experiments of his muse:
One lesson, shepherd, let us two divide,
Taught both by what she shows and what conceals,
Never to blend our pleasure or our pride,
With sorrow of the meanest thing that feels.
It is the common and universal in Nature that he loves
to celebrate. The rare and startling seldom find a place
in his verse. That calm, soothing, habitual language,
addressed to the mind by the common air and sky, the
ordinary verdure, the field-flower, and the sunset, is the
almost invariable theme of his song. And herein have
his labors proved chiefly valuable. They have tended to
make us more reverent listeners to the daily voices of earth,
to make us realize the goodness of our common heritage,
and partake, with a more conscious and grateful
sensibility
,
of the beautiful around us. In the same spirit has
Wordsworth looked upon human life and history. To lay
bare the native elements of character in its simplest form,
to assert the essential dignity of life in its most rude and
common manifestations, to vindicate the interest which
belongs to human beings, simply as such, have been the
darling objects of his thoughts. Instead of Corsairs and
Laras, peerless ladies and perfect knights, a waggoner, a
beggar, a potter, a pedlar, are the character of whose
feelings and experience he sings. The operation of
industry
,
bereavement, temptation, remorse and local
influences
,
upon these children of humble toil, have furnished
problems which he has delighted to solve. And who shall
say that in so doing, he has not been of signal service to his
kind? Who shall say that through such portraits a wider
and truer sympathy, a more vivid sense of human
brotherhood
,
a more just self-respect, has not been extensively
awakened? Have not our eyes been thus opened to the
better aspects of ignorance and poverty? Have we
not thus been made to feel the true claims of man?
Allured
by the gentle monitions from Rydal Mount, do we
not now look upon our race in a more meek and
susceptible
mood, and pass the lowliest being beside the
highway
,
with more of that new sentiment of respect and hope
which was heralded by the star of Bethlehem? Can we
not more sincerely exclaim with the hero of
Sartor Resartus:
Poor, wandering, wayward man! Art thou not
tried, beaten with many stripes, even as I am? Ever,
whether thou wear the royal mantle or the beggar's
gaberdine
,
art thou not so weary, so heavy laden? O! my
brother, my brother! why cannot I shelter thee in my
bosom, and wipe away all tears from thine eyes?
In accordance with this humane philosophy, Childhood
is contemplated by Wordsworth. The spirit of the
Saviour's
sympathy with this beautiful era of life, seems to
possess his muse. Its unconsciousness, its ignorance of
death, its trust, hope and peace, its teachings, and
promise
he has portrayed with rare sympathy. Witness,
We are Seven, the Pet Lamb, and especially the
Ode, which is perhaps the finest and most characteristic
of Wordsworth's compositions. A reader of his poetry,
who imbibes its spirit, can scarcely look upon the young
with indifference. The parent must thence derive a new
sense of the sacredness of children, and learn to reverence
their innocence, to leave unmarred their tender traits, and
to yield them more confidently to the influences of Nature.
In his true and feeling chronicles of the heaven that
lies about us in our infancy, Wordsworth has uttered a
silent but most eloquent reproach upon all the absurdities
and sacrilegious abuses of modern education. He has
made known the truth, that children have their lessons to
convey as well as receive:
O dearest, dearest boy, my heart
For better lore would seldom yearn,
Could I but teach the hundreth part
Of what from thee I learn.
He has made more evident the awful chasm between the
repose and hopefulness of happy childhood, and the
cynical
distrust of worldly age. He thus indirectly but
forcibly
appeals to men for a more guarded preservation of the
early dew of existence, so recklessly lavished upon the
desert of ambition:
Those first affections,
Those shadowy recollections,
Which, be they what they may,
Are yet the fountain-light of all our day;
Are yet a master-light of all our seeing;
Uphold us, cherish, and have power to make
Our noisy years seem moments in the being
Of the eternal silence.
He has exemplified that the worst evil of life is rather
acquired
than inherited, and vindicated the beneficent
designs
of the Creator, by exhibiting humanity when fresh
from his hand. This is a high moral service. Upon
many of those who have become familiar with Wordsworth
in youth, such impressions must have been permanent
and invaluable, greatly influencing their observation of
life and nature, and touching to finer issues their
unpledged
sympathies. It is with the eye of a meditative
poet that Wordsworth surveys life and nature. And thus
inspired, a new elevation is imparted to ordinary moral
sensations, and it is the sentiment rather than the
subject
which gives interest to the song. Hence it is
absolutely
necessary that the reader should sympathize with the
feelings of the poet, to enjoy or understand him. He
appeals
to that contemplative spirit which does not belong
to all, and visits even its votaries but occasionally; to
a sadness that has its seat in the depths of reason; he
professes to follow the fluxes and refluxes of the mind
when agitated by the great and simple affections of our
nature. To enter into purposes like these, there must
exist a delicate sympathy with human nature, a reflective
habit, a mingling of reason and fancy, an imagination
active but not impassioned. The frame of mind which
he labors to induce, and in which he must be read, is
That sweet mood when pleasure loves to pay
Tribute to ease; and, of its joy secure,
The heart luxuriates with indifferent things,
Wasting its kindliness on stocks and stones,
And on the vacant air;
that serene and blessed mood,
In which the affections gently lead us on,
Until the breath of this corporeal frame,
And even the motion of our human blood,
Almost suspended, we are laid asleep
In body, and become a living soul.
While, with an eye made quiet by the power
Of harmony, and the deep power of joy,
We see into the life of things.
This calm and holy musing, this deep and intimate
communion with Nature, this spirit of peace, should
sometimes
visit us. There are periods when passionate poetry
wearies, and a lively measure is discordant. There are
times when we are calmed and softened, and it is a luxury
to pause and forget the promptings of desire and the cares
of life; when it is a relief to leave the crowd and wander
into solitude, when, faint and disappointed, we seek, like
25
tired children, the neglected bosom of Nature, and in the
serenity of her maternal smile, find rest and solace. Such
moments redeem existence from its monotony, and refresh
the human heart with dew from the urns of Peace. Then
it is that the bard of Rydal Mount is like a brother, and
we deeply feel that it is good for us to have known him.
COLERIDGE.
Coleridge
appears to have excelled all his
contemporaries
in personal impressiveness. Men of the highest
talent and cultivation have recorded, in the most
enthusiastic
terms, the intellectual treat his conversation
afforded
.
The fancy is captivated by the mere description
of his fluent and emphatic, yet gentle and inspired
language
.
We are haunted with these vivid pictures of the
`old man eloquent,' as by those of the sages of antiquity,
and the renowned
improvisatores
of modern times.
Hazlitt and Lamb seem never weary of theme. They
make us realize, as far as description can, the affectionate
temper, the simple bearing, and earnest intelligence of
their friend. We feel the might and interest of a living
soul, and sigh that it was not our lot to partake directly of
its overflowing gifts.
Though so invaluable as a friend and companion,
unfortunately
for posterity, Coleridge loved to talk and read
far more than to write. Hence the records of his mind
bear no proportion to its endowments and activity.
Ill-health
early drew him from life in motion, to life in
thought and sensation. Necessity drove him to literary
labor. He was too unambitious, and found too much
enjoyment in the spontaneous exercise of his mind,
to assume willingly the toils of authorship. His mental
tastes were not of a popular cast. In boy-hood he waxed
not pale at philosophic draughts, and there was in his
soul an aspiration after truthan interest in the deep
things of lifea `hungering for eternity', essentially
opposed to success as a miscellaneous writer. One of
the most irrational complaints against Coleridge, was his
dislike of the French. Never was there a more honest
prejudice. In literature, he deemed that nation
responsible
for having introduced the artificial school of poetry,
which he detested; in politics, their inhuman atrocities,
during the revolution, blighted his dearest theory of man;
in life, their frivolity could not but awaken disgust in a
mind so serious, and a heart so tender, where faith and
love were cherished in the very depths of reflection and
sensibility. It is, indeed, easy to discover in his works
ample confirmation of the evidence of his friends, but
they afford but an unfinished monument to his genius.
We must be content with the few memorials he has left
of a powerful imagination and a good heart. Of these
his poems furnish the most beautiful. They are the
sweetest echo of his marvellous spirit;
A song divine, of high and passionate thoughts,
To their own music chaunted.
The eyes of the ancient Mariner holds us, in its wild
spell, as it did the wedding-guest, while we feel the truth that
He prayeth best, who loveth best
All things both great and small;
For the dear God who loveth us,
He made and loveth all.
The charm of regretful tenderness is upon us with as
sweet a mystery, as the beauty of the lady of a far
countrie, when we read these among other musical lines
of Christabel:
Alas! they had been friends in youth;
But whispering tongues can poison truth,
And constancy lives in realms above;
And life is thorny; and youth is vain;
And to be wroth with one we love,
Doth work like madness in the brain.
No man was ever yet a great poet, without being at
the same time a profound philosopher. True as this
may be in one sense, we hold it an unfortunate rule for a
poetical mind to act upon. It was part of the creed of
Coleridge, and his works illustrate its unfavorable
influence
.
His prose generally speaking, is truly satisfactory
only when it is poetical. The human mind is so
constituted
as to desire completeness. The desultory character
of Coleridge's prose writings is often wearisome and
disturbing
.
He does not carry us on to a given point by a
regular
road, but is ever wandering from the end proposed.
We are provoked at this waywardness the more, because,
ever and anon, we catch glimpses of beautiful localities,
and look down most inviting vistas. At these promising
fields of thought, and vestibules of truth, we are only
permitted
to glance, and then are unceremoniously
25*
hurried off in the direction that happens to please our
guide's vagrant humor. This desultory style essentially
mars the interest of nearly all the prose of this
distinguished
man. Not only the compositions, but the opinions,
habits, and experience of Coleridge, partake of the same
erratic character. His classical studies at Christ's
hospital
were interwoven with the reading of a circulating
library
.
He proposed to become a shoemaker while he
was studying medicine. He excited the wonder of every
casual acquaintance by his schoolboy discourse, while he
provoked his masters by starting an argument instead of
repeating a rule. He incurred a chronic rheumatism by
swimming with his clothes on, and left the sick ward to
enlist in a regiment of dragoons. He laid magnificent
plans of primitive felicity to be realized on the banks of
the Susquehanna, while he wandered penniless in the
streets of London. He was at different times a zealous
Unitarian, and a high Churchmana political lecturer
a metaphysical essayista preachera translatora
travellera foreign secretarya philosopheran editor
a poet. We cannot wonder that his productions,
particularly
those that profess to be elaborate, should in a
measure
,
partake of the variableness of his mood. His works,
like his life, are fragmentary. He is, too, frequently
prolix, labors upon topics of secondary interest and excites
only to disappoint expectation. By many sensible
readers
his metaphysical views are pronounced unintelligible,
and by some German scholars declared arrant plagiarisms.
These considerations are the more painful from our sense of
the superiority of the man. He proposes to awaken thought,
to address and call forth the higher faculties,and to
vindicate
the claims of important truth. Such designs claim
respect. We honor the author who conscientiously
entertains
them. We seat ourselves reverently at the feet of
a teacher whose aim is so exalted. We listen with
curiosity
and hope. Musical are many of the periods,
beautiful
the images, and here and there comes a single idea
of striking value; but for these we are obliged to hear
many discursive exord ums, irrelevant episodes and
random
speculations. We are constantly reminded of Charles
Lamb's reply to the poet's inquiry if he had ever heard
him preach`I never knew you do any thing else,' said Elia.
It is highly desirable that the prose writings of Coleridge
should be thoroughly winnowed. A volume of delightful
aphorisms might thus be easily gleaned. Long after we
have forgotten the general train of his observations,
isolated
remarks, full of meaning and truth, linger in our
memories. Scattered through his works are many
sayings
,
referring to literature and human nature, which
would serve as maxims in philosophy and criticism.
Their effect is often lost from the position they occupy, in
the midst of abstruse or dry discussions that repel the
majority even of truth-seekers. His Biographia is the
most attractive of his prose productions.
It is not difficult, in a measure at least to explain, or
rather account for, these peculiarities. Coleridge
himself
tells us that in early youth, he indulged a taste for
metaphysical
speculations to excess. He was fond of quaint
and neglected authors. He early imbibed a love of
contro
ersy, and took refuge in first principles, in the elements
of man's nature to sustain his positions. To this ground
few of his school-fellows could follow him; and we
cannot
wonder that he became attached to a field of thought
seldom
explored, and, from its very vague and mystical
character
,
congenial to him. That he often reflected to good
purpose
it would be unjust to deny; but that his own
consciousness
,
at times, became morbid, and his speculations, in
consequence, disjointed and misty, seems equally obvious.
We are not disposed to take it for granted that this
irregular
development of mental power is the least useful.
Perhaps one of Coleridge's evening conversations or
single aphorisms has more deeply excited some minds to
action, than the regular performances of a dozen inferior
men. It is this feeling which probably led him to
express
,
with such earnestness, the wish that the criterion
of a scholar's utility were the number and value of the
truths he has circulated and minds he has awakened.
A distinguishing trait of Coleridge's genius was a rare
power of comparison. His metaphors are often unique
and beautiful. Here also the poet excels the philosopher.
It may be questioned if any modern writer whose works
are equally limited, has illustrated his ideas with more
originality and interest. When encountered amid his
grave disquisitions, the similitudes of Coleridge
strikingly
proclaim the poetical cast of his mind, and lead us to
regret that its energies were not more devoted to the
imaginative department of literature. At times he was
conscious of the same feeling. Well were it for me
perhaps, he remarks in the Biographia, had I never
relapsed into the same mental disease; if I had continued
to pluck the flower and reap the harvest from the cultivated
surface, instead of delving in the unwholesome
quicksilver
mines of metaphysic depths. That he formed as
just an estimate of the superficial nature of political labor,
is evident from the following allusion to partizan characters:
Fondly these attach
A radical causation to a few
Poor drudges of chastising Providence,
Who borrow all their hues and qualities
From our own folly and rank wickedness,
Which gave them birth and nursed them.
A few examples taken at random, will suffice to show
his dim similitudes woven in moral strains.
To set our nature at strife with itself for a good
purpose
,
implies the same sort of prudence as a priest of
Diana would have manifested, who should have proposed
to dig up the celebrated charcoal foundations of the mighty
temple of Ephesus, in order to furnish fuel for the
burnt-offerings
on its altars.
The reader, who would follow a close reasoner to the
summit of the absolute principle of any one important
subject, has chosen a chamois-hunter for his guide. He
cannot carry us on his shoulders: we must strain our
sinews, as he has strained his; and make firm footing on
the smooth rock for ourselves, by the blood of toil from
our own feet.
In the case of libel, the degree makes the kind, the
circumstances constitute the criminality; and both degree
and circumstances, like the ascending shades of color, or
the shooting hues of a dove's neck, die away into each
other, incapable of definition or outline.
Would to Heaven that the verdict to be passed on my
labors depended on those who least needed them! The
water-lily in the midst of waters lifts up its broad leaves
and expands its petals, at the first pattering of the shower,
and rejoices in the rain with a quicker sympathy than the
parched shrub in the sandy desert.
Human experience, like the stern lights of a ship at
sea, illumines only the path which we have passed
over.
I have laid too many eggs in the hot sands of this
wilderness, the world, with ostrich carelessness and ostrich
oblivion. The greater part, indeed, have been trod under
foot, and are forgotten; but yet no small number have
crept forth into life, some to furnish feathers for the caps
of others, and still more to plume the shafts in the quivers
of my enemies.
On the driving cloud the shining bow,
That gracious thing made up of smiles and tears,
Mid the wild rack and rain that slant below
Stands
As though the spirits of all lovely flowers
Inweaving each its wreath and dewy crown
,
And ere they sunk to earth in vernal showers
,
Had built a bridge to tempt the angels down
.
Remorse is as the heart in which it grows:
If that be gentle, it drops balmy dews
Of true repentance; but if proud and gloomy,
It is a poison tree, that, pierced to the inmost,
Weeps only tears of poison.
The more elaborate poetical compositions of Coleridge
display much talent and a rare command of language.
His dramatic attempts, however, are decidedly inferior in
interest and power to many of his fugitive pieces.
Wallenstein
,
indeed, is allowed to be a master-piece of
translation
and,
although others have improved upon certain
passages, as a whole it is acknowledged to be an
unequalled
specimen of its kind. But to realize the true elements
of the poet's genius, we must have recourse to his minor
poems. In these, his genuine sentiments found genial
development. They are beautiful emblems of his personal
history, and admit us to the secret chambers of his heart.
We recognize, as we ponder them, the native fire of his
muse, unmixed with baser matter. Of the juvenile
poems, the Monody on Chatterton strikes us as the most
remarkable. It overflows with youthful sympathy, and
contains passages of singular power for the effusions of so
inexperienced a bard. Take, for instance, the following
lines, where an identity of fate is suggested from the
consciousness
of error and disappointment:
Poor Chatterton! he sorrows for thy fate
Who would have praised and loved thee, ere too late.
Poor Chatterton! farewell! of darkest hues
This chaplet cast I on thy unshapen tomb;
But dare no longer on the sad theme muse,
Lest kindred woes persuade a kindred doom:
For oh! big gall-drops, shook from Folly's wing,
Have blackened the fair promise of my spring;
And the stern Fate transpierced with viewless dart
The last pale Hope that shivered at my heart
.
Few young poets of English origin have written more
beautiful amatory poetry than this:
O (have I sighed) were mine the wizard's rod,
Or mine the power of Proteus, changeful god!
A flower-entangled arbor I would seem
To shield my love from noontide's sultry beam:
Or bloom a myrtle, from whose odorous boughs
My love might weave gay garlands for her brows.
When twilight stole across the fading vale
To fan my love I'd be the evening gale;
Mourn in the soft folds of her swelling vest,
And flutter my faint pinions on her breast!
On seraph wing I'd float a dream by night,
To soothe my love with shadows of delight:
Or soar aloft to be the spangled skies,
And gaze upon her with a thousand eyes!
Nor were religious sentiments unawakened:
Fair the vernal mead,
Fair the high grove, the sea, the sun, the stars;
True impress each of their creating Sire!
Yet nor high grove, nor many-colored mead,
Nor the green Ocean with his thousand isles,
Nor the starred azure, nor the sovran sun,
E'er with such majesty of portraiture
Imaged the supreme being uncreate,
As thou, meek Saviour! at the fearless hour
When thy insulted anguish winged the prayer
Harped by archangels, when they sing of mercy!
Which when the Almighty heard from forth his throne
Diviner light filled heaven with ecstacy!
Heaven's hymnings paused: and hell her yawning mouth
Closed a brief moment.
It is delightful to dwell upon these early outpourings
of an ardent and gifted soul. They lay bare the real
characteristics of Coleridge. Without them our sense of
his genius would be far more obscure. When these
juvenile
poems were written `existence was all a feeling,
not yet shaped into a thought.' Here is no mysticism or
party-feeling, but the simplicity and fervor of a fresh
heart, touched by the beauty of the visible world, by the
sufferings of genius, and the appeals of love and religion.
The natural and the sincere here predominate over the
studied and artificial. Time enlarged the bard's views,
increased his stores of knowledge, and matured his
mental
powers; but his genius, as pictured in his writings,
though strengthened and fertilized, thenceforth loses much
of its unity. Its emanations are frequently more grand
and startling, but less simple and direct. There is more
machinery, and often a confusion of appliances. We
feel that it is the same mind in an advanced state;the
same noble instrument breathing deeper strains, but with
a melody more intricate and sad.
In the Sibylline Leaves we have depicted a later stage
of the poet's life. Language is now a more effective
expedient
.
It follows the thought with a clearer echo. It
is woven with a firmer hand. The subtle intellect is
evidently at work in the very rush of emotion. The poet
has discovered that he cannot hope
from outward forms to win
The passion and the life, whose fountains are within.
A new sentiment, the most solemn that visits the breast
of humanity, is aroused by this reflective processthe
sentiment of duty. Upon the sunny landscape of youth
26
falls the twilight of thought. A conviction has entered the
bosom of the minstrel that he is not free to wander at
will to the sound of his own music. His life cannot be
a mere revel in the embrace of beauty. He too is a man,
born to suffer and to act. He cannot throw off the
responsibility
of life. He must sustain relations to his
fellows
.
The scenery that delights him assumes a new
aspect
.
It appeals not only to his love of nature, but his
sense of patriotism:
O divine
And beauteous island! thou hast been my sole
And most magnificent temple, in the which
I walk with awe, and sing my stately songs,
Loving the God that made me!
More tender ties bind the poet-soul to his native
isle
A pledge of more than passing life
Yea, in the very name of wife.
Then was I thrilled and melted, and most warm
Impressed a father's kiss.
Thus gather the many-tinted hues of human destiny
around the life of the young bard. To a mind of
philosophical
cast, the transition is most interesting. It is
the distinguishing merit of Coleridge, that in his verse
we find these epochs warmly chronicled. Most just is his
vindication of himself from the charge of egotism. To
what end are beings peculiarly sensitive, and capable of
rare expression, sent into the world, if not to make us
feel the mysteries of our nature, by faithful delineations,
drawn from their own consciousness? It is the lot, not
of the individual, but of man in general, to feel the
sublimity
of the mountainthe loveliness of the flowerthe
awe of devotionand the ecstacy of love; and we should
bless those who truly set forth the traits and triumphs of
our naturethe consolations and anguish of our human
life. We are thus assured of the universality of Nature's
lawsof the sympathy of all genuine hearts. Something
of a new dignity invests the existence, whose common
experience is susceptible of such portraiture. In the
keen regrets, the vivid enjoyments, the agonizing remorse
and the glowing aspirations recorded by the poet, we find
the truest reflection of our own souls. There is a
nobleness
in the lineaments thus displayed, which we can
scarcely trace in the bustle and strife of the world.
Self-respect
is nourished by such poetry, and the hope of
immortality
rekindled at the inmost shrine of the heart. Of
recent poets, Coleridge has chiefly added to such
obligations
.
He has directed our gaze to Mont Blanc as to an
everlasting altar of praise; and kindled a perennial flame
of devotion amid the snows of its cloudy summit. He
has made the icy pillars of the Alps ring with solemn
anthems
.
The pilgrim to the Vale of Chamouni shall not
hereafter
want a Hymn by which his admiring soul may
wreak itself upon expression.
Rise, O, ever rise,
Rise like a cloud of incense, from the earth!
Thou kingly spirit throned among the hills,
Thou dread ambassador from earth to heaven,
Great hierarch! tell thou the silent sky,
And tell the stars, and tell yon rising sun,
Earth, and her thousand voices praises God.
To one other want of the heart has the muse of
Coleridge
given genuine expression. Fashion, selfishness,
and the mercenary spirit of the age, have widely and
deeply
profaned the very name of Love. To poetry it flies as to
an ark of safety. The English bard has set apart and
consecrated a spot sacred to its meditation`midway on
the mount,' `beside the ruined tower;' and thither may
we repair to cool the eye fevered with the glare of art,
by gazing on the fresh verdure of nature, when
The moonshine stealing o'er the scene
Has blended with the lights of eve,
And she is there, our hope, our joy,
Our own dear Genevieve.
MRS. HEMANS.
We
have heard much of late regarding the rights and
sphere of woman. The topic has become trite. One
branch of the discussion, however, is worthy of careful
noticethe true theory of cultivated and liberal men on the
subject. This has been greatly misunderstood. The
idea has been often suggested that man is jealous of his
alleged intellectual superiority, while little has been
advanced
in illustration of his genuine reverence for female
character. Because the other sex cannot always find
erudition
so attractive as grace in woman, and strong
mental
traits so captivating as a beautiful disposition, it is
absurdly argued that mind and learning are only honored
in masculine attire. The truth is, men of feeling
instinctively
recognize something higher than intellect.
They feel that a noble and true soul is greater and more
delightful than mere reason, however powerful; and
they know that to this, extensive knowledge and active
logical
powers are not essential. It is not the attainments,
or the literary talent, that they would have women abjure.
They only pray that through and above these may appear
26*
the woman. They desire that the harmony of nature may
not be disturbed; that the essential foundations of love
may not be invaded; that the sensibility, delicacy and
quiet enthusiasm of the female heart may continue to
awaken
in man the tender reverence, which is one of the most
elevating of his sentiments.
Portia is highly intellectual; but even while arrayed
in male costume and enacting the public advocate, the
essential and captivating characteristics of her true sex
inspire her mien and language. Vittoria Colonna was
one of the most gifted spirits of her agethe favorite
companion of Michael Angelo, but her life and works
were but the eloquent development of exalted womanhood.
Madame Roland displayed a strength of character
singularly
heroic, but her brave dignity was perfectly feminine.
Isabella of Spain gave evidence of a mind remarkably
comprehensive, and a rare degree of judgment; yet in
perusing her history, we are never beguiled from the feeling
of her queenly character. There is an essential quality
of sex, to be felt rather than described, and it is when this
is marred, that a feeling of disappointment is the
consequence
.
It is as if we should find violets growing on a
tall tree. The triumphs of mind always command respect,
but their style and trophies have diverse complexions in
the two sexes. It is only when these distinctions are
lost, that they fail to interest. It matters not how erudite
or mentally gifted a woman may be, so that she remains
in manner and feeling a woman. Such is the idea that
man loves to see realized; and in cherishing it, he gives
the highest proof of his estimation of woman. He
delights
to witness the exercise of her noblest prerogative.
He is charmed to behold her in the most effective attitude.
He appreciates too truly the beauty and power of her
nature
to wish to see it arrayed in any but a becoming dress.
There is such a thing as female science, philosophy and
poetry, as there is female physiognomy and taste; not
that their absolute qualities differ in the two sexes, but
their relative aspect is distinct. Their sphere is as large
and high, and infinitely more delicate and deep than that
of man, though not so obvious. When they overstep their
appropriate domain, much of their mentul influence is lost.
Freely and purely exerted, it is at once recognized and
loved. Man delights to meet woman in the field of
letters
as well as in the arena of social life. There also is
she his better angel. With exquisite satisfaction he learns
at her feet the lessons of mental refinement and moral
sensibility. From her teachings he catches a grace and
sentiment unwritten by his own sex. Especially in
poetry, beams, with starlike beauty, the light of her soul.
There he reads the records of a woman's heart. He hears
from her own lips how the charms of nature and the
mysteries of life have wrought in her bosom. Of such
women, Mrs. Hemans is the most cherished of our day.
Life is the prime source of literature, and especially of
its most effective and universal departments. Poetry
should therefore be the offspring of deep experience.
Otherwise it is superficial and temporary. What phase
of existence is chiefly revealed to woman? Which
domain
of experience is she best fitted by her nature and
position to illustrate? Undoubtedly, the influence and
power of the affections. In these her destiny is more
completely involved, through these her mind more
exclusively
acts, than is the case with our sex. Accordingly,
her insight is greater, and her interest more extensive in
the sphere of the heart. With a quicker sympathy, and a
finer perception, will she enter into the history and
results
of the affections. Accordingly, when the mantle of
song falls upon a woman, we cannot but look for new
revelations of sentiment. Not that the charms of nature
and the majesty of great events may not appropriately
attract
her muse; but with and around these, if she is a
true poetess, we see ever entwined the delicate flowers
that flourish in the atmosphere of home, and are reared to
full maturity only under the training of woman. Thus
the poetic in her character finds free development. She
can here speak with authority. It is, indeed, irreverent
to dictate to genius, but the themes of female poetry are
written in the very structure of the soul. Political
economy
may find devotees among the gentler sex; and so an
approach to the mental hardihood of Lady Macbeth may
appear once in the course of an age; whereas, every year
we light on the traces of a Juliet, a Cleopatra and an
Isabel
.
The spirit of Mrs. Hemans in all she has written,
is essentially feminine. Various as are her subjects,
they are stamped with the same image and superscription.
She has drawn her prevailing vein of feeling from one
source. She has thrown over all her effusions, not so
much the drapery of knowledge, or the light of extensive
observation, as the warm and shifting hues of the heart.
These she had at command. She knew their effects,
and felt their mystery. Hence the lavish confidence with
which she devoted them to the creations of fancy and the
illustration of truth.
From the voice of her own consciousness, Mrs.
Hemans
realized what a capacity of joy and sorrow, of
strength and weakness, exists in the human heart. This
she made it her study to unfold. The Restoration of the
Works of Art to Italy is, as Byron said when it appeared,
a very good poem. It is a fine specimen of heroic verse.
The subject is treated with judgment and ability, and the
spirit which pervades the work is precisely what the
occasion
demanded. Still we feel that any cultivated and
ideal mind might have produced the poem. There are no
peculiar traits, no strikingly original conceptions. The
same may be said of several of the long pieces. It is in
the Songs of the Affections and the Records of Woman
that the poetess is preminently excellent. Here the field
is emphatically her own. She ranges it with a free step
and a queenly bearing; and everywhere rich flowers
spring up in her path, and a glowing atmosphere, like
the rosy twilight of her ancestral land, enlivens and
illumines
her progress. In these mysterious ties of love,
there is to her a world of poetry. She not only celebrates
their strength and mourns their fragility, but with pensive
ardor dwells on their eternal destiny. The birth, the
growth, the decline, the sacrifices, the whole morality and
spirituality of human love, is recognized and proclaimed
by her muse. Profoundly does she feel the richness and
the sadness, the glory and the gloom, involved in the
affections. She thinks it
A fearful thing that love and death may dwell
In the same world!
And reverently she declares that
He that sits above
In his calm glory, will forgive the love
His creatures bear each other, even if blent
With a vain worship; for its close is dim
Ever with grief, which leads the wrung soul back to Him.
Devotion continually blends with and exalts her views
of human sentiment:
I know, I know our love
Shall yet call gentle angels from above,
By its undying fervor.
Oh! we have need of patient faith below,
To clear away the mysteries of wo!
Bereavement has found in Mrs. Hemans a worthy
recorder
of its deep and touching poetry:
But, oh! sweet Friend! we dream not of love's might
Till Death has robed with soft and solemn light
The image we enshrine!Before
that
hour,
We have but glimpses of the o'ermastering power
Within us laid!
then
doth the spirit-flame
With sword-like lightning rend its mortal frame;
The wings of that which pants to follow fast,
Shake their clay bars, as with a prisoned blast,
The sea is in our souls!
But thou! whose thoughts have no blest home above,
Captive of earth! and canst thou dare to
love?
To nurse such feelings as delight to rest
Within that hallowed shrine a parent's breast?
To fix each hope, concentrate every tie,
On one frail idol,destined but to die?
Yet mock the faith that points to worlds of light,
Where severed souls, made perfect, re-unite?
Then tremble! cling to every passing joy
Twined with the life a moment may destroy!
If there be sorrow in a parting tear.
Still let
forever
vibrate on thine ear!
If some bright hour on rapture's wind hath flown,
Find more than anguish in the thought'tis gone;
Go! to a voice such magic influence give,
Thou canst not lose its melody and live;
And make an eye the lode-star of thy soul,
And let a glance the springs of thought control;
Gaze on a mortal form with fond delight,
Till the fair vision mingles with thy sight;
There seek thy blessings, there repose thy trust,
Lean on the willow, idolize the dust!
Then when thy treasure best repays thy care,
Think on that dread
forever
, and despair.
The distinguishing attribute of the poetry of Mrs.
Hemans
is sentiment. She sings fervently of the King of
Arragon, musing upon his slain brother, in the midst of a
victorious festival,of the brave boy perishing at the
battle
of the Nile, at the post assigned him by his father,
of Del Carpio, upbraiding the treacherous king:
Into these glassy eyes put light,be still! keep down thine ire,
Bid these white lips a blessing speak, this earth is
not
my sire!
Give me back him for whom I strove, for whom my blood was shed,
Thou canst notand a king?His dust be mountains on thy head!
He loosed the steed; his slack hand fell,upon the silent face
He cast one long, deep, troubled look,then turned from that sad place.
His hope was crushed, his after-fate untold in martial strain,
His banner led the spears no more amidst the hills of Spain.
With how true a sympathy does she trace the prison
musings of Arabella Stuart, portray the strife of the heart
in the Greek bride, and the fidelity of woman in the wife
soothing her husband's dying agonies on the wheel!
What a pathetic charm breathes in the pleadings of the
Adopted Child, and the meeting of Tasso and his Sister.
How well she understood the hopelessness of ideal love!
O ask not, hope thou not too much
Of sympathy below
Few are the hearts whence one same touch
Bid the sweet fountains flow:
Few and by still conflicting powers
Forbidden here to meet
Such ties would make this world of ours
Too fair for aught so fleet.
Nor is it alone in mere sensibility that the poetess
excels
.
The loftiness and the dignity of her sex has few
nobler interpreters. What can be finer in its kind than
the Swiss wife's appeal to her husband's patriotism?
Her poems abound in the worthiest appeals to woman's
faith:
Her lot is on yousilent tears to weep,
And patient smiles to wear through suffering's hour,
And sumless riches from Affection's deep,
To pour on broken reedsa wasted shower!
And to make idols, and to find them clay,
And to bewail their worshiptherefore pray!
To depict the parting grief of the Hebrew mother, the
repentant tears of Cur de Lion at his father's bier, the
home-associations of the Eastern stranger at the sight of
a palm-treethese, and such as these, were congenial
themes to Mrs. Hemans. Joyous as is her welcome to
Spring, thoughts of the departed solemnize its beauty.
She invokes the Ocean not for its gems and buried gold,
but for the true and brave that sleep in its bosom. The
bleak arrival of the New England Pilgrims, and the
evening
devotion of the Italian peasant-girl, are equally
consecrated
by her muse. Where there is profound love,
exalted
patriotism, or a faith touching all things with hues
of Heaven, there she rejoiced to expatiate. Fair as
Elysium
appeared to her fancy, she celebrates its splendor
only to reproach its rejection of the lowly and the loved:
For the most loved are they,
Of whom Fame speaks not with her clarion voice
In regal halls! the shades o'erhung their way,
The vale with its deep fountain is their choice,
And gentle hearts rejoice
Around their steps! till silently they die,
As a stream shrinks from summer's burning eye.
And the world knows not then,
Not then, nor ever, what pure thoughts are fled!
Yet these are they that on the souls of men
Come back, when night her folding veil hath spread,
The long remembered dead!
But not with
thee
might aught save glory dwell
Fade, fade away, thou shore of Asphodel!
It was the opinion of Dr. Spurzheim, an accurate and
benevolent observer of life, that suffering was essential to
the rich development of female character. It is
interesting
to trace the influence of disappointment and trial in
deepening and exalting the poetry of Mrs. Hemans.
From the sentimental character of her muse, results the
sameness of which some readers complain in perusing her
27
works. This apparent monotony only strikes us when
we attempt to read them consecutively. But such is not the
manner in which we should treat a poetess who so
exclusively
addresses our feelings. Like Petrarch's sonnets,
her productions delight most when separately enjoyed.
Her careful study of poetry as an art, and her truly
conscientious
care in choosing her language and forming her
verse, could not, even if it were desirable, prevent the
formation of a certain style. It is obvious, also, that
her efforts are unequal. The gems, however, are more
profusely scattered, than through the same amount of
writing
by almost any other modern poet. The department
of her muse was a high and sacred one. The path she
pursued was one especially heroic, inasmuch as her efforts
imply the exertion of great enthusiasm. Such lyrics as
we admire in her pages are fresh from the fount of
feeling
.
They have stirred the blood of thousands. They
have kindled innumerable hearts on both sides of the
sea. They have strewn imperishable flowers around the
homes and graves of two nations. They lift the
thoughts, like an organ's peal, to a better land, and
quicken the purest sympathies of the soul into a truer life
and more poetic beauty.
The taste of Mrs. Hemans was singularly elegant.
She delighted in the gorgeous and imposing. There is
a remarkable fondness for splendid combination, warlike
pomp and knightly pageantry betrayed in her writings.
Her fancy seems bathed in a Southern atmosphere. We
trace her Italian descent in the very flow and imagery of
her verse. There is far less of Saxon boldness of design
and simplicity of outline, than of the rich coloring and
luxuriant grouping of a warmer clime. Akin to this
trait was her passion for Art. She used to say that Music
was part of her life. In fact, the mind of the poetess was
essentially romantic. Her muse was not so easily
awakened
by the sight of a beautiful object, as by the records
of noble adventure. Her interest was chiefly excited by
the brave and touching in human experience. Nature
attracted
her rather from its associations with God and
humanity
,
than on account of its abstract and absolute
qualities
.
This forms the great distinction between her poetry
and that of Wordsworth. In the midst of the fine
scenery of Wales, her infant faculties unfolded. There
began her acquaintance with life and books. We are told
of her great facility in acquiring languages, her relish of
Shakspeare at the age of six, and her extraordinary
memory
.
It is not difficult to understand how her ardent
feelings
and rich imagination developed, with peculiar
individuality
,
under such circumstances. Knightly legends,
tales of martial enterprizethe poetry of courage and
devotion
,
fascinated her from the first. But when her
deeper
feelings were called into play, and the latent
sensibilities
of her nature sprung to conscious action, much of
this native romance was transferred to the scenes of real
life, and the struggles of the heart.
The earlier and most elaberate of her poems are, in a
great measure, experimental. It seems as if a casual
fancy for the poetic art gradually matured into a devoted
love. Mrs. Hemans drew her power less from preception
than sympathy. Enthusiasm, rather than graphic talent,
is displayed in her verse. We shall look in vain for
any remarkable pictures of the outward world. Her great
aim was not so much to describe as to move. We
discover
few scenes drawn by her pen, which strike us as
wonderfully true to physical fact. She does not make us
see
so much as
feel
. Compared with most great poets,
she saw but little of the world. The greater part of her
life was passed in retirement. Her knowledge of distant
lands was derived from books. Hence she makes little
pretension to the poetry of observation. Sketches copied
directly from the visible universe are rarely encountered
in her works. For such portraiture her mind was not
remarkably adapted. There was another process far
more congenial to herthe personation of feeling. She
loved to sing of inciting events, to contemplate her race
in an heroic attitude, to explore the depths of the soul, and
amid the shadows of despair and the tumult of passion,
point out some element of love or faith unquenched by
the storm. Her strength lay in earnestness of soul.
Her best verses glow with emotion. When once truly
interested
in a subject, she cast over it such an air of feeling
that our sympathies are won at once. We cannot but
catch the same vivid impression; and if we draw from
her pages no great number of definite images, we cannot
but imbibe what is more valuablethe warmth and the
life of pure, lofty and earnest sentiment.
CHARACTERISTICS OF LAMB.
[9]
[9]
From the American Quarterly Review.
In
adding our tribute to the memory of Lamb, we are
conscious of personal associations of peculiar and
touching
interest. We recall the many listless hours he has
beguiled; and the very remembrance of happy moments
induced by his quiet humor, and pleasing reveries inspired
by his quaint descriptions and inimitable pathos, is
refreshing
to our minds. It is difficult to realise that these
feelings have reference to an individual whose countenance
we never beheld, and the tones of whose voice never fell
upon our ear. Frequent and noted instances there are
in the annals of literature, of attempts, on the part of
authors
,
to introduce themselves to the intimate acquaintance
of their readers. In portraying their own characters in
those of their heroes, in imparting the history of their
lives in the form of an epic poem, a popular novel, or
through the more direct medium of a professed
autobiography
,
writers have aimed at a striking presentation of
themselves. The success of such attempts is, in general,
very limited. Like letters of introduction, they indeed,
27*
prove passports to the acquaintance, but not necessarily
to the friendship of those to whom they are addressed.
At best, they ordinarily afford us an insight into the mind
of the
author
, but seldom render us familiar and at home
with the
man
. Charles Lamb, on the contrary,if our
own experience does not deceive ushas brought himself
singularly near those who have once heartily entered into
the spirit of his lucubrations. We seem to know his
history, as if it were that of our brother, or earliest friend.
The beautiful fidelity of his first love, the monotony of
his long clerkship, and the strange feeling of leisure
succeeding
its renunciation, the excitement of his first
play, the zest of his reading, the musings of his daily
walk, and the quietude of his fireside, appear like visions
of actual memory. His image, now bent over a huge
ledger, in a dusky compting-house, and now threading the
thoroughfares of London, with an air of abstraction, from
which nothing recalls him but the outstretched hand of
a little sweep, an inviting row of worm-eaten volumes upon
an old book stall, or the gaunt figure of a venerable beggar;
and the same form sauntering through the groves about
Oxford in the vacation solitude, or seated in a little back
study, intent upon an antiquated folio, appear like actual
reminiscences rather than pictures of the fancy. The
face of his old school-master is as some familiar
physiognomy
;
and we seem to have known Bridget Elia
from infancy, and to have loved her, too,
notwithstanding
her one ugly habit of reading in company.
Indeed we can compare our associations of Charles
Lamb only to those which would naturally attach to an
intimate neighbor with whom we had, for years, cultivated
habits of delightful intercourse,stepping over his
threshold, to hold sweet commune, whenever weariness
was upon our spirits, and we desired cheering and amiable
companionship. And when death actually justified the
title affixed to his most recent paperswhich we had
fondly regarded merely as an additional evidence of his
unique method of dealing with his fellow beings,when
they really proved the
last
essays of Elia, we could
unaffectedly
apply to him the touching language, with which an
admired poet has hallowed the memory of a brother bard;
Green be the turf above thee,
Friend of my better days,
None knew thee, but to love thee,
Nor named thee, but to praise.
And were it only for the peculiar species of fame which
Lamb's contributions to the light literature of his country
have obtained him,were it only for the valuable lesson
involved in this tributary heritage,in the method by
which it was won,in the example with which it is
associated
,
there would remain ample cause for congratulation
among the real friends of human improvement; there
would be sufficient reason to remember, gratefully and
long, the gifted and amiable essayist. Instead of the
feverish
passion for reputation, which renders the existence of
the majority of professed
literateurs
of the present day, a
wearing and anxious trial, better becoming the dust and
heat of the arena, than the peaceful shades of the academy,
a calm and self-reposing spirit pervades and characterises
the writings of Lamb. They are obviously the offspring
of thoughtful leisure; they are redolent of the
otium;
and
in this consists their peculiar charm. We are disposed to
value this characteristic highly, at a time which abounds,
as does our age, with a profusion of forced and elaborate
writings. It is truly delightful to encounter a work,
however
limited in design and unpretending in execution,
which revives the legitimate idea of literature,which
makes us feel that it is as essentially
spontaneous
as the
process of vegatation, and is only true to its source and
its object, when instinct with freshness and freedom. No
mind, restlessly urged by a morbid appetite for literary
fame, or disciplined to a mechanical development of
thought, could have originated the attractive essays we are
considering. They indicate quite a different parentage.
A lovely spirit of contentment, a steadfast determination
towards a generous culture of the soul, breathes through
these mental emanations. Imaginative enjoyment,the
boon with which the Creator has permitted man to
meliorate
the trying circumstances of his lot, is evidently the
great recreation of the author, and to this he would
introduce
his readers. It is interesting to feel, that among the
many accomplished men, whom necessity or ambition
inclines
to the pursuit of literature, there are those who find
the time and possess the will to do something like justice
to their own minds. Literary biography is little else than
a history of martyrdoms. We often rise from the perusal
of a great man's life, whose sphere was the field of letters,
with diminished faith in the good he successfully pursued.
The story of disappointed hopes, ruined health, and a life in
no small degree isolated from social pleasure and the
incitement
which nature affords, can scarcely be relieved of
its melancholy aspect by the simple record of literary
success. Earnestly as we honor the principle of
self-devotion
,
our sympathy with beings of a strong intellectual
and imaginative bias is too great not to awaken, above
every other consideration, a desire for the self-possessed
and native exhibition of such a heaven-implanted
tendency
.
We cannot but wish that natures thus endowed
should be true to themselves. We feel that, in this way,
they will eventually prove most useful to the world. And
yet one of the rarest results which such men arrive at, is
self-satisfaction in the course they pursuewe do not mean
as regards the success, but the direction of their labors.
Sir James Mackintosh continually lamented, in his diary,
the failure of his splendid intentions, consoled himself
with the idea of additional enterprises, and finally died
without
completing his history. Coleridge has left only, in a
fragmentary and scattered form, the philosophical system
he proposed to develop. Both these remarkable men
passed intellectual lives, and evolved, in conversation and
fugitive productions, fruits which are worthy of a
perennial
existence; yet they fell so far short of their aims, they
realised so little of what they conceived, that an
impression
the most painful remains upon the mind that, with
due susceptibility, contemplates their career. We find,
therefore, an especial gratification in turning from such
instances, to a far humbler one indeed, but still to a man
of genius, who richly enjoyed his pleasant and
sequestered
inheritance in the kingdom of letters, and whose
comparatively
few productions bear indubitable testimony to
a mind at ease,a felicitious expansion of feeling, an
imaginative and yet contented life. It is as illustrative
of this, that the essays of Elia are mainly valuable.
In our view, the form of these writings is a great
recommendation
.
We confess a partiality for the essay. In the
literature of our vernacular tongue, it shines conspicuous,
and is environed with the most pleasing associations. To
the early English essayists is due the honor of the first and
most successful endeavors to refine the language and
manners
of their country. The essays of Dr. Johnson,
Goldsmith
,
Addison, and Steele, while they answered a most
important immediate purpose, still serve as instructive
disquisitions and excellent illustrations of style. The
essay
is to prose literature, what the sonnet is to poetry;
and as the narrow limits of the latter have enclosed some
of the most beautiful poetic imagery, and finished
expressions
of sentiment within the compass of versified writing,
so many of the most chaste specimens of elegant periods,
and of animated and embellished prose, exist in the form
of essays. The lively pen of Montaigne, the splendid
rhetoric of Burke, and the vigorous argument of John
Foster, have found equal scope in essay-writing: and
among the various species of composition at present in
vogue, how few can compare with this in general
adaptation
.
Descriptive sketches and personal traits,
speculative
suggestions and logical deductions, the force of direct
appeal, the various power of illustration, allusion and
comment, are equally available to the essayist. His
essay
may be a lay-sermon or a satire, a criticism or a
reverie
.
Of the words of men, says Lord Bacon, there
is nothing more sound and excellent than are letters; for
they are more natural than orations, and more advised
than sudden conferences. Essays-combine the qualities
here ascribed to the epistolary composition; indeed, they
may justly be regarded as letters addressed to the public;
embodyingin the delightful style which characterises the
private correspondence of cultivated friendsviews and
details of more general interest.
There is more reason to regret the decline of
essay-writing
,
from the fact, that the forms of composition now
in vogue, are so inferior to it both in intrinsic excellence
and as vehicles of thought. There is, indeed, a class of
writers whose object is, professedly and solely, to amuse;
or if a higher purpose enters into their design, it does not
extend beyond the conveyance of particular historical
information
.
But the majority of prominent authors
cherish
as to their great end, the inculcation of certain
principles
of action, theories of life, or views of humanity.
We may trace in the views of the most justly admired
writers of our own day, a favorite sentiment or theory
pervading
,
more or less, the structure of their several volumes,
and constantly presenting itself under various aspects,
and in points of startling contrast or thrilling impression.
We honor the deliberate and faithful presentation of a
theory, on the part of literary men, when they deem it
essential
to the welfare of their race. Loyalty to such an
object bespeaks them worthy of their high vocation; and
we doubt if an author can be permanently useful to his
fellow beings and true to himself, without such a light
to guide, and such an aim to inspire. Dogmatical
attachment
to mere opinion is doubtless opposed to true
progression in thought, but fidelity in the development
and vivid portraiture of a sentiment knit into the
well-being
of man, and coincident with his destiny, is among
the most obvious of literary obligations. Something of
chivalric interest is attached to Sidney's Defence of
Poesy; the anxiety for the reform of conventional
customs
and modes of thinking in society, so constantly
evinced in the pages of the Spectator, commands our
sympathy and respect; and we think the candid objector
to Wordsworth's view of his divine art, cannot but honor
the steadiness with which he has adhered to, and
unfolded
it. Admitting, then, the dignity of such literary
ends,the manner in which they can be most effectually
accomplished, must often be a subject of serious
consideration
.
It is generally taken for granted, that the public will
give ear to no teacher who cannot adroitly practise the
expedient
so beautifully illustrated by Tasso, in the simile of
the chalice of medicine with a honeyed rim. True as it
is, that in an age surfeited with books of every description,
there exists a kind of necessity for setting decoys afloat
upon the stream of literatureis not the faith in literary
lures altogether too perfect? Does the mental offspring
we have cherished, obtain the kind of attention we desire,
when ushered into the world arrayed in the garb of fiction?
The experiment, we acknowledge, succeeds in one
respect
.
The inviting dress will attract the eyes of the
multitude
;
but how few will penetrate to the theory,
appreciate
the moral, or enter into the thoughts to which the
fanciful costume is only the drapery and frame-work?
The truth is, the very object of writers who would present
a philosophical problem through the medium of a novel, is
barely recognized. Corinna is still regarded as a
romance
sui generis
. Several efforts of the kind, on the
part of living British writers of acknowledged power, seem
to have utterly failed of their purpose, as far as the mass of
readers, whom they were especially intended to affect, are
concerned. The plan in such instances, is strictly
psychological
.
Public attention, however, is at once riveted
on the plot and details; and some strong delineation of
human passion, some trivial error in the external
sketching
,
some over intense or too minute personation of
feeling
,
suffices, we do not say how justly, to condemn the
work in the vieweven of the discriminating. Now we
are confident, that should the writers in question choose
the essay as a vehicle of communication, their success in
many cases would be more complete. Their ideas of life,
of a foreign land, of modern society, or of human destiny,
presented in this shape, with the graces of style, the
attraction
of anecdote, and the vivacity of wit and feeling,
could not but find their way to the only class of readers
who will ever estimate such labors; those who read to
excite thought, as well as beguile time; to gratify an
intellectual
taste, as well as amuse an ardent fancy. The
novel, too, is in its very nature ephemeral. The very
origin of the word associates such productions with the
gazettes and magazinesthe temporary caskets of
literature
.
And with the exception of Scott's, and a few
admirable
historical romances, novels seem among the most
28
frail of literary tabernacles. Now, in reference to the
class of authors to whom we have alluded, those who have
a definite and important point in view, who are
enthusiastic
in behalf of a particular moral or mental enterprise,
the evanescent nature of the popular vehicle is an
important
consideration. We would behold a more permanent
personification of their systems, a more lasting testimony
of their interest in humanity. And such we consider the
essay. When presented, condensed, and embellished in
this more primitive form, a fair opportunity will be
afforded
for the candid examination of their sentiments; and
we are persuaded that these very ideas, thus arranged and
disseminated, will possess a weight and an interest which
they can never exhibit when displayed in the elaborate
and desultory manner incident to popular fiction. An
interesting illustration of these remarks may be found in
the circumstance that many intelligent men, who are quite
inimical to Bulwer, as a novelist, have become interested
in his mind by the perusal of England and the English,
and The Studentworks which are essentially
specimens of essay writing. The dramatic form of
composition
has recently been adopted in England, to
subserve
the theoretical purposes of authors. This, it must
be confessed, is a decided improvement upon the more
fashionable method; and the favor with which it has
been received, is sufficiently indicative of the readiness
of the public to become familiar with nobler models of
literature.
We are under no slight obligations to Charles Lamb,
for so pleasantly reviving a favorite form of English
composition
.
We welcome Elia as the Spectator-
redivivus
It is interesting to be amused and instructed after the
manner of that delectable coterie of lay-preachers,
humorists
,
and critics, of which Sir Roger de Coverly was so
distinguished a member. It is peculiarly agreeeble to be
talked to in a book, as if the writer addressed himself to
us particularly. Next to a long epistle from an
entertaining
friend, we love, of all things in the world, a charming
essay;a concise array of ideasan unique sketch, which
furnishes subjects for an hour's reflection, or gives rise to
a succession of soothing day-dreams. Few books are more
truly useful than such as can be relished in the brief
intervals
of active or social life, which permit immediate
appreciation, and, taken up when and where they may be,
present topics upon which the attention can at once fix
itself, and trains of speculation into which the mind easily
glides. To such a work we suppose a celebrated writer
alludes, in the phrase parlor window-seat book.
Collections
of essays are essentially of this order. We would
not be understood, however, as intimating that this kind
of literature is especially unworthy of studious regard;
Bacon's Essays alone would refute such an idea; but from
its conciseness and singleness of aim, the essay may
be enjoyed in a brief period, and when the mind is
unable
to attach itself to more elaborate reading. A volume
of essays subserves the purpose of a set of cabinet
pictures
,
or a port-folio of miniature drawings; they are the
multum in parvo
of literature; and, perused, as they
generally
are, in moments of respite from ordinary
occupation
,
turned to on the spur of mental appetite, they not
unfrequently prove more efficient than belles-lettres
allurements
of greater pretension. It is seldom that any
desirable
additions are made in this important department
of writing; and among the contributions of the present
age, the essays of Elia will deservedly hold an elevated
rank.
Much of the interest awakened by these papers, has
been ascribed to the peculiar phraseology in which they
are couched. Doubtless, this characteristic has had its
influence; but we think an undue importance has been
given it, and we feel that the true zest of Elia's manner
is as spontaneous as his ideas, and the shape in which
they naturally present themselves. If we analyse his mode
of expression, we shall find its charm consists not a little
in the expert variation rather than in a constant
maintenance
of style. He understood the proper time and place
to introduce an illustration; he knew when to serve up
one of his unequalled strokes of humor, and when to
change the speculative for the descriptive mood. He had
a happy way of blending anecdote and portraiture; he
makes us see the place, person, or thing, upon which he
is dwelling; and, at the moment our interest is excited,
presents an incident, and then, while we are all attention,
imparts a moral, or lures us into a theorising vein. He
personifies his subjcet, too, at the appropriate moment;
nor idealises, after the manner of many essayists, before
the reader sympathises at all with the real picture. Lamb's
diction breathes the spirit of his favorite school. He
need not have told us of his partiality for the old English
writers. Every page of Elia bears witness to his frequent
and fond communion with the rich, ancient models of
British literature. Yet the coincidence is, in no degree,
that which obtains between an original and a copyist.
The tinge which Lamb's language has caught from intimacy
with the quaint folios he so sincerely admired, is a
reflected
hue, like that which suffuses the arch of clouds far
above the setting sun; denoting only the delightful
influence
radiated upon the mind which loves to dwell
devotedly
upon what is disappearing, and turns with a kind of
religious interest from the new-born luminaries which the
multitude worship, to hover devotedly round the shrine of
the past. If any modern lover of letters deserved
a heritage in the sacred garden of old English
literature
,
that one was Charles Lamb. Not only did he
possess
the right which faithful husbandry yields, but his
disposition
and taste rendered him a companion meet for the
noble spirits that have immortalized the age of Elizabeth.
In truth, he may be said to have been on more familiar
terms with Shakspeare, than with the most intimate of
his contemporaries; and it may be questioned whether the
Religio Medici, that truly individual creed, had a more
devout admirer in its originator, than was Elia. He
assures
us that he was shy of facing the prospective, and
no antiquarian cherished a deeper reverence for old china,
or black letter. Most honestly, therefore, came our
author by that charming relish of olden time, which
sometimes
induces in our minds, as we read his lucubrations,
a lurking doubt whether, by some mischance, we have not
fallen upon an old author in a modern dress.
There is another feature in the style of these essays, to
28*
which we are disposed to assign no inconsiderable
influence
.
We allude to a certain confessional tone, that is
peculiarly attractive. There is something exceedingly
gratifying to the generality of readers in personalities.
On the same principle that we are well pleased to become
the
confident
of a friend, and open our breasts to receive
the secret of his inmost experience, we readily become
interested in a writer who tells us, in a candid,
nave
manner
,
the story not merely of his life, in the common
acceptation
of the term, but of his private opinions, humors,
eccentric tastes, and personal antipathies. A tone of this
kind, is remarkably characteristic of Lamb. And yet
there is in it nothing egotistical; for we may say of him
as has been said of his illustrious schoolfellow, whom he
so significantly, and, as it were, prophetically, called the
inspired charity boy;that in him the individual is
always merged in the abstract and general. Writers
have not been slow to avail themselves of the advantage
of thus occasionally and incidentally presenting glimpses
of their private notions and sentiments; indeed, this
has been called the age of confessions; but with Elia,
they are so delicately yet so familiarly imparted, that they
become a secret charm inwrought through the whole
tissue
of what he denominates his weaved up follies.
There are passages scattered through these volumes, which
exemplify the very perfection of our language. There
are successive periods, so adroitly adapted to the
sentiment
they embody, so easy and expressive, and, at the
same time, so unembellished, that they suggest a new idea
of the capabilities of our vernacular. There are words,
too, at which we should pause, if they were indited by
another, to institute a grave inquiry into their legitimacy,
or, perchance, prefer against their author the charge of
senseless affectation. But with what we know of Elia, in
catching ourselves at such a process, we could not but
waive the ceremony, and say, as he said on some equally
heartless occasionit argues an insensibility.
Another striking trait of the Essays of Elia, is the
familiarity
of their style. In this respect they frequently
combine
the freedom of oral with the more deliberative spirit
of epistolary expression. We have already alluded to one
effect of this method of address; it annihilates the
distance
between the reader and the author, and so to speak,
brings them face to face. Facility in this kind of writing,
is one of the principal elements in what is called magazine
talent. It consists in maintaining a conversational tone
while discussing a topic of great interest in a humorous
way, or making a light one the nucleus for spirited,
amusing
,
or instructive ideas. The dearth of this popular tact
in this country and its fertility in England, are well known.
We think the discrepance can be accounted for by
reference
to the essential difference in the social habits of the
two countries. The literary clubs are the nurseries of
this attractive talent in Great Britain. The custom of
convening for intellectual recreation, favors the growth of
a ready expression of thought, and of a direct and inviting
flow of language. Writers are habituated to an attractive
style by being trained in a school of conversation.
Intimate
connection with the best minds, not only informs
and kindles, but induces vivacity of delivery both in speech
and writing. We can conceive, for instance, of no
inspiration
even to the colloquial powers of an intelligent man,
like direct communion with such an individual as
Mackintosh
;
and we can find no cause for wonder, that one
blessed with the companionship of the literati of London
and Edinburgh, should acquire the power of talking on
paper in a delightful and finished manner. Such society
affords, if we may be allowed the expression, a kind of
intellectual gymnasium, where the art of interesting with
the pen may be, and naturally is, acquired by such as are
endowed with native wit, and reflective or graphic ability.
With us the case is so widely different, the opportunities
for general and exciting association so rare, that it is no
matter of surprise that magazine talent, as it is termed,
should be of slow growth. How far Charles Lamb was
indebted to his social privileges for his style, we are not
prepared to say. Yet there are numerous indications of
the happy influence of which we speak, interspersed
through his commentaries on men and things. We refer,
of course, altogether to the style; for as to the ideas, they are
entirely his own, bearing the genuine stamp of originality.
It seems essential to an efficient light literature, that those
interested in its culture should be brought into frequent
contact with each other, and with general society. A poet
who would evolve representations of humanity in abstract
forms, who would present models beyond and above his
age, may indeed find, in the shades of retirement, greater
scope and a less disturbed scene where in to rear his
imaginary
fabric; and the philosopher whose aim is the
application
of truth to history, or the delineation of some
important principle in science or art, doubtless requires
comparative solitude. The position of both is
contemplative
.
The fancy of the one would plume itself for flight,
and the eyry of the noblest birds is always among
uninvaded
haunts; the reflection of the other would grapple
with the abstract, and the deepest elemental strife of nature
is ever amid her lofty cloud-retreats, or solitary depths.
But the writer who would beguile, amuse or teach his
contemporaries
by some winning literary device, who would
accomplish all these objects at once, and do it quickly,
must mix with his fellow-creatures, and make a study of
the passers-by. He must hold familiar intercourse with
the ruling school; not to adopt their principles, but to
become disciplined by their conversation; and he should
note the multitude warily, in order to discover both the
way and the means of affecting them. The legitimate
essayist has need of a rich vocabulary, and a flexible
manner; a quick perception, and a candid address. And
these equipments, if not attainable, are at least improvable,
by social aids. Conversation, were it not utterly
misunderstood
and perverted might prove a mighty agent in the
culture of the noblest of human powers, and the sweetest
of human graces. There was a beautiful fidelity to nature
in the habits of the philosophers of the Garden. There
are few pictures so delightful in ancient history, as the
noble figure of a Grecian sage moving through a rural
resort
,
or beneath a spacious portico, imparting to his
youthful
companion lessons of wisdom, or curbing his own
advanced mind to pioneer that of his less mature auditor
through the early mazes of mental experience. The
teeming
presence of nature and art in all their variety and
eloquence, the appeal to sympathy lurking in the very
tones of wisdom, the mere inspiration of human presence,
combine to create an impression infinitely more vivid than
lonely gleanings among written lore could awaken. We
are slow to comprehend the capabilities of conversation,
or we should cultivate it sedulously, and with a deeper
faith. The single effect which we have noticed in
relation
to English literature, is of itself no inconsiderable
argument
.
If to social culture we may in a great degree
ascribe the exuberance of talent for periodical literature on
the other side of the water, there is surely no small
inducement
to elevate and quicken the conversational spirit of
our country; for whatever rank be assigned to this form of
writing, its history sufficiently attests the great influence
it is capable of exerting, and the important purposes it
may subserve. Elia, we think, gives very satisfactory
indications of his origin. Without the local allusions and
constant references to native authors, there is something
about him which smacks of London. Individual as Lamb
is, he is not devoid of national characteristics; and a
reader
,
well aware of the composite influences operative upon
men of letters who hail from the British metropolis, will
readily discover, though not informed of the fact, that
Elia was blessed with a score of honorable friends, who
have contributed to the literary fame of Great Britain.
Lamb is not singular in his attachment to minuti; it
is characteristic of the literature of the day. In
former
times, writers dealt in the general; now they are
devoted
to the particular. In almost every book of travels
and work of fiction, we are entertained, or rather the
attempt
is made to entertain us, with exceedingly detailed
descriptions of the features of a landscape, the grouping
in a picture, or the several parts of a fashionable dress.
By such wearisome nomenclature, it is expected that an
adequate conception will be imparted, when in many
cases, a single phrase, revealing the
impression
made by
these objects, would convey more than a hundred such
inventories
.
Lamb, by virtue of his nice perception,
renders
details more effective than we should imagine was
practicable. In a single line, we have the peculiarities of
a person presented; and by a brief mention of the gait,
demeanor, or perhaps a single habit, the ceremony of
introduction
is over; we not only stand and look in the
direction
we are desired, but we
see
the object, be it an old
bencher, or a grinning chimney sweep; an ancient
courtyard
,
or a quaker meeting; a roast pig, or an old actor;
Captain Jackson, or a poor wretch in the pillory,
consoling
himself by fanciful soliloquies. We have compared
essays, in their general uses, to a set of cabinet pictures.
Elia's are peculiarly susceptible of the illustration. They
are the more valuable, inasmuch as the mellow hue of old
paintings broods over them; here and there a touch of
beautiful sadness, that reminds us of Raphael; now a line
of penciling, overflowing with nature, which brings some
favorite Flemish scene to mind; and again, a certain
dreamy softness and delicate finish that whisper of Claude
Lorraine.
There are two points in which Charles Lamb was
eminent
,
where tolerable success is rare; these are pathos and
humor. He understood how to deal with the sense of the
humorous and pathetic. He seems to have been
intuitively
learned in the secret and delicate nature of these
attributes of the mind; or rather, it would appear that his
own nature, in these respects, furnished a happy criterion
by which to address the same feelings in others. We
cannot
analyse, however casually, the humor and pathos of
Elia, without perceiving that they are based on a
discerning
,
and, if the expression may be allowed, a sentimental
fellow-feeling for his kind. So ready and true was this
feeling, that we find him entering, with the greatest
facility
,
into the experience of human beings whom the
mass of society scarcely recognize as such. He talks about
a little chimney sweep, and aged mendicant, or an old
actor
,
as if he had, in his own person, given proof of the
doctrine to which his ancient friend, Sir Thomas Browne
inclined, and actually, by a kind of metempsychois,
experienced
these several conditions of life. His pathos
and humor are, for the most part, descriptive; he appeals
to us, in an artist-like and dramatic way, by pictures; we
are not wearied with any preparatory and worked up
process
;
we are not led to anticipate the effect. But our
associations are skilfully awakened; an impression is
unostentatiously conveyed, and a smile or tear first leads
us to inquire into the nature of the spell. It is as though
in riding along a sequestered road, we should suddenly
pass a beautiful avenue, and catch a glimpse of a garden, a
statue, an old castle, or some object far down its green
vista, so interesting that a reminiscence, an anticipation,
or, perchance, a speculative reverie, is thereby at once
awakened. Endeavors to touch the feelings or excite
quiet mirth fail, generally, because the design is too
obvious
,
or a strain of exaggeration is indulged in, fatal to
the end in view. Frequently, too, the call upon our
mirthful
or compassionate propensities is too direct and strong.
These feelings are not seldom appealed to, as if they were
passions
, and to be excited by passionate means.
Indignation
,
enthusiasm, and all powerful impulses, are
doubtless
to be roused by fervent appeals; but readers are best
allured
into a laugh, and it is by gentle encroachments upon
its empire, that the heart is best moved to sympathy. In
drawing his pictures, Lamb indulged not in caricature.
It is his truth, not less than his quaintness and minute
touches, that entertains and affects us. He avoids, too,
the vulgar modes of illustration. Not by description of
physiognomy or costume, does he excite our risible
tendencies
,
nor thinks he to win our pity by over-drawn
statements
of the insignia and privations of poverty. Elia is
is no poor metaphysician. He comprehends the delicacy
of touch required in the limner who would impressively
delineate, even in a quaint style, any element or form of
humanity
.
By what would almost seem a casual suggestion,
we often have a conception imparted worth scores of
wire-drawn
exemplifications. Well aware was our essayist
that a single leaf whirled by the breeze of accident upon
the soul's clear fountain, would awaken successive
undulations
of thought. He was versed in the philosophy of
association
.
He possessed the susceptibility of an affectionate
nature, and that fine sense of the
appropriate
which is one
of the most valuable of our insights; and accordingly, he
29
caused his inimitable shades of humor and pathos to
faintly mingle, yet distinctly rise. He wishes us to
realise the sufferings of poor children, and, by briefly
indicating
the mere tenor of their street-talk, causes our
hearts to melt at the piteous accents of
care
, from lips so
young. He would vindicate that excellent precept in the
counsel of old Polonius,Neither a borrower nor a
lender
be; and draws such a full-length portrait of the former
character, that when one of the species has once
inspected
it, he can never again lay the flattering unction of
self-ignorance
to his heart. He reprimands book-stealers by
describing his own impoverished shelves, and points out
the blessings of existence, by quaintly discussing the
privations attendant upon its loss. The anniversaries of
time pass not by without their several merits being
canvassed
by his pen; and although he tells us little that is
absolutely new, he holds the light of his pleasant humor up
to the faces of these annual visitants, and thenceforth
their features possess greater reality and are more easily
recognised. Not a little of Lamb's humor is shadowed
forth in the subject of his essays. Had we fallen upon
such titles in the index of any other anonymous author,
we should have set him down as one who, in straining
after
the novel, evidenced a morbid taste; but there is
nothing
more characteristic of Elia, than the topics he selects.
They are as legitimate as an undoubted signature. Should
this be questioned, let the treatment bestowed upon these
uninvestigated themes, be examined. They will prove
as well adapted to their author's genius as the life of the
Scottish peasant was to Burn's muse, or the praise of Laura
to Petrarch. Who should have written the history of
England, among the many who have tried their skill in
that illustrious task, may be a matter of doubt; and to what
American Scott are we to look for a series of romances
illustrative of our history, is yet a subject of speculation;
but no man, of ordinary perception, we presume, can for
a moment question that The Melancholy of Tailors,
the Character of an Undertaker,the Praise of
Chimney-sweepers,the Inconvenience of being
Hanged, and sundry kindred subjects, were reserved for
the pen of Elia.
That writer is wise who avails himself of a somwhat
familiar idea, in presenting his mental creations to the
public. There is need of as much consideration in
bestowing
a name upon an essay or a poem, which we wish
should be read, as in naming a child whom we would
dedicate
to fame. The same reasons for circumspection
obtain in both cases. The more original the appellation,
provided it is not utterly foreign to all general associations,
the better. But it is essential that there should be
something
which will create an interest at a glance. Our
essayist has been happy in his choice of subjects; his
wit failed him not here. Though no one has previously
written the Praise of Chimney-sweepers, yet every one
sees the dusky urchins daily, and would fain know what
can be said in their behalf. Most people have noticed
the Melancholy of Tailors, and are glad to find that some
one has undertaken philosophically to explain it. The
headings of all Elia's papers are exactly such as would
beguile us into reading when we desire to enter the region
of quiet thought, and forget our cares in some literary
pastime. There is one element of genius, the influence
of which we have never seen acknowledged, that ever
impresses our minds in reflecting on the themes to which
gifted men apply themselves. We allude to a certain
daring which induces them to grapple with topics, and
give expression to thoughts, which many have mused upon
without thinking of giving them utterance. There is
much of Byron's poetry which seems almost like a literal
transcript of our past or occasional emotions; the more
powerful and acknowledged a genius, the more fervently
do we declare the coincidence of our feelings with his
delineations. Many odd speculations have occurred to us
in reference to the strange subjects to which Lamb is
partial; we respond to most of his portraitures, and
sympathise
in the feelings he avows. His humor and pathos,
therefore, are true, singulary, beautifully true, to human
nature; in this consists their superiority. Many have
aimed at the same results in a similar way; but the genius
of Lamb, in this department, has achieved no ordinary
triumph.
The drama was a rich source of pleasure and reflection
to Lamb. During a life passed almost wholly in the
metropolis
,
the theatre afforded him constant recreation, and
the species of exitement his peculiar genius required. It
was to him an important element in the imaginative being
he cherished. By means of it, he continually renewed
and brightened the rich vein of sentiment inherent in his
nature. To him it addressed language rife with the
meaning
which characterised its ancient voice,full of
suggestive
and impressive eloquence. Deeply versed in the
whole range of dramatic literature, master of the
philosophy
of Shakspeare, and overflowing with a highly
cultivated
taste for the dramatic art, the drama was ranked by
Elia among the redeeming things of life. He did not
coldly recognise, but deeply felt, its importance to modern
society. Surrounded by the bustle, the worldliness and
the material agencies of a populous capital, he daily saw
man struggling on beneath the indurating pressure of
necessity, or presenting only artificial aspects,and to
the strong and true representation of human nature, on
the stage and in the works of the dramatist, he looked as
a noble means of renovation. It gratified his humane
spirit, that the poor mechanic should lose, for an hour, the
memory of his toilsome lot, in sympathy with some vivid
personation of that love which once sent a glow to his
now hallow temples; that the creature of fashion and
pride should, occasionally, be led back to the primal
fountains
of existence by the hand of Thespis; that an
unwonted
tear should sometimes be drawn, like a pearl from
the deep, to the eye of some fair worlding, at the mighty
appeal of nature, in the voice of an affecting portrayer of
her truth. Elia had faith in the legitimate drama, as the
native offspring of the human mind, significant of its
successive eras, and as fitted to supply one of its truest
and deepest wants; and well he might have had, for its
history was as familiar to him as a household tale; he
had explored its chronicles with the assiduity of an
enthusiast
,
and the acumen of a virtuoso; he had garnered up
its gems as the true jewels of his country's literature; he
29*
honored its worthy votaries as ministrants at the altar of
humanity; and, above all, in his own experience, he had
learned what human taste, judgment and feeling, may
derive from the wise appropriation of dramatic influence.
He knew, as well as his readers, how much he was
indebted
to an intelligent devotion to them, for the vividness
of his pencilings, the fertility of his associations, and the
beauty of his imagery. Not in vain did he seek, in
Hamlet's
musings, grounds more relative than popular reading
could afford, or turn from the inconsistencies of modern
gallantry, which he so admirably delineated, to bestow
his fond attentions upon the bright angel of Verona,
and the gentle lady wedded to the Moor.
Lamb's interest in the drama was too well founded to
be periodical, as is generally the case. He shared,
indeed
,
the common destiny, in beholding his youthful
visions of theatrical glory fade; the time came to him, as
it comes to all, when the mysterious curtain was reduced
to its actual quality, and became
bona fide
green baize,
and when the polished pilasters lost their likeness to
glorified sugar candy; but the histrionic art retained
its interest, and the literature of the drama yielded a
continual pastime. From the rainy afternoon which the
child Elia spent in such hope and fear, lest the
wayward
elements should deprive him of his first playto
the night when the sleep of the man Elia was disturbed
with visions of old Mudenhe sought and found, in the
drama, food for his reflective humor and pleasurable
occupancy
in his weary moodsif such e'er came to him
which may be doubted, since he has not so informed
us. Notwithstanding his partiality for theatrical
representations
,
few play-goers entertained a more just idea
of their frequent and necessary inadequateness. He
recognised the limits of the dramatic art. He realised,
beyond the generality of Shakspeare's admirers, the
impossibility
of presenting, by the most successful
performance
,
our deepest conception of his characters. He
knew that the wand of that enchanter dealt with things
too deep, not only for speech, but for expression. He
was impatient at the common interpretation of
Shakspeare's
mind. In the stillness of his retired study, the
creations of the bard appeared to him, as in an exalted
dream. In the attentive perusal of his plays,the
delicate
touches, the finer shades, the under current of
philosophy
,
were revealed to the mind of Lamb with an
impressiveness, of which personification is
unsusceptible
;
and few of his essays are more worthy of his
genius than that which embodies his views on this subject.
It should be attentively read by all who habitually honor
the minstrel of Avon, without being perfectly aware why
the honor is due. It will lead such to new investigations
into the mysteries of that wonderful tragic lore, upon
which the most gifted men have been proud to offer
one useful comment, or advance a single illustrative hint.
To the acted and written drama, Lamb assigned an
appropriate office; he believed each had its purpose
and that he who would derive the greatest benefit
from either, should study them relatively and in
conjunction
.
Such was his own method, and to the steadiness
and success with which he pursued it, his writings bear
the most interesting testimony. The
got
with which he
dwells upon his dramatic reminiscences, the delight he
takes in living over scenes of this kind,in recalling,
after an interval of years, the enjoyment of a single
evening
of Liston's or Bensley's acting, indicate the
intelligence
and warmth of his love of theatrical performances;
while his successful efforts in reviving the nearly
forgotten
dramatic literature of the English stage, and his
admirable
essays, directly or indirectly devoted to the
general
subject, evince his application and attachment to it.
His talents as a dramatic critic are everywhere visible.
There is one feature of our author's devotion to the drama,
which is too characteristic of the man, and too intrinsically
pleasing, to be unnoticed. He never forgot those who
had contributed to his pleasure in this manner. They
were not to him the indifferent, unestimated beings they
are to the majority of those who are amused and
instructed
by their labors. Charles Lamb respected the genius
of a splendid tragedian on the same grounds that that of a
fine sculptor won his admiration. He believed one as
heaven-bestowed as the other. He recognized his
intellectual
or moral obligations to an affecting actor as
readily
as to a favorite author. He sincerely respected the
ideality of the profession, sympathised in the life of toil
and comparative isolation it imposes, and felt for the
deserving
and ambitious who had, by assiduous culture and
native energy, risen to its summit only to look forward
from that long sought elevation, to a brief continuance of
success, followed by an unhonored decline, an age of
neglect, and the world's oblivion.
One of Lamb's most winning traits is his sincerity.
The attractiveness of this beautiful virtue, even in
literature
,
is worthy of observation. It seems to be an
ordination
of the intellectual world, and a blessed one it is to
those who cherish faith in a spiritual philosophythat
truth of expression shall alone prove powerfully and
permanently
effective. It is happy that we are so constituted
as to be moved chiefly, if not solely, by voices attuned
and awakened by genuine emotion; it is well when
foreign
aids and the most insinuating of conventional
appliances
fail to deceive us into admiration of an artificial
literary aspirant; it is a glorious distinction of our
common
nature, that soul-prompted language is the only
universally
acknowledged eloquence. The mission of
individual
genius is to exhibit itself. The advocacy of
popular opinions, the illustration of prevailing theories
the literary party-work of the day, may be undertaken by
such as are unconscious of any more special and
personal
calling. But let there be a self-preaching priesthood
in the field of letters and of art, to teach the great lesson
of human individuality. Let some gifted votaries of
literature
and philosophy breathe original symphonies, instead
of merging their rich tones in the general chorus.
Unfortunate
is the era when such men are not; and thrice
illustrious that in which they abound. The history of the
world proves this; and in proportion as an author is
sincere
,
in whatever age, he deserves our respect. We
spontaneously
honor minds of this order, in whatever form
they are encountered. The complacent smile with which
douce Davie Deans, in Scott's most beautiful tale, hears
himself denominated a
Deanite
, recommends him to our
esteem. And when a poet or an essayist is as habitually
and earnestly candid as is Elia, we feel and acknowledge
his worth, whatever may be the calibre of his genius.
Many and singular are the advantages attendant upon
this characteristic. The most obvious is that it brings
out the true powerthe
propium ingenium
of the
individual
.
Look at the history of Milton and Dante. They
surveyed their immediate social circumstances for a
reflection
of themselves in vain; and then in calm
confidence
they turned to the mirror fountain within
themselves
,
and thence evolved thoughtsunappreciated,
indeed
,
by their contemporaries, yet in the view of posterity
none the less oracular. And such intellectual laborers
however confined and comparatively unimportant the
sphere of effortbeing absolved from any undue
allegiance
to merely temporary influences, give to their
productions
a free and personal stamp. Truth is to
literature
,
what, in the view of the alchymists, the philosopher's
stone was to the base metals; it converts all it touches
into
gold. And, although our author had to do mainly with
topics which a superficial reasoner would term trifling,
yet his lovely sincerity gives them a character, and sheds
upon them a warm and soothing light more pleasing than
weightier themes, less ingenously treated, can often boast.
Being sincere, of course Elia wrote only from the
inspiration
of his overflowing spirit; he seems to have penned
every line, to have thrown off every essay,
con amore
.
He did not require the expedient of the Greek painter,
who covered the face of one of his great figures with a
mantle, not daring to attempt a portraiture of the intense
grief which he represented him as suffering. Lamb
endeavored
not to express what he did not feel; he wrote
not from necessity or policy, but from enthusiasm, from
his own gentle, sweet, yet deep enthusiasm. He had a
feeling for the art of writing, and therefore he would not
make it the hackneyed conventional agent it often is;
but ever regarded it as a crystalline mould wherein he could
faithfully present the form, hues, and very spirit of his
sentiments and speculations.
A striking and delightful consequence of this literary
sincerity is, that it preserves and developes the proper
humanity of the author.
Literati
of this class are utterly
devoid of pedantry. In society, and the common
business
of life, they are as other men, except that a finer
sensibility
,
and more elevated general taste, distinguishes
them. In becoming writers, they cease not to be men.
Literature is then, indeed, what the English poet would
have it,an honorable
augmentation
to our arms; it
is not exclusively pursued as if it were life's only good,
and a human being's sole aim; but it is applied to as a
beautiful accomplishmenta poetical recreation amid less
humanizing influences. Thus, instead of serving
merely
as an arena for the display of selfish ambition, or a cell
wherein unsocial and barren devotion may find scope, it
is valued chiefly as the means of embodying the unforced
impressions of our own natures, for the happiness and
improvement of our fellow creatures. We say that such
a view must be taken by sincere authors of their vocation,
because they cannot but feel that by the very constitution of
their natures, literature is only a part of the great whole
of the soul's beinga single form of its development, and
one among the thousand offices to which the versatile
mind is called.
It is needless to prove, in detail, Lamb's sincerity. It
is, perhaps, his most prominent characteristic; but in
tracing
out and dwelling upon its influence, we are newly
impressed with the truth of Shaftesbury's declaration, that
wisdom is more from the heart than from the head.
We have ever remarked that the most delightful and truly
sincere writers are the most suceptible, affectionate, and
unaffected men. We have felt, that however intellectually
endowed, the feelings of such individuals are the true
sources of their power. Sympathy we consider one of the
primal principles of efficient genius. It is this truth of
feeling which enabled Shakspeare to depict so strongly
the various stages of passion, and the depth, growth, and
gradations of sentiment. In whom does this primitive
readiness to sympathizeto enter into all the moods of the
soulcontinue beyond early life, so often as in men
devoted
to imaginative objects? How frequently are we
struck with the child-like character of artists and poets!
It sometimes seems as if, along with childhood's ready
sympathy, many of the other characteristics of that epoch
were projected into the more mature stages of being.
There is often, says Madame de Stal, in true genius
a sort of awkwardness, similar, in some respects, to the
credulity of
sincere
and noble souls.
This readiness to catch impressions, this delicacy and
warmth of sympathy which belongs to the sincere school
of writers, is inestimable. It is said that a musical
amateur
traversed the whole of Ireland, and gathered from the
peasants the delightful airs to which Moore's beautiful
Irish melodies were afterwards adapted. How much of
the charm of those sweet songs is owing to their
associations
with the native and simple music thus gleaned
from voices to which it had traditionally descended!
And it is by their sympathytheir sincere and universal
interest in humanity, that the sweetest poets, the most
renowned
dramatists, and such humble gleaners in the field
of letters, as our quaint essayist, are enabled to write in a
manner corresponding with the heaven-attuned, unwritten
music of the human heart. Sincerity gives them the
means of interpreting for their fellow beingsnot only
the lofty subjects which filled the soul of the blind bard
of Paradise, and the broad range of life upon which the
observant mind of the poet of human nature was intent,
but those lesser and more unique themes which Elia loved
to speculate about, and humorously illustrate.
There is a unity of design in the essays of Elia.
Disconnected
and fugitive as we should deem them at first
sight, an attentive persual reveals, if not a complete theory,
yet a definite and pervading spirit which is not devoid of
philosophy. After being amused by Lamb's humor,
interested
by his quaintness, and fascinated by his style, there
yet remains a more deep impression upon our minds.
We feel that he had a specific object as an essayist; or, at
least, that the ideas he suggests tend to a particular result.
30
What, then, was his aim? As an author, what mission
does he fulfil? We think Charles Lamb is to life what
Wordsworth is to nature. The latter points out the
field flowers, and the meadow rill, the soul's most primal and
simple movements, the mind's most single and
unsophisticated
tendencies; the former indicates the lesser, and
scarcely noticed sources of pleasure and annoyance, mirth
and reflection, which occur in the beaten track of
ordinary
life. It was remarked, by an able critic, of the author
of the Lyrical Ballads, that, he may be said to take a
personal interest in the universe; with equal truth Elia
may be regarded as taking a personal interest in life. He
delighted in designating its every-day, universal, and for
that very reasondisregarded experiences. Leaving the
delineation of martyrdoms, and the deeper joys of the
heart, to more ambitious writers, he preferred to dwell upon
the misery of children when left awake in their solitary
beds in the dark; to shadow forth the peace
destroying
phantom of a poor relation; to draw up eloquent
bacheloric complaints of the behavior of married people;
to describe in touching terms, the agony of one
condemned
to hear music without an ear; and to lament
pathetically
the unsocial aspect of a metropolitan Sabbath, and
the disturbing, heartless conduct of those who remove
old landmarks. He did not sorrow only over minor
miseries
,
but gloried in minor pleasures. To him, Elysian
exemptions from ordinary toila sweet morning's nap
a sympathetic solitudean incidental act or emotion of
benevolence, and, especially, those dear treasures cased
in leathern covers, for which he was so thankful that he
assures us that he could say grace before reading them;
these, and such as these, were to Charles Lamb absolute
and recognized blessings. He seems to have broken away
from the bondage of custom and to have seen all things
new. One would think, to note the freshness of his
perceptions
in regard to the most familiar objects of London,
that in manhood he was for the first time initiated into city
lifethat he was a new comer in the world at an advanced
age. Hogarth found no more delight in his
street-pencilings
,
than Lamb in his by-way speculations. In the
voyage of life he seemed to be an ordained
cicerone
,
directing
attention to that lesser world of experience to
which the mass of men are insensible,drawing their
attention
from far-off visions of good, and oppressive
reminiscences
of grief, to the low green herbage, springing up
in their way, and the soft gentle voices breathing at their
firesides, and around their daily steps. And there is truth
in Elia's philosophy, for,
If rightly trained and bred,
Humanity is humble,finds no spot
Her heaven-guided feet refuse to tread.
We never rise from one of his essays without a feeling
of contentment. He leads our thoughts to the actual,
available
springs of enjoyment. He reconciles us to ourselves;
causing home-pleasures, and the charms of the wayside,
and the mere comforts of existence, to emerge from the
shadow into which our indifference has cast them, into
the light of fond recognition. The flat dull surface of
common
life, he causes to rise into beautiful
basso-relievo
. In
truth, there are few better teachers of gratitude than Lamb.
He rejuvenates our worn and weary feelings, revives the
dim flame of our enthusiasm, opens our eyes to real
and present good, and with his humorous accents, and
unpretending
manner, reads us a homily on the folly of
desponding
,
and the wisdom of appreciating the cluster of
minor joys which surround, and may be made continually
to cheer our being.
We have endeavored to designate the most prominent
of Charles Lamb's traits as an essayist. There is,
however
,
one point to which all that we know of the man
converges
.
His literary and personal example tends to one
striking lesson, which should not be thoughtlessly
received
.
We allude to his singular and constant devotion to
the ideal. Indeed he is one of those beings who make us
deeply and newly feel how much there is within a human
spirit,how independent it may become of extrinsic aids,
how richly it may live to itself. Here is an individual
whose existence was, for the most part, spent within the
smoky precincts of London; first a school-boy at a
popular
institution, then a laborious clerks, and at length a
lean annuitant. Public life, with its various mental
incitements
,foreign
travel, with its thousand fertilizing
associations,fortune, with the unnumbered objects of
taste she affords,ministered not to him. Yet with what
admirable constancy did he follow out that sense of the
beautiful, and the perfect, which he regarded as most
essentially
himself! How ardently did he cherish an
ideal life! When outward influences and social
restrictions
encroached upon this, his great end,the drama,
his favorite authors, a work of art, or a musing hour, were
proved restoratives. He did not gratify his fondness for
antiquity among the ruins of the ancient world; but the
Temple cloisters, or an old folio, were more eloquent to
him of the past, than the Coloseum is to the mass of
travellers
.
He knew not the happiness of conjugal affection;
but his attachment to a departed object was to him a
spring of as deep joy, as the unimaginative often find in
an actual passion. No little prattlers came about him at
even-tide; but dream-children, as lovely as cherubs,
solaced
his lonely hours. The taste, the love, the very
being of Charles Lamb, was ideal. The struggles for
power and gain went on around him; but the tumult
disturbed
not his repose. The votaries of pleasure swept by
him with all the insignia of gaiety and fashion; but the
dazzle and laugh of the careless throng lured him not
aside. He felt it was a blessed privilege to stand
beneath
the broad heavens, to saunter through the fields, to
muse upon the ancient and forgotten, to look into the
faces of men, to rove on the wings of fancy, to give scope
to the benevolent affections, and especially to evolve from
his own breast a light touching
all things
with hues of
heaven; in a word to be Elia. And is there not a
delight
in contemplating such a life beyond that which the
annals of noisier and more heartless men inspire? In an
age of restless activity, associated effort, and a devotion to
temporary ends, is there not an unspeakable charm in the
character of a consistent idealist? When we can recall so
many instances of the perversion of the poetical
temperament
in gifted natures, through passion and error, is
30*
there not consolation in the serene and continuous
gratification
with which it blessed Lamb? He has now left
forever, the haunts accustomed to his presence. No
more will Elia indite quaint reminiscences and humorous
descriptions for our pleasure; no more will his criticism
enlighten, his pathos affect, or his aphorisms delight us.
But his sweet and generous sympathies, his refined taste
for the excellent in letters, his grateful perception of the
true good of being, his
ideal
spirit, dwells latently in
every bosom. And all may brighten andr adiate it, till
life's cold pathway is warm with the sunshine of the soul.
MISCELLANY.
THE BACHELOR RECLAIMED;
A SKETCH FROM REAL LIFE.
So, you are determined not to marry?
Absolutely.
And why?
In the first place, I never expect to be able to support
a wife according to my ideas of comfort. In the second
place, I have no hope of meeting a woman who will
sympathise
sufficiently with my feelings and views, to be a
congenial companion. Thirdly, I cannot bear the idea of
adopting as constant associates the relations of her I may
love, and fourthly, I consider housekeeping and all the
details of domestic arrangements, the greatest bore in
existence.
This colloquy took place between two young men, in
the garden of one of the fashionable hotels at Saratoga.
It was a sultry afternoon, and they had retired under the
shade of an apple-tree, to digest their dinner, which
process
they were facilitating by occasionally puffing some
very mild, light-brown Havana segars. The last
remarks
were uttered in a very calm and positive tone, by
McNiel, a philosophical and quiet gentleman, who had
a most sensible theory for everything in life. Among
other things, he took great pleasure in the conviction
that he thoroughly understood himself. The first time
his interest was truly excited by a member of the gentler
sex, he had acted in the most extravagant manner, and
barely escaped with honor from forming a most
injudicious
connection. To guard against similar mishaps,
he had adopted a very ingenious plan. Being
uncommonly
susceptible to female attractions, he made it a
rule when charmed by a sweet face, or thrilled by a
winning
voice, to seek for some personal defect or weakness
of character, in the fair creature, and obstinately dwell
upon these imperfections, until they cast a shade over the
redeeming traits, and dissolved the spell he feared.
When this course failed, he had but one resource.
With Falstaff, he thought discretion the better part of
valor, and deliberately fled from the allurements that
threatened his peace. Thus he managed not to allow
love to take permanent possession, and, after various
false alarms and exciting vigils, came to the conclusion
that no long siege or sudden attack would ever subdue the
citadel of his affections,
But McNiel had so braced himself in a spirit of
resistance
,
that he had made no provision against the
unconscious
lures of beauty. He could chat, for hours,
with a celebrated
belle
, and leave her without a sigh;
he could smile at the captivating manners which
over-came
his fellows. Regarding society as a battle-field,
he went thither armed at all points, resolved to
maintain
his self-possession, and be on the watch against the
wiles of woman. He had seen lovely girls in the
drawing-room
,
followed their graceful movements in the
dance, heard them breathe songs of sentiment at the
piano, and walked beside them on the promenade. On
these occasions, he coolly formed an estimate of their
several graces, perfeetly appreciated every finely-chiselled
nose and tempting lip, noted with care the hue and
expression of the eye, but walked proudly away at
parting
,
murmuring to himself, all this I see, yet am not in
love.
But who can anticipate the weapon that shall lay him
low, or make adequate provision against the inexhaustible
resources of love? McNiel had sat for a week at
table, opposite an invalid widow and her daughter. He
had passed them potatoes not less than a dozen times,
and helped the young lady twice to cherry-pie. The
only impression he had derived from their demeanor
and appearance, was, that they were very genteel and
quiet. On the morning after his conversation in the
garden, he awoke just before sunrise, and found
himself
lying with his face to the wall, in one of the
diminutive
chambers in which visitors to the Springs are so
unceremoniously packed. His eyes opened within six
inches of the plaster; and he amused himself for some
minutes, in conjuring the cracks and veins it displayed,
into imaginary forms of warriors and animals. At
length his mind reverted to himself, and his present
quarters. Well, I've been here just a fortnight, thus
he mused, and a pretty dull time I've had of it. Day
after day, the same stupid routine. In the morning I
swallow six glasses of Congress water at the spring,
with the hollow eyes of that sick minister from
Connecticut
glaring on me like a serpent, and the die-away
tones of that nervous lady from Philadelphia, sounding
like a knell in my ears. I cannot drink in peace for
those everlasting Misses Hill, who all three chatter at
once, and expect me to be entertaining and talkative so
early in the morning, with my stomach full of cold liquid,
and a long dull day in perspective! Then comes
breakfast
.
The clatter of plates, the murmur of voices, the
rushing of the black waiters, and the variety of steams,
make me glad to retreat. I find a still corner of the
piazza, and begin to read; but the flies, a draught of
air, or the intrusive gabble of my acquaintances, utterly
prevent me from becoming absorbed in a book. It has
now grown too warm to walk, and I look in vain for Dr.
Clayton, who is the only man here whose
conversation
interests me. I avoid the billiard-room because I
know who I shall meet there. The swing is occupied.
The thrumming on the piano of that old maid from
Providence, makes the saloon uninhabitable. They are
talking politics in the bar-room. The very sight of the
newspapers gives me a qualm. I involuntarily begin to
doze, when that infernal gong sounds the hour to dress.
No matter; any thing for a relief. Dinner is
insufferable
;
more show and noise, than relish and comfort.
How gladly I escape to the garden and smoke! That
reminds we of what I told Jones, yesterday, about
matrimony
.
31
He laughed at me. But there's no mistake
about it. Catch me to give up my freedom, and provide
for a familybe pestered with a whole string of new
connections
,
when I can't bear those I have nownever have
a moment to myselfbe obliged to get up in the night for a
doctorhave to pay for a boy's schooling, and be plauged
to death by him for my painsbe bothered constantly with
bad servantssee my wife lose her beauty, in a
twelve-month
from, caremy goddess become a mere household
drudgegive up segarskeep precise hourstake care
of sick childrengo to market! never, never,
never!
As his reverie thus emphatically terminated, NcNiel
slowly raised himself to a sitting posture, in order to
ascertain
the state of the weather, when a sight presented
itself which at once put his philosophy to flight and
startled him from his composure. He did not cry out,
but hushed his very breath. Beside him lay a female
form in profound slumber. Her hair had escaped from
its confinement, and fell in the richest profusion around
her face. There was a delicate glow upon the checks.
The lips were scarcely parted. The brow was perfectly
serene. One arm was thrust under her head, the other
lay stretched upon the coverlid. It was one of those
accidental
attitudes which sculptors love to embody. The
bosom heaved regularly. He felt that it was the slumber
of an innocent creature, and that beneath that calm breast
beat a kindly and pure heart. He bent over the vision,
for so at first it seemed to him, as did Narcissus above
the crystal water. The peaceful beauty of that face
entered
his very soul. He trembled at the still regularity of
the long, dark eye-lashes, as if it were death personified.
Recovering himself, all at once something familiar struch
him in the countenance. He thought awhile, and the
whole mystery was solved. It was the widow's daughter.
They occupied the adjoining chamber; she had gone
down stairs in the night to procure something for the
invalid
,
and on returning, entered in the darkness, the wrong
room, and fancying her mother asleep, had as she thought
very quietly taken her place beside her, and was soon lost
in slumber. No sooner did this idea take possession of
McNiel, than with the utmost caution and a noiseles
movement
,
he stole away and removed every vestige of his
presence into a vacant apartment opposite, leaving the
fair intruder to suppose she alone had occupied the room
At breakfast, he observed the mother and daughter
whisper
and smile together, and soon ascertained that they
had no suspicion of the actual state of the case. With
the delicacy that belonged to his character, McNiel in
wardly vowed to keep the secret forever in his own breast
Meantime, with much apparent hilarity, he prepared to
accompany Jones to Lake George. His companion
marvelled to perceive this unwonted gaiety wear off a
they proceeded in their ride. McNiel became silent and
pensive. The evening was fine, and they went upon the
lake to enjoy the moonlight. Jones sung his best song
and woke the echoes with his bugle. His friend
remained
silent, wrapt in his cloak, at the boat's stern. At last
very abruptly he sprang up, and ordered the rowers to
land him. Where are you going? inquired Jones
To Saratoga, was the reply. Not to-night, surely?'
Yes, now, this instant. Entertaining some fears for
his friend's sanity, Jones reluctantly devoted that lovely
night to a hard ride over a sandy road, instead of
lingering
away its delightful hours, on the sweet bosom of the
lake.
Six months after, McNiel married the widow's
daughter
,
and the ensuing summer, when I met him at
Saratoga
,
he assured me he found it a delightful residence.
HAIR.
Hair
is an eloquent emblem. It is the mother's pride
to dress her child's rich locks; the lover's joy to gaze on
the hair-locket of his mistress; the mourner's despair to
see the ringlet stir as if in mockery of death, by the
marble
cheek of the departed. How the hue of hair is
hallowed
to the fancy! From the glossy raven to the silver
sable, from the brown in the shadow, and gold in the
sun, to the blonde and silken thread, there is a vocabulary
of hues appealing to each memory.
The beautiful economy of nature is signally displayed
in the human hair. The most simple expedient in the
animal frame, the meanest adjunct, as it were, to the
figure, yet how effective!
Hyacinthine locks
Round from his parted forelock manly hung
Clustering, but not beneath his shoulders broad:
She, as a veil, down to the slender waist,
Her unadorned tresses wore,
Disheveled, but in wanton ringlets wav'd,
As the vine curls her tendrils, which implies
31*
Subjection, but required with gentle sway,
And by her yielded, by him best received,
Yielded with coy submission, modest pride,
And sweet, reluctant, amorous delay.
In this passage, the blind bard of Paradise has
interpreted
the natural language of woman's hair before the
artifices
of fashion had marred its natural grace. Whoever
has attentively perused one of the pictures of the old
masters
,
where a female figure is represented, must have
perceived
,
perhaps unconsciously, that the long flexible
ringlets
conveyed an impression to the mind of dependence.
The short, tight curls of a gladiatorial statue, on the
contrary
,
give the idea of self-command and unyielding will.
There is a poetical charm in the unshorn tresses of a
beautiful woman, which Milton has not exaggerated. I
have seldom received a more sad conviction of the
bitterness
of poverty, than was conveyed by the story of a lovely
girl in one of the continental towns, who was obliged to
sell her hair for bread. She was of humble parentage,
but nature had adorned her head with the rarest perfection.
Her luxuriant and glowing ringlets, constituted the pride
of her heart. She rejoiced in this distinction as the
redeeming
point of her destiny. Often would a blush of
pleasure suffuse her cheek as she caught a stranger's eye
regarding them with admiration, when at her lowly toil.
The homeliness of her garb, and the poverty of her condition
were relieved by this native adornment. It is wonderful
to what slight tokens the self-respect of poor mortals will
cling, and how the very maintenance of virtue often
depends
upon some frail association. A strain of music,
glimpses of a remembered countenance, a dream, a word,
will often annihilate a vile intention, or unseal the
fountain
of the heart. A palm tree in England drew tears
from an Eastern wanderer; and the native wisdom of
Jeanie Deans led her to make her first visit to the Duke
of Argyle, arrayed in a plaid, knowing his honor's heart
would warm to the tartan. And thus to the
simple-hearted
maiden her rich and flowing hair was a crown of
glorythe only circumstance that elevated her in her own
estimation. And when the iron necessity of want came
upon her, and she was a homeless orphanwhen every
thing had been parted with, and all appeals to compassion
had failed, the spirit of the poor creature yielded to
hunger
,
and she sold her hair. Before this sacrifice, she had
resisted, with the heroism of innocence, the temptation to
purchase food at the expense of honor. But when the
wants of nature were appeased, and she went forth shorn
of her cherished ornament, the consciousness of her loss
induced despair, and she resigned herself hopelessly to a
career of infamy.
Abundant hair is said to be indicative of strength, and
fine hair, of susceptibility. In the hair are written the
stern lessons of life. It falls away from the head of
sickness
,
and the brows of the thoughtful. The bright lot of
childhood is traced in its golden threads, the free buoyancy
of youth is indicated by its wild luxuriance; the throe of
anguish, the touch of age, entwine it with a silver tissue;
and intensity of spirit will there anticipate the snows of
time. The hair of Columbus was white at thirty; and
before that period, Shelley's dark waving curls were
dashed
with snow. In the account of the execution of the
unfortunate Mary, the last touch of pathos is given to the
scene when it is stated that as the executioner held up the
severed head, it was perceived that the auburn locks were
thickly strewn with grey.
Associations of sentiment attach strongly to the hair.
Around it is wreathed the laurel garland of fame. Amid
it tremble the flowers of a bridal. Putting up the hair is
the signal of womanhood. The Andalusian women
always
wear roses in their glossy black hair. The
barbarous
practice of scalping doubtless originated in a
savage idea of desecrating the temple of the soul, as
well as of gathering trophies of victory. The head is
shaven by the monks in token of humility, and the
stationary
civilization of the Chinese is indicated by no
custom more strikingly than that of wearing only a single
cue, the very acme of unpicturesque. There were few
more characteristic indications of a highly artificial state
of society than the absurd style of dressing the head once
so fashionable. Even at the present day, no part of
female
costume betrays individual taste more clearly than
the style in which the hair is worn. To tear the hair is a
true expression of despair, and the patriarchal ceremony
of scattering ashes on the head, was the deepest sign of
sorrow. How much the desolate grandeur of the scene
on the heath, in Lear, is augmented by his white flakes
that challenge pity, and what a picture we have of
Bassanio's
love, when he says
Her sunny locks
Hang on her temples like a golden fleece,
Which makes her seat at Belmont, Colchos strand,
And many Jasons come in quest of her.
The women at the siege of Messina, wrought their hair
into bow-strings for the archers, and on a similar occasion
in the Spanish wars, the females of a small garrison bound
their hair under the chin, to appear like beard, and
arranging
themselves on the ramparts, induced the enemy
to surrender.
Sampson's hair was singularly associated with his
misfortunes
,
and the abundant locks of Absalom wrought
the downfall of his pride. It is often a net to entrap the
affections. The hair speaks to the heart. Laura's flying
tresses haunted Petrarch's fancy:
Qual Ninfa in fonti, in selve, mai qual Dea
Chiome d' oro si fino a l'aura sciolse?
That the hair may figure to advantage in literature, the
Rape of the Lock, is an immortal proof. The
Puritans
cut it short and the cavaliers wore it luxuriantly.
Human vanity displays itself nowhere more conspicuously
than in the arrangement of the hair. When Benedict
enumerates the qualifications required in a wife, he says
in conclusionher hair shall be of what color it please
God;alluding to the common custom of dyeing the
hair. Bassanio, when moralizing on the caskets, utters a
satire upon false hair;
So are those crisped snaky, golden locks,
Which make such wanton gambols with the wind,
Upon supposed fairness, often known
To be the dowry of a second head,
The scull that bred them in the sepulchre.
Among the beautiful touches, alike true to nature and
poetry, in Talfourd's Ion, is the language of the dying
Adrastus to his newly-discovered son:
I am growing weak,
And my eyes dazzle; let me rest my hands
Ere they have lost their feeling, on thy head,
Lo! Lo! thy hair is glossy to the touch
As when I last enwreathed its tiny curl
About my finger.
It is the surviving memorial of our physicial existence:
There seems a love in hair, though it be dead
It is the gentlest, yet the strongest thread
Of our frail planta blossom from the tree,
Surviving the proud trunk; as if it said,
Patience and gentleness is power. In me
Behold affectionate eternity.
D'Israeli paints Contarini Fleming, the creature of
passion, after his wife's death, as clipping off her long
tresses, twining them about his neck, and springing from
a precipice. Miss Porter makes Helen Mar embroider
into the banner of Wallace, the ensanguined hair of his
murdered Marion. Goldsmith's coffin was opened to
obtain
some of his hair for a fair admirer, and there is a
striking anecdote of a man who was prevented from
declaring
love to his friend's betrothed, by recognizing on the
hand he had clasped, a ring, containing the hair of his
rival. With what a pathetic expressiveness does the
Cenci conclude:
Beatrice
.
Give yourself no unnecessary pain,
My dear Lord Cardinal. Here, mother, tie
My girdle for me, and bind up my hair
In any simple knot; ay, that does well.
And yours, I see, is coming down.
How often
Have we done this for one another! and now
We shall not do it any more
. My hood!
We are quite ready. Well, 'tis very well.
The dialogue between King John and Constance, is very
significant:
King Philip
.
Bind up those tresses. Oh, what love I note
In the fair multitude of those her hairs!
Where, but by chance, a silver dross hath fallen,
Even to that dross ten thousand wiry friends
Do glue themselves in sociable grief;
Like true, inseparable, faithful loves,
Sticking together in calamity.
Constance
.
To England, if you will.
King Philip
.
Bind up your hairs.
Constance
.
Yes, that I will and wherefore will I do it?
I tore them from their bonds; and cried aloud,
Oh, that these hands could so redeem my son,
As they have given these hairs their liberty!
But now I envy at their liberty,
And will again commit them to their bonds,
Because my poor child is a prisoner.
EYE-LANGUAGE.
Of
Nature's minuter wonders, the human eye is the
paragon.Vainly will Science explore her rich arcana
for a more impressive example of the marvels she would
illustrate. But it is not the apparatus which the delicate
knife of the anatomist revealsthe retina and lenses, or
even their combined arrangement that most strikingly
indicates the subtle workmanship involved in the little
fleshy globule we call the eye;it is the effect they
produce
,
the purposes they subserve, the results they
accomplish
.
Far greater are these than the careless crowd
dream of; far more marvelous than even the intelligent
and imaginative can fully realize. The phenomenon of
sight is, indeed, sufficiently extraordinary. Not less so
are the minor missions which the visual organ fulfils.
The eye speakswith an eloquence and a truthfulness
surpassing speech. It is the window out of which the
winged thoughts often fly unwittingly. It is the tiny
magic mirror on whose crystal surface the moods of
feeling
fitfully play, like the sunlight and shadows on a still
stream. Yesif there is one material form through
which the spirit is visible, and with which, when humanly
embodied, it has specially to do, that form is the EYE.
Even in animals it is emphatically the expressive feature.
Who that has noted the look of timid fondness with which
a recreant dog approaches his master, or observed the
gleam of wo with which the dying deer regards his hunters
and has not felt this? How much more significant is the
language of the human eye! How ceaselessly does it
represent the soul! The instrument by which our most
valuable knowledge is received; it is, at the same time,
the outward interpreter of the inward world. How
immediate
and delicate is the spirit's sway over the aspects and
movements of this complicated organ! Instinctively it is
raised in devotion, and bent downward in shame. When
enthusiasm lends fire to the soul, the eye flashes; when
pleasure stirs the heart, the eye sparkles; when deep
sorrow darkens the bosom, the eye distils hot tears, faster
than Arabian trees their medicinal gum; when confidence
stays the mind, the eye looks forth proudly; when love
fills the breast, the eye beams with glad sympathy; when
insanity desolates the brain, the eye roves wildly; and
o'er the eye Death most exerts his might,
And hurls the spirit from her throne to light.
Thus through all the epochs of human experience, the eye
typifies the workings of the soul.
To a warm-hearted wanderer through the worldto one
who finds in his fellow-beings the chief sources of by-way
pleasureto a benevolent cosmopolite who is an adept
in eye-language, it is a delightful and constant resource.
32
He may be a silent man as far as regards his organs of
speech, yet he is ever conversing. In a stage-coach, by
one glance around, he discovers with whom he can find
sympathy. With these he interchanges looks during the
journey, and enjoys all the delights of sociability with
none of its trials. He reads family histories in the
eye-language
of their members. If he but catch the `bonnie
blue e'en' of the passing peasant girl, a cheerful humor
is induced which abides with him for hours. And the
momentary beaming of a pair of dark lustrous orbs, fills
him with high and moving thoughts. A glance to him
is rife with expression, beyond that of his vernacular
tongue. And thus gazing into these fountains for
refreshment
,
and drawing thence inspiration and solace, his eye
at length meets one, the glance of which is deeply
responsive
an
eye that shines like the star of a happy
destiny into his soul, and he is not again contented till
the beautiful orb beams only for him, and becomes the
light of his home. The most interesting portion of his
studies in eye-language is completed. A modern
writer, in order to illustrate an almost indescribable
sentiment
,
says `it was like the eye of a woman first-loved
to the soul of the poet.'
There is no lack of well-authenticated instances to
prove the power of eye-language. An infuriated animal
has often been kept trembling at bay, by the steadfast
gaze of man, beneath which its own angry eye quailed,
yet could not turn aside. I knew a venerable man who
kept a powerful ruffian quietly seated in his little parlor
for an hour at night, while the only servant of his small
household was absent in quest of aid, merely by silently
fixing upon him a fearless look, such as awed his
perverted
heart and chained his strong limbs. Many a rebuke
has been silently but deeply conveyed, by the calm yet
indignant glance of the injured. How intuitively does a
child understand the slightest expression of its mother's
eye! How well do congenial beings comprehend their
affinity before any communion, save that of eye-converse!
Consider, too, the singular duration of the impression
imparted by this feature. The world abounds with minute
symbols. Each small and exquisite flower, gem or
insect
,
addresses the sense of the beautiful; yet they
interest
but for a moment. What more expressive similitude
has poetry found for the stars, than `angels' eyes?' The
living gem of nature is the eye, and how like a spell
doth its language haunt us! Even in the pictures of the
old masters, the effect is often centered in the expression
of this single organ. What fanciful man, having an
inkling of superstition within him, has not sometimes
imagined a portrait animated with life? Shroud the eyes,
and the fantasy is gone. It has been finally remarked
of Titian's portraits that they look at us more than we at
them. We may forget the countenance of a friend from
whom we are divided in many respects; but if our
interest has ever been truly awakened in a fellow-being,
the eye-language of the individual can scarcely escape our
memories. Who cannot recall, though he may not
describe
,
the eye-language with which a gifted man, under
some strong inspiration, has uttered a memorable thought,
or that with which one near and dear to him has breathed
aught of deep interest to his ear? The dignity of
self-possessed
thought was in the eye of Paul, ere his words
affected Festus. The beaming glance of the Grecian
mother
pointed out her jewels before her lips proclaimed them.
The unfortunate know a friend and are re-assured, the
timid recognise a master spirit and are nerved, and the
guilty know their accuser and quail, at the first momentary
meeting of their gaze. Beware of the man whose eye
you can never meet.
Correggio excelled in painting downcast eyes; those
of Allston's pictures are remarkable for their grey,
intellectual
expression. The St. Cecilia of Raphael probably
presents the best instance in the art, of the upturned eyes
of inspiration. Eye-language is richly illustrated in the
pages of Shakspeare. What an idea is given of its
perversion
in Lear's adjuration to the unfortunate Gloster:
Get thee glass eyes;
And like a scurvy politician, seem
To see the things thou dost not.
Addressing Regan, he says of Goneril, `her eyes are
fierce, but thine do comfort and not burn.' Cordelia
envies not their `still soliciting eyes' and her more
honest
orbs, at length, prove their sincerity, by shedding
`tears as pearls from diamonds dropp'd.' Othello when
first awoke to jealousy, in order to satisfy his doubts,
exclaims
to Desdemona, `let me see your eyes!' Alas!
that he did not credit their truthful expression. Fear, too,'
is strongly evinced by the same wondrous organs. In
the awful hints the Ghost gives Hamlet of `that
undiscoved
country,' among the effects prophecied from a more full
revelation, is to make his `eyes like stars start from their
spheres.' In some eyes, the bard bids us behold `a
lurking
devil,' in others `love's richest book,'in the poet's
`a fine frenzy;' and, be it remembered, it was upon the
eyes that that Puck was ordered to squeeze the little purple
flower. Perdita with her fine imagination, could find no
better similitude for `violets dim' than `the lids of Juno's
eyes.' Prospero exultingly declares, when Ferdinand
and Miranda meet, `at the first glance, they have
changed
eyes.' Hear Olivia in Twelfth Night:
Methinks I feel this youth's perfections
With an invisible and subtle stealth,
To creep in at mine eyes.
What poet has presented such an image of the closed
eyes of beauty as that contained in Iachimo's soliloquy
over the sleeping Imogen?
`the flame o' the taper
Bows towards her, and would underpeep her lids
To see th' enclosed lights now canopied
With blue of Heaven's own tinet.'
The prominent part this miraculous little globe
performs
in love, is indicated by Romeo in Capulet's
garden
;
`She speaks, yet she says nothing; what of that?
Her eye discourses, I will answer it.'
And when Juliet warns him of her kinsman's designs,
he ardently exclaims,
`Alack! there lies more peril in thine eye,
Than twenty of their swords; look thou but sweet,
And I am proof against their enmity.'
32*
The fair object of his passion, as if to reciprocate the
sentiment, upon the idea of his death, cries out.
`To prison eyes! ne'er look on liberty!'
Wolsey anticipated his downfall from the glance of
King Henry;ruin leaped from his eyes.
Faulcon-bridge
,
as the favors of fortune depart from King John,
bids him
Let not the world see fear and sad distrust
Govern the motions of a kingly eye.
Biron, in Love's Labors Lost, in balancing the
advantages
of book-lore and eye-language, declares
From women's eye this doctrine I derive:
They are the ground, the books, the academies,
From whence doth spring the true Promethean fire.
For where is any author in the world,
Teaches such beauty as a woman's eye?
How finely is the moral expression of the eye
suggested
by the Friar who advocates the innocence of Hero;
`in her eye there hath appeared a fire,
To burn the errors that these princes hold
Against her maiden truth.
Bassanio augurs his success with Portia because, he
says
Sometimes from her eyes
I did receive fair, speechless messages.
And even the incorrigible Benedick says to Beatrice
I will be buried in thy eyes. Phbe declares of
Rosalind
`faster than his tongue
Did make offence, his eye did heal it up.'
In discussing the beauty of the ancient Greeks,
Shelley
suggests that the eyes of the women of that nation,
on account of their social degradation, `could not have
been deep and intricate from the workings of the mind.'
Eye-language is, indeed, no light test of cultivation; of
native disposition it is a most authentic reporter. Hunt,
in describing the hero of Rimini, alludes with singular
beauty, to the
`easy dignity there lies
In the frank lifting of his cordial eyes.'
Who has not realized the power of Byron's simile
`like the light of a dark eye in woman?' Falstaff vaunts
of Page's wife `sometimes the beam of her view gilded
my foot, sometimes my portly belly.' Uncle Toby's
dangerous
experiment in the sentry-box is well-known; and
what a holy guidance Petrarch found in the eyes of
Laura!
Gentil mia donna, io veggio
Nel mover de 'vostri occhi un dolce lume
Che mi mostra la via che al ciel conduce.
An old dramatist has this conceit;
A smile shoots graceful upward from her eyes,
As if they had gained a victory o'er grief;
And with it many beams twisted themselves,
Upon whose golden threads the angels walk
To and again from heaven.
Eye-language in its sweetest manifestations, is
unfortunately
liable to change, like every thing delightful upon
this earth. Touching this, a bacheloric essayist of some
note, thus reasoneth:`Ask the married man who has
been so but a short time, if those blue eyes, where, during
many years of anxious courtship, truth, sweetness,
serenity
seemed to be written in characters which could not be
misunderstood, ask him if the characters they now
convey
,
be exactly the same? if for truth, he does not read a
dull virtue (the mimic of constancy) which changes not
only because it wants the judgment to make a preference?
if for sweetness, he does not read a stupid habit of being
pleased at everything, if for sincerity he does not read
animal
tranquillity, the dead pool of the heart, which no breeze
of passion can stir into health.'
According to Burke, clearness has much to do with the
beauty of the eye, and a languid movement of the organ is
most fascinating. Thus Venus is represented with
drooping
lids. It is observable that while intense thought is
indictated
by a fixed gaze, pleasurable emotions, especially of
a quiet kind, induce the lids to fall somewhat, while the orb
gently rolls. A naturalist once gave me a most vivid
description of a species of eagle common in the West,
the vibration of whose eye corresponded precisely with that
of the second hand of an old-fashioned clock. Whoever
has attentively watched the progress of a bust under the
hand of the modeller, must have realized the importance
of shape in giving its peculiar character to the eye.
Indeed
,
the skill of an artist may be estimated, in no small
degree, by his success in this regard. Inferior sculptors
generally fail in representing nice distinctions in the form
of the individual eye, which once caught, gives it even in
the cold and colorless marble, a life-like appearance.
Richly expressive as is the human eye, the depths and
gradations of its language are not to be lightly scanned.
Men of the most profound sentiment not unfrequently wear
an aspect of indifference, because common life awakens
not their spirits. We are often startled by the
eye-language
of such persons, from the intensity with which it
breaks from the dimness of habitual reserve. I remember
two nobly endowed individualsdevoted to very different
pursuitswhose eyes are seldom lifted from the
downward
gaze of meditation. I have often remarked the effect
upon their whole aspect, when, under the excitement of a
happy thought, they raise their eyes from their veiled abodes.
The sudden rising of a smiling star in a monotonous sky,
or the quick gleaming of a sunbeam athwart a dim
landscape
,
could not be more electrical. We are told of
Coleridge
,
that in moments of intense abstraction, his eyes
were so void of language as to appear almost senseless;
yet in an expressive mood they were proverbially eloquent.
And it is said of Schiller, his deportment, his gait, the
mould of his limbs, his least motion was dignified and
grand,
only his eyes were soft
. Whoever remarked the eye
of Spurzheim when he spoke of `the little beings,'
children
,
must have realized the mildness and warmth of his
benevolence. I can never forget the conception of the
power of eye-language which dawned upon me, on seeing
an Italian vocalist, at the very climax of an opera, suffer the
melody to die away, and
look
the intense feeling of the
moment so effectively as to visibly impress the silent
multitude. Having heard much of the eye-language of
an accomplished lady, I was several times at great pains
to observe, but was invariably unsuccessful. The
conversation
in each instance, had been of a general nature,
which helped to reconcile me to the disappointment.
Being
soon after possessed of some circumstances of the
lady's history which gave me a clue to her inward
experience
,
I managed on the next opportunity to strike the
`electric chain,' and draw her into a brief but touching
narration. The gradual increase of expression and
eventual
melting gaze induced by the excitement, was more
moving than any pathos of mere words or circumstance
that I ever knew.
The comparative dearth of eye-language in this
country
is lamentably significant of the narrow sway of the
Ideal, and the rarity of fresh and spontaneous
self-development
.
Exceptions, many and brilliant, there
doubtless are;but the traveller who has been wont to
note the eloquent activity and profundity of expression of
the eye in most of the continental countries, will feel, as
he wanders about the new world, a difference, not to say
a deficiency, in this respect. The guarded expression,
the waving, the indifferent or at best merely brisk tenor
of eye-language among the busy men around him, cannot
escape his notice. And when from beneath a fair brow,
or in the glance of an enthusiast, the mystic organ speaks
with unwonted freedom and effect, he feels revived as by
a fondly-remembered tune. Beautiful are the workings of
the mystic and microscopic machine. The flowers and
the stars speak a moving language; but from the eye
beams what will endure when fragrance and light are no
more. The curious characters of written language
barren
words treasured up by lexicographers, and arbitrarily
decreedthe lovelier hieroglyphics which bespangle the
sky, or deck the fields,what are they compared with the
more subtle signs which beam in the visual organsthe
breathings of the soul, in that
Bright ball on which the spirit sate
Through life, and looked out in its various moods
Of gentleness and joy and love and hope,
And gained this frail flesh credit in the world.
ART AND ARTISTS.
I was
struck, recently, with an unfinished sketch by a
young artist, who has since lost his reason from the
intense
activity of a rarely-gifted, but ill-balanced mind. It
struck me as an eloquent symbol of his inward
experience
a
touching comment upon his unhappy fate. He
called the design `an artist's dream. It represented the
studio of a painter. An easel, a pallet, a port-folio, and
other insignia of the art, are scattered with professional
negligence, about the room. At a table sits the youthful
painter, his head resting heavily on his arm, buried in
sleep. From the opposite side of the canvass the shadowy
outlines of a long procession seemed winding along, the
figures growing more distinct as they recede. In the
front rank and with more defined countenances, walk
the most renowned of the old masters, and pressing hard
upon their steps, the humbler members of that noble
brotherhood
.
It was a mere sketchunfinished, but dimly
mapped out, like the career of its author, yet full of
promise
,
and indicative of invention. It revealed, too, the
dreams of fame that were agitating that young heart; and
proved that his spirit was with the honored leaders of the
art. This sketch is a symbol of the life of a true artist.
Upon his fancy throng the images of those whose names
are immortal. It is his day-dream to emulate the great
departedto bless his raceto do justice to himself.
The early difficulties of their career, and the excitement
of their experience, give to the lives of artists a singular
interest. West's first expedient to obtain a brush
Barry's
proud poverty, Fuseli's vigils over Dante and Milton;
Reynolds, the centre of a gifted society; the `devout quiet'
of Flaxman's home, and similar memories, crowd upon
the mind, intent upon their works. Existence, with them
is a long dream. I have ever honored the fraternity, and
loved their society, and musing upon the province they
occupy in the business of the world, I seem to
recognize
a new thread of beauty interlacing the mystic tissue
of life. In speaking of the true artist, I allude rather to
his principles of action, than to his absolute power of
execution
.
Mediocrity, indeed, is sufficiently undesirable
in every pursuit, and is least endurable, perhaps, in those
with which we naturally associate the highest ideas of
excellence
.
But when we look upon artists as a class
when we attempt to estimate their influence as a
profession
,
our attention is rather drawn to the tendency of their
pursuit, and to the general characteristics of its votaries.
Man! says Carlyle, it is not thy works which are
all mortal, infinitely little, and the greatest no greater than
the least, but only the spirit thou workest in, that can
have worth or continuance. In this point of view, the
artist, who has adopted his vocation from a native impulse,
33
who is a sincere worshipper of the beautiful and the
picturesque
,
exerts an insensible, but not less real influence
upon society, although he may not rank among the
highest
,
or float on the stream of popularity. Let this console
the neglected artist. Let this thought comfort him,
possessed
of one talentif the spirit he worketh in is true, he
shall not work in vain. Upon some mind his converse
will ingraft the elements of taste. In some heart will his
lonely devotion to an innocent but unprofitable object,
awaken
sympathy. In his very isolationin the solitude of his
undistinguished and unpampered lot, shall he preach a
silent
homily to the mere devotee of gain, and hallow to the
eye of many a philanthropist, the scenes of bustling and
heartless traffic.
I often muse upon the life of the true artist, until it
redeems
to my mind the more prosaic aspects of human
existence
.
It is deeply interesting to note this class of men
in Italy. There they breathe a congenial atmosphere.
Often subsisting upon the merest pittance, indulging in
every vagary of costume, they wander over the land, and
yield themselves freely to the spirit of adventure, and the
luxury of art. They are encountered with their portfolios,
in the midst of the lone campagna, beside the desolate
ruin, before the masterpieces of the gallery, and in the
Cathedral-chapel. They roam the streets of those old and
picturesque cities at night, congregate at the caff, and
sing cheerfully in their studios. They seem a privileged
class, and manage, despite their frequent poverty, to
appropriate
all the delights of Italy. They take long tours
on foot, in search of the picturesque; engage in warm
discussions together, on questions of art, and lay ever
town they visit, under contribution for some little romance
It is a rare pastime to listen to the love-tales and will
speculations of these gay wanderers. The ardent your
from the Rhine, the pensioner from Madrid, and the
mercurial
Parisian, smoke their pipes in concert, and wrangle
good-humoredly over national peculiarities, as they copy
in the palaces. Thorwaldsen is wont to call his birth-day
the day on which he entered Rome. And when we
consider
to what a new existence that epoch introduces the
artist, the expression is scarcely metaphorical. It is the
dawning of a fresher and a richer life, the day that make
him acquainted with the wonders of the Vatican, the palace
halls lined with the trophies of his profession, the daily
walk on the Pincian, the solemn loneliness of the
surrounding
fields, the beautiful ruins, the long, dreamy day
and all the poetry of life at Rome. Whoever has
frequently
encountered Thorwaldsen in the crowded saloon
or visited him on a Sabbath morning, must have read it
his bland countenance and benignant smile, the record of
his long and plesant sojourn in the Eternal city. To
him it has been a theatre of triumph and benevolence.
Everywhere in Italy are seen the enthusiastic pilgrims
of art, who have roamed thither from every part of the
globe. Each has his tale of self denial, and his vision of
fame. At the shrine of Art they kneel together. Year
by year they collect, in the shape of sketches and copies,
the cherished memorials of their visit. A few linger on,
until habit makes the country almost necessary to their
existence, and they establish themselves in Florence or
Rome. Those whom necessity obliges to depart, tear
themselves, full of tearful regret, from the genial clime.
Many who come to labor, content themselves with
admiring
,
and glide into dreamy habits from which want,
alone, can rouse them. Others become the most devoted
students, and toil with unremitting energy. A French
lady, attached to the Bourbon interest, has long dwelt in
Italy, intent upon a monument to Charles X. Her talents
for sculpture are of a high order, and her enthusiasm for
royalty, extreme. Her hair is cut short like that of a man,
and she wears a dark robe, similar to that with which
Portia
appears on the stage. Instances of a like
self-devotion
to a favorite project in art, are very common among
those who are voluntary exiles in that fair land. One
reason why the most famous portraits of the old masters,
such as the Fornarina of Raphael and La Bella of Titian,
are so life-like and inspire so deep a sense of their
authenticity
,
is doubtless that the originals were objects of
affection
and familiar by constant association and sympathy,
to the minds of the artists. This idea is unfolded in one
of Webster's plays, where the advantage of a portrait taken
without a formal sitting, is displayed with much
quaintness
and beauty:
Must you have my picture?
You will enjoin me to a strange punishment.
With what a compell'd force a woman sits
While she is drawing! I have noted divers
Either to feign a smile, or suck in their lips,
To have a little mouth; ruffle the cheeks
To have the dimples seen; and so disorder
The face with affectation, at next sitting
It has not been the same: I have known others
Have lost the entire fashion of their face
In half an hour's sitting,in hot weather,
The painting on their face has been so mellow,
They have left the poor man harder work by half
To mend the copy he wrought by: but, indeed,
If ever I should have mine drawn to the life,
I would have a painter steal at such a time
I were devoutly kneeling at my prayers;
There is then a heavenly beauty in't, the soul
Moves in the superfices.
Though the mere tyros in the field of letters and of art,
those who pursue these liberal aims without either the
genius that hallows, or the disinterestedness that redeems
them, are not worthy of encouragementlet respect await
the artist whose life and conversation multiply the best
fruits of his professionwhose precept and example are
effective, although nature may have endowed him with but
a limited practical skill. There is a vast difference
between
a mere pretender and one whose ability is actual
but confined. A man with the soul of an artist, is a
valueable
member of society, although his eye for color may be
imperfect, or his drawing occasionally careless. There
is, in truth, no more touching spectacle, than is presented
by a human being whose emotions are vivid, but whose
expression is fettered; in whose mind is the conception
which his hand struggles in vain to embody, or his lips
to utter. It is a contest between matter and spirit, which
angels might pity. It is this very struggle, on a broad
scale, which it is the great purpose of all art and all
literature
to relieve. It is in me, and it shall come out,
said Sheridan, after his first failure as an orator. And the
33*
trial of Warren Hastings brought it out. If we could
analize
the pleasure derived from the poet and painter, I
suppose
it would partake much of the character of
relief
. A
great tragedy unburdens the heart. In fancy we pour forth
the love, and partake of the sacrifice. And so art gratifies
the imagination by reflecting its pictures. The lovely
landscape, the faithful portrait, the good historical
composition
,
repeat, with more or less authenticity, the story
that fancy and memory have long held in a less
defined
shape. The rude figures on old tapestry, the
miniature illustrations of ancient missals, the arabesques
that decorate the walls of the Alhambra, are so many early
efforts to the same end. The inventive designer, the
gifted
sculptor, the exquisite vocalist, are ministers of
humanity
,
ordained by Heaven. The very attempt to fulfil such
high service, so it be made in all truthfulness, is worthy
of honor. And where it is partially fulfilled, there is
occasion
for gratitude. Hence I cannot but regard the
worthy
members of such professions with peculiar interest.
They have stepped aside from the common thoroughfare,
to cultivate the flowers by the wayside. They have left
the great loom of common industry, to weave such stuff
as dreams are made of. Their office is to keep alive in
human hearts, a sense of the grand in combination, the
symmetrical in form, the beautiful in color, the touching
in sound, the interesting in aspect of all outward things.
They illustrate even to the senses, that truth which is so
often forgottenthat man does not live by bread alone.
As the sunlight is gorgeously reflected by the clouds,
they tint even the tearful gloom of mortal destiny with the
warm hues of beauty. Artists instruct and refine the
senses. With images of gracewith smiles of
tenderness
with
figures of noble proportionswith tones of
celestial melody, they teach the careless heart to
distinguish
and rejoice in the richest attractions of the world.
He who has pondered over the landscapes of Salvator,
will thenceforth pierce the tangled woodlands with a
keener glance, and mark a ship's hulk upon the stocks,
with unwonted interest. John of Bologna's Mercury,
will reveal to him the poetry of motion, and the Niobe or
the statue of Lorenzo, in the Medici Chapel, make him aware
how greatly mere attitude can express the eloquence of
grief. The vocalism of a
prima donna
, will unveil the
poetical labyrinths of sound. Claude will make him
sensible
of masses of golden haze before unobserved, and long
scintillations of sunlight, gleaming across the western
sky. The neck and hair of woman will be better
appreciated
after studying Guido; and the characteristic in
physiognomy become more striking from familiarity with
the portraits of Vandyke. Hogarth, in the humble walk
he adopted, not only successfully satirized the vices and
follies of London, but gave the common people no small
insight into the humorous scenes of their sphere, and
Gainsborough
attracted attention to many a feature of rustic
beauty. Pasta, Catalani and Malibran, have opened a
new world in music to countless souls, and Mrs. Wood
has produced an era in the musical taste of our land. The
artist thus instructs our vision and hearing. But his
teachings end not here. From his portraitures of
martyrdoms
,
of the heroic in human history, of the beautiful in
human destiny, whether pencilled or sung, he breathes
into the soul new self-respect, and moral refinement.
We look at the Magdalene prostrate upon the earth,
pressing
back the luxuriant hair from her lovely temples, her
melancholy eyes bent downward, and the lesson of
repentance
,
the blessedness of `loving much,' sinks at once
into the heart. We muse upon Raphael's Holy Family,
and realize anew the sanctity of maternal love. We
commune
with the long, silent line of portraitsthe gifted and
the powerful of the earth, and read, at a glance, the most
stirring
chronicles of war and genius, of effort and suffering,
of glory and death. We drink in the tender harmony of
Bellini, and the fountains of sentiment are renewed.
The golden age of Art and Artists, the splendid era that
dawned early in the fifteenth century is one of the most
romantic episodes in human history. The
magnificent
scale of princely patronage, the brilliant succession
of unsurpassed productions, and the trials and triumphs of
artists that signalize that epoch, place it in the very
sunlight
of poetry. There is something in the long lives of
those eminent men toiling to illustrate the annals of faith,
pursuing the beautiful, under the banner of religion, that
gives an air of primeval happiness to human toil, and
robs the original curse of its bitterness. The lives of the
old masters partake of the ideal character of their creations.
Scarcely one of their biographies is devoid of
adventurous
interest or pathetic incident. Can we not
discover
in the tone of their works, somewhat of their
experience
and character? As the poet's effusions are often
unintentionally tinged with his moral peculiarities, is there
not a certain identity of spirit between the old artists an
their works? Leonardo supped with peasants and
related
humorous stories to make them laugh, that he might
study the expression of rustic delight; by writing,
conversation
,
and personal instruction, promoted that most
important
revolution, the reconciliation of nicety of finish
with nobleness of design and unity of color, and having
thus prepared the way for a higher and more perfect school
of art, expired in the embrace of a king. The though
of his efforts as a reformer, and the precursor of the great
prophets of art, imparts a grateful sentiment to the mind of
the spectator who dwells upon his Nun in the Pitti-palace
the Herodias of the Tribune, and the Last Supper at Milan.
In the variety of expression displayed in the various head
and attitudes of this last work, we recognize the effect of
Leonardo's studies from nature. It is singular that the chief
monument to his fame, should of all his works, have me
with the greatest vicissitudes. The feet were cut off to
enlarge the refectory, upon the walls of which it is painted
and a door has been made through the finest part. It is with a
melancholy feeling, that the traveller gazes upon its dim and
corroded hues, and vainly strives to trace the clear outline
of a work made familiar by so many engravings. From
Leonardo's precision of ideas, the strictness of taste
that marked his personal habits, and his attachment to
principles of art, something even of the mathematician is
recognized in his works. It might be argued from his
pictures, that he was no sloven and was fond of rules.
Titian's long career of triumph and prosperity, was
cheerful
and rich as the hues of his canvass, dream-like as his
own Venice; his fair and bright-haired mistress, his
honors
and wealth, contrasting strangely with a death amid
pestilence and desertion, come over the memory like a
vivid picture. In infancy, Titian colored a print of the
Virgin with the juice of flowers, in a masterly manner.
In early youth he deserted his teachers for the higher
school nature opened to him. The passers uncovered to
his portrait of Paul III., as it rested on a terrace at Rome,
deeming it alive; and when Charles V. of Spain sat to
him for the last portrait, he exclaimed, This is the third
time I have been made immortal! These exuberant
tokens
of contemporary appreciationthese, and countless
other indications of a life of success and enjoyment, seem
woven into the fleshy tints of his Venus, and laugh out in
the bright faces of Flora and La Bella. And Correggio's
sad story! His lowly toil as a potter, the electric joy
with which the conviction came home to him, that he,
too, was a painter;his lonely struggle with obscure
poverty;his almost utter want of appreciation and
sympathy
;the
limits of a narrow lot pressing upon so fine
a soul, and then his rare achievements and bitter death,
worn down by the weight of very lucre his genius had
gained,can fancy, in her widest range, depict a more
affecting
picture of the highest in man's heart struggling
vainly against the lowest in man's destiny? His
Magdalene
,
bowed down, yet serene, sad, yet beautiful, sinful
yet forgiven, is an emblem as lovely as it is true, of the
genius and fate of Correggio. Salvator Rosa has written
the history of his own life in those wild landscapes he
loved so well. One might have inferred his Neapolitan
origin. There is that in his pictures that breathes of
southern fancy. We there feel not the chastened tone
a Tuscan mind, not the religious solemnity of a Roman,
but rather the half-savage genius of that singular region
where the lazzaroni sleep on the strand and the fisherman
grow swarthy beneath the warmest sky of Italy. The
wanderer, the lover of masquerade, he who mingled in the
revolt of Massaniello, and roamed amid the gloomy
grandeur
of the mountains, speaks to us from the canvass of
Salvator. Delicacy and affection, taste and sentiment
characterize Raphael's paintings. There is in them that
refinement of tone, born only of delicate natures, such as
this rude world often jars into the insanity of an Ophelia
or bows to the early tomb of a Kirk White. Murillo's
style has been characterized as between the Flemish and
high Italian, and we are told that, as a man, he combines
rare simplicity of manners with the greatest elevation
and modesty of soul. Michael Angelo has traced the
inflexibility
of his soul in the bust of Brutus, his
self-possessed
virtue in the calm grandeur of his muscular figures.
One dreams over them of stern integrity and noble
self-dependence
.
It is common to talk of the genius of artists as
partaking
of the fine frenzy attributed to that of the poet.
The intense excitement which accompanies the process
of conception, is, however, comparatively rare, with the
votaries of art. They have this advantage over the great
thinker and the earnest bardthat, much of their labor is
mechanical, and calls rather for the exercise of taste than
mental effort. There is, indeed, a period in every work
when imagination is greatly excited and the whole mind
fervidly active, but the painter and sculptor have many
intervals of repose, when physical dexterity and imitative
skill are alone requisite. And when the hand of the
artist
has acquired that habitual power which makes it ever
obedient to the will, when he is perfectly master of the
whole machinery of his art, and is confident of realizing,
to a great degree, his every conception, a delightful
serenity
takes possession of his soul. Calm trust in his own
resources, and the daily happiness of watching the growth
of his work, induce a placid and hopeful mood. And when
his aim is exalted and his success progressive, there are
few happier men. They have an object, the interest of
which familiarity cannot lesson nor time dissipate. They
follow an occupation delightful and serene. The
atmosphere
of their vocation is above the smoke and stir of
this dim spot that men call earth. The graceful, the
vivid, and the delicate elements of their art, refine their
sensibilities and elevate their views. Nature and life
minister to them more richly than to those who only
poke about for pence. Hence, methinks, the masters
of the art have generally been remarkable for longevity.
Their tranquil occupation, the happy exercise of their
faculties
was favorable to life.
It has been said of Michael Angelo's pupils, that they
were nursed in the lap of grandeur. And it may be
said of all true artists, that they are buoyed up by that spirit
of beauty that is so essential to true happiness. I have
ever found in genuine artists, a remarkable simplicity
and truthfulness of character. There is a repose about
them as of men who commune with something superior,
and for whom the frivolous idols of the multitude have no
attraction. I have found them usually fond of music and
if not addicted to general literature, ardently attached to
a particular poet. They read so constantly the book of
nature, that written lore is not so requisite for them. The
human face, the waving bough, the flower and the cloud,
the fantastic play of the smouldering embers, moonlight
on a cornice, and the vast imagery of dreams, are full of
teachings for them.
There is a definiteness in the art of sculpture, that
renders
its language more direct and immediate than that of
painting. Masses of stone were revered as idols, in
remote
antiquity; and men soon learned to hew them into
rude figures. When architecture, the elder sister of
sculpture, had given birth to temples of religion, the
statues of deities were their chief ornaments. Images of
domestic gods existed as early as the twenty-third century
before the Christian era. The early Indian and Hindoo
idols, as well as the gloomy sculpture of the Egyptians,
evidence how naturally the art sprung from the human
mind, even before a refined taste had developed its real
dignity. Sculpture was a great element of Grecian
culture. In the age of Pericles, it attained perfection.
In the square and the temple, on the hill-top and within
the private dwelling, the beautiful productions of the
chisel met the eye. They addressed every sentiment of
devotion and patriotism. They filled the soul with ideals
of symmetry and grace, and the traces of their silent
eloquence were written in the noble air, the harmonious
34
costume and the very forms of the ancient Greeks. The
era of ideal models and a classic style passed away. In
the thirteenth century, the art revived in Italy, and there
are preserved some of the noblest specimens of Grecian
genius, as well as those to which M. Angelo and his
countrymen gave birth. The Apollo looks out upon the
sky of Rome, while the Venus loves in stone and
Niobe bends over her clinging babe in the Florence
gallery
.
Shelley used to say, that he would value a peasant's
criticism upon sculpture, as much as that of the most
educated man. Form is, indeed, more easily judged
than color. There is a certain vagueness in painting,
while sculpture is palpable, bold and clear. There is a
severe nobility in the art; its influence is to calm and
elevate rather than excite. The Laocoon, Niobe and
Allesandro doloroso are indeed expressions of passion;
but they are striking exceptions. Sculpture soothes the
impetuous soul. The heads of the honored dead wear a
solemn dignity. The stainless and cold marble breathes
a pure repose, stamped with the calm of immortality. In
walking through the Vatican by torch-light, we might
deem ourselves, without much exercise of fancy, in a
world of spirits. The tall white figures stretching
forward
in the gloom, the snowy faces, upon which the
flambeaux
glare, the winding drapery and the outstretched
arm, strike the eye in that artificial light, with a startling
look of life. One feels like an intruder into some hall
of death, or conclave of the great departed. A good bust
is an invaluable memorial; it preserves the features and
expressions without their temporary hue. There is
associated
with it the idea of durability and exactitude.
Though the most common offspring of sculpture, it is one
of the rarest in perfection. Few sculptors can copy
nature
so faithfully as to give us the very lineaments wholly
free from caricature or embellishment. Those who have
an eye for the detail of expression, often fail in general
effect. To copy the form of the eye, the texture of the
hair, every delicate line of the mouth, and yet preserve
throughout an air of veri similitude and that unity of
effect which always exists in nature, is no ordinary
achievement. The requisite talent must be a native
endowment
;
no mechanical dexterity can ever reach it.
A thing of beauty is a joy for ever. This sentiment
spontaneously fills the heart in view of the great products
of the chisel. We contemplate the Niobe and Apollo, as
millions have before us, with growing delight and the
most intense admiration. They have come down to us
from departed ages, like messengers of love; they
assure
us, with touching eloquence, that human genius and
affection, the aspirations and wants, the sorrow and the
enthusiasm of the soul, were ever the same; they invoke
us to endure bravely and to cherish the beautiful and true,
as our best heritage. So speak they and so will they
speak to unborn generations. In the silent poetry of
their expressive forms lives a perennial sentiment. They
keep perpetual state, and give the world audience, that it
may feel the eternity of genius, and the true dignity of
man. It is delightful to believe that sculpture is destined
to flourish among us. It is truly the art of a young
republic
.
Let it perpetuate the features of our patriots, and
people our cities with images of grandeur and beauty.
Worthy votaries of the art are not wanting among us: on
the banks of the Arno, they speak of Greenough and
Powers; from the studios of Rome come praises of
Crawford
,
and beside the Ohio is warmly predicted the fame of
Clevenger. Let us cherish such followers of the art with
true sympathy and generous patronage. The national
heart will not then be wholly corroded by gain, and a few
places will be kept green for repose and refreshment, upon
the great highway of American life.
THE WEATHER.
I have
just parted with one of those insensible beings
who profess perfect independence of the weather,a
class, one would think, by their manner of treating this
popular topic, differently organized from the majority of
mankind. It is really provoking to remark the
complacency
with which they declare that the atmospheric
vicissitudes
affect them not, that they are too busy to note
the course of the wind, and that half the time they know
not whether it rains or shines; as if it were a fit subject
for congratulationthis unnatural insusceptibility to what
human beings should, from their very constitution,
consciously
feel. Much pleasure do these weather-despisers
lose. It is true, they suffer not the
throe;
but, be it
remembered
,
they enjoy not the
thrill
. Welcome are they
to their much vaunted indifference to the state of the
elements
.
Better, methinks, to suffer somewhat, and even
fancifully, from the weather, than to be wrapped up in a
mantle of unconcernto walk forth regardless of the
temperature, and without any more interest in the
existent
face of the heavens, than if they were changeless and
34*
stony, like the mood of such spirits. This independence
`argues an insensibility.' A hopeful token, in truth, is
a just susceptibility to the weather. There is reason in
its universality, as a subject of discussion; there is a real
benefit in being alive to its influences. Dr.
Johnson
indeed, with characteristic hardihood, boasted of his
immunity from `skyey influences;' but Milton confesses
that his poetical vein flowed only between the autumnal
and vernal equinox. Thomson declared his muse was
most docile in the fall; and Byron always felt most
religiously
disposed on a sunny day. Hear the stout Ashyre
ploughman
`How stan' you this blae eastlin wind,
That's like to blaw a body blind?
For me my faculties are frozen.
In Naples, they have a saying, when any literary
production
is very bad, that it was written during a
sirocco
.
The air and sky are a common heritagethey greet
all the living impartially; and, while the changes of all
things else affect only certain classes and individuals,
their variations influence us all. It is well that there is
thus a theme of universal sympathy, about which men,
as such, can exchange opinions. The weather is
essentially
a republican subject; and of all topics, whereby to
get over the awkwardness of a first interview, it is
decidedly
the most convenient. What idea would answer
to begin a colloquy with, had we not the weather? If
the elements were as fixed, or as regular in their changes,
as the earth, what an available starting point in
conversation
should we be deprived of! After being introduced
to an individual of whom we know nothing, what could
we find to talk about, were this elemental theme not
ever-present? To speak of literature or music, without
knowing the taste of our new acquaintance, might prove
a damper; to begin chatting about other people, might
betray us into scandalizing the kindred of our auditor;
but to allude enthusiastically to the beauty of the
evening
,
or sympathetically to its coldness, would, in all
probability
,
advance us at once far on the pleasant track of
sociability. Besides it is altogether so natural and human
to talk about the weatherto tell how we feel under its
prevailing influenceand to listen, with profound
interest
,
to the details our companion may give as to its
effect
on him. In this way we glide, with transcendant
ease, into a sympathizing vein; glimpses of mutual
character
are incidentally afforded, and then the way to more
familiar communion lies clear and open. Let the
conceited
non-observers of the weather, who are liable to
find themselves at a non-plus in conversation, consider
the remarkable adaptativeness of the theme; and for this,
if for no better reason, hasten to excite their lukewarm
zeal as amateur meteorologists.
Weather-wisdom is a consoling acquirement. I have
often re-learned the lesson of human equality, in
observing
the complacency of an honest tar, as he interpreted
the signs of the sky to some accomplished veteran in
book lore. The poor sailor, only matriculated by some
marine witchery on crossing the line for the first time
and who only graduated, after some fierce whaling
adventure
,
from cabin-boy to seamanthenceforth witless
of farther degreesexpounding to the attentive
university-man
,
a chapter of his knowledge in the ways of the
wind, with as much zest as his hearer ever cleared up a
puzzling passage in the Georgies to a group of
wondering
striplings. Such a scene, not seldom witnessed
by the voyager, evinces what a comfortable device is
weather-wisdom. Admitting it is the illusive thing
many deem it, what a pleasant peg it affords some people
to hang a little self-sustaining pride upon. To those who
have not wit enough to comprehend the abstract sciences,
to those who regard the beauties of literature as
mysteries
,
and who can make nothing of political economy
what a ready alternative is weather-wisdom! It requires
little sense to keep a journal of the dates of snow storms,
or to talk, with seeming sagacity, of the prospects of the
season. And what a benevolent provision is this of
nature's
that
such as are bereft of more recondite lore, can
yet nourish self-respect on their notable attainments in
weather-wisdom!
But these are only secondary evidences of our
obligations
to the weather; insensibly do its variations gratify
our love of novelty. Every day is newif not from
change of circumstances, from change of weather. How
tame might not be our feelings, if sameness was a law of
the elements! It is no inconsiderable pastime to note,
on every successive morning, a new condition of the
physical world; and pitiable, we repeat, is he who finds
no refreshment in the shifting sceneto whose eye all
aspects of external nature are alike; then, be assured,
some deep grief has overshadowed the soul, or some
physical
infirmity palsied the sense.
There is something morbid in those who are
insensible
to the weather, as well as in such as are nervously
alive to its every minute alteration. It is a beautiful
indication
of humanity to habitually take cognizance of these
subtle agencies that surround usto regard them as
ministrants
intimately associated with human weal. I once
stood amid the ruins of an ancient amphitheatre with a
man of deep social sympathies; we spoke of the myriads
who once thronged the now silent spot. `We have reason
to believe,' said he, `that wherever they are, they are
together
;
what a happy idea, that even a dismal fate may be
meliorated by sympathy!' And we that now throng a
living templewould it not be an anomaly if we did not
sympathize under the operation of universal laws?
There is truth to human nature in Hamlet's allusion to
the weather, even when awaiting his father's ghost.
Our interest in the weather is not altogether direct.
Not alone to our individual senses does it appeal.
Human
hopes sway in every breeze. Destiny sometimes
seems dependent upon the elements. How many
anxious
beings are noting the wayward winds when their
loved ones are upon the waters; how many tearful eyes
are directed to the sky when the cherished invalid is
exposed
to its varying phases. Property and life, success
and love, are too often and too nearly associated with the
weather, to permit even the hardy and the stern to boast
perfect immunity from its influences. And we wonder
not that the ancients deified and invoked the agents of
such mighty revolutions. Invisibly, and with a scarcely
perceptible increase, the new wind arises; but on its
unseen
wings floathow many human interests! It bears
to the worn and watching tidings of the absent, it wafts
to the unthinking breast the seeds of a fell disease; it
awakens hymns among the light foliage, and refreshes
the care-shadowed brow:odours and music, gladness
and grief, life and death, are borne with silence and
certainty to their destined ends. And so with the
sunlight
and the storm, the summer shower and the noontide
heatthey have voices many and impressive, and fulfil
a thousand noiseless and subtle missions with
promptitude
.
We are told that at one period in the ancient history
of medicine, but two kinds of disease were recognized,
resulting from the contracted and relaxed state of the
pores. Doubtless this system originated in the observation
of the effects of atmospheric changes upon the skin.
Some individuals feel the weather chiefly through this
medium; some are made aware of its variations by the
sensations they excite in the region of the lungs or
stomach; and to others the temples or thorax are as a
perpetual
barometer. By the peculiar sensibility of some
part of their bodies, all are, in a greater or less degree,
physically susceptible to the weather; and through
whatever
portal the unbidden guest enters, the nervous sense
is soon aware of iis presence. And thus, the universal
agent, the spirit of the elements, insinuates itself into a
higher domain. Our mental moods are, more or less,
affected; and when the temperament is poetical, the
weather, like all things else, abounds with under-currents
of influence and mystic echoes to its common language,
of which the multitude are scarcely conscious.
The weather is an impressive time-keeper. To many
it is the most regulating of dials. Not only does it serve
to mark the flight, but to control the appropriation of
time. The dreamy mood, induced by a warm, cloudy
day, inclines us to visit ruins. The blitheness excited
by a cold, clear morning, suggests a rapid promenade.
When the night wind sighs dismally, our fancies rove
through the world of dark romance. A winter twilight
makes us realize `how transitory are human flowers;'
and the same season in mid summer, quickens the idea
of being into a sense of immortality. All the world over,
mild and moonlight evenings are sacred to young love.
Old Walton wisely invokes a wet evening for the perusal
of his discourse; and,
`'Tis heaven to lounge upon a couch, said Gray,
And read new novels
through a rainy day
.'
The poets from first to last, in things human and
scientific, are, after all, the best philosophers. How
universally have they taken cognizance of, and
chronicled
the elements; and how appropriately adapted them
to the circumstances of their heroes and heroines. How
feelingly they speak of the weather! What obesrvant,
particular, and sensitive meteorologists are they all.
How graphic is Byron's description of a London
daybreak
and how sweetly does Mrs. Hemans extol the
magic of a sunbeam! What influential, ay, and
metaphysical
storms, dog-days, and spring mornings, are those
immortalized in the annals of every celebrated bard.
In truth, poets seem intuitively weather-wise.
The weather is eloquently symbolical. It is a
perennial
fountain of metaphors. The clouds that fly over the
star gemmed sky, typify the exhalations of earth which,
ever and anon, shade the spirit in its pilgrimage. The
wreaths of vapour circling on the gentle breeze, and
made rosy and radiant by the sun-light, present an apt
similitude of the rise, expansion, and glow of the
enthusiast's
visions. An icy footpath preaches a homily on
mortal instability to the pedestrian, and a deep azure sky
is a pure symbol of peace to the gifted eye. The
moonlight
reposing on snow has been fitly made to illustrate
memory; and the dew sparkling in the sun, is a bright
emblem of youth, as its vanishing is of decay. Happy
the being, whose consciousness is so lost in the blest
intensity
of the elements within him, as to be unconscious
of those around him; for the glow of human enthusiasm
is more beautiful than the flush of the most magnificent
sunset. But undesirable is the sternness that disdains
to recognize the contrasts of the elements; for the aspect
of a frozen lake or the touch of a northern blast is far less
chilling, than an unsympathizing spirit to a being of
worthy
sensibility.
MANNER.
When
the fluid particles composing the primeval earth
settled into consistent masses, an unbroken, uniform,
plain was not the result; but everywhere, form, color
and density indicated the various species of matter.
Verdure
crept over the rich loam, long tables of sand marked
the limits of the sea, and rocks of every hue stood forth
from the hills. Form of aspect and movement became a
law of creation. Even the unstable elements obeyed it.
The waters projected themselves into billows, currents,
and fountains, and the aeriform waves of the upper
deep were poured forth in as certain developments. To
everything a manner was awarded, by which it was to
be recognised, and through which it was to be studied.
Another world was then called into being,a universe of
thought, sentiment, fancy, and feeling, a human world.
And in this, too, external forms were assumed, and
manner
became a characteristic of mortals. The same law
obtains in the spheres of mind and matter; but how
differently
displayed! Since the first song of the stars, the
heavens have worn the same successive drapery, the earth
35
has changed not her four familiar robes. The winds have
raised the billows into mountains or dallied with the
rose-leaves
.
In all things has nature been variable, yet the
sameever presenting a well-known though ever varying
feature. She knows not the law of fashion. She is
inexpert
in artificial diplomacy. But manner, among
human
beings, is subject to the modifications of time and
place; it can be made subservient to the will. In its
very nature, manner is a means, and greatly do those err
who make it an end. Yet are there individuals, by whom
this adjunctive, secondary, exponent principle is
supremely
cultivated and mainly relied on. There are those who
manage to glide along through the world by a kind of
mannered legerdemain, who have acquired their manner
in the ancient school of Proteus, and by their singular
dexterity in ever imparting the required impression, from
moment to moment, fail not in their social objects.
There is a species of shufilers, who succeed, by virtue of
an
off-hand
manner, which mankind, in general, are
content
to yield to. The most popular class is, doubtless,
that which reduces Chesterfield to practice, on principle,
and with veritable punctilio. These devotees lean on a
broken reed. Their faith in a manner is too perfect.
With wonder did I once hear a man of sense console
himself for the unprincipled conduct of his son, by
declaring
that `through all he had kept his manners.' When
tact at mere verbal rhyming constitutes a poet, musical
memory a composer, or taste in colors a painter, then
may we believe that manner will make a man, for,
Heaven never meant him for a passive thing,
That can be struck and hammered out to suit
Another's taste and fancy.
There is a policy in manner. I have heard one, not
inexperienced
in the pursuit of fame, give it his earnest
support as being the surest passport to absolute and
brilliant
success. And who, that has been chained, for hours,
as by enchantment, with the grace and elegance of an
orator, and then, in solitude, reviewed his words and
recalled
not a single original and impressive ideahas not
realised this? It is wonderful how a skilful mannerist
can deceive the world as to his acquirements and motives.
I have, at this moment, in my mind's eye, the comely
figure of an individual who has attained no undesirable
elevation in the world of letters, whose manner is so
profound
and scholar-like, so redolent of the
otium cum
dignitate
,
that it has earned him the cognomen of
the learned
.
A Greek name is inscribed upon his cane, and a Latin
adage upon his tongue's end. He yields not to familiar
discourse, nor manifests an interest in aught save what is
classical. In company with scholars, he is silent,
seemingly
from abstraction; in the society of the uninitiated
he speaks much, apparently to relieve the exuberance of
his acquisitions: the one class attempt not to examine
his pretensions, from a horror (natural to high minds) of
pedantic display; the other, awe-struck, yield him
reverence
.
Now a few years since, ; but I will not
betray him. Suffice it to say, that the first time the
magnificence
of his manner is invaded, the commanding
frost-work of his reputation will melt in air. We
habitually
suspect the truthfulness of a prominent manner. If,
in the presence of an individual, he induces us to think
continually of his manner and forget himself, we are
quickly
aware of our want of affinity. There is no delight in
his fellowship. Of all forbidding inventions, an assumed
manner is the most effectual. We instinctively anticipate
the forthcoming scene behind our backs. Some masterly
delineation of the Duke of Gloster, in the act of hurling
away the prayer book, occurs to us. We are ill at ease;
we seem to hear the laugh and witness the mimicry which
is to occur when the door has closed upon our exit. We
discern beyond the smile and the honeyed word, and are
sickened at the self created hollowness of a human heart.
We have admirable provisions in our civil code, for the
crimes of perjury and overreaching. A thrice heavy
penalty
should fall upon him convicted of deliberately and
habitually practising upon mankind, through the agency
of a pre-assumed, politic manner. Manner is the
universal
language, the grand circulating medium; and should
not the attempt to counterfeit the genuine, native stamped
coin, be made penal? There are no greater forgers in the
universe than cunning mannerists. Their whole lives are
false. The loveliest of human attributes, the beautiful, the
winning virtue of sincerity abides not with them. They
have abjured the profession of humanity. They have
become
playerswith none of the ideal interest and
singleness
of purpose which may belong to the legitimate
followers
of Thespis. The wearisome rehearsals, the guarded
conduct, the oppressive sense of having a part to play, the
struggles between the real man and the assumed character
all press upon and disturb them; and there is for them
no refreshing returns to nature, no blissful interludes in
the trying drama, for habit has bound them to the task, and
policy goads them on.
There is a poignancy in manner. I have often heard a
friend describe the effect produced at a well-surrounded
dinner
table, by the silence of a gentleman to whom one of the
company, in a very audible voice, had addressed an
impertinent
question. The tacit rebuke was most keenly felt;
it was more effectual than a public reprimand, and yet how
entirely devoid of irrational severity. Similar results
may be effected through expert application of manner.
An instance occurs among the innumerable anecdotes
related
of John Randolph. A young aspirant for
congressional
fame saw fit, in his maiden speech, to give proof
of his boldness and eloquence, by a long and abusive
attack
upon the eccentric member from Virginia. At the
conclusion of the young orator's voluminous address, the
hero of Roanoke arose, and stretching his long, nervous
arm toward the seat of the complacent youth, with a
half-enquiring
,
half-contemptuous look, thus replied:Mr.
Speaker, who's that? There was a sarcastic bitterness
in his manner, under which the offender quailed. I was
never more impressed with the poignant sting mere
manner
can inflict, than on one occasion, when abroad. Soon
after day-break, on a misty morning, the steam-boat which
had brought us from Naples, dropped anchor in the port
of Leghorn. We waited, with great impatience, the
arrival
of the permit to land, from the board of health. At
length, understanding it had been received, I joined a party
35*
of the pasengers and entered one of the boats which
surrounded
us. We were distant from the shore about an
eighth of a mile. The wind was blowing a gale and the
sea running very high. We had reached about the
middle
of the intervening space, and were beginning to
rejoice
at the prospect of a comfortable shelter, when the
health-officer, from the steam-vessel, hailed our boatman,
ordering him, upon his peril, not to proceed. It seemed
some form had been omitted; and, we were kept in the
rain, and among the dashing billows, for more than half
an hour. Thoroughly vexed at the officer's conduct, we
began at last to approach the quay, cold, wet, and
comfortless
.
Various measures were suggested for bringing
him to punishment. An Englishman begged that we
would leave it to him, assuring us he was well acquainted
with the temperament of the people. Soon after, the
official
barge approached, and in the prow sat our enemy
with that air of superiority characteristic of underlings.
With much curiosity we awaited the movements of our
British companion. To our astonishment he doffed his
hat, and saidaddressing the officerYour name, sir,
if you please. The rowers of the barge slackened their
oars and gazed curiously upon their commander; his face
was suffused with scarletMy name! my name! he
muttered fiercely, and impatiently waving to the oarsmen,
they soon shot rapidly away. We looked to the English
gentleman for an explanation. Gentlemen said he,
be assured I have wounded him to the quick; if I had
parleyed with him, his pride would have been gratified;
but by asking, in a ceremonious manner, for his name,
in the presence of his men, as if we disdained to do less
than complain to his superior, I have both mortified and
alarmed him. The formality of my manner has punished
him more than words could possibly do. And so
proved. For, on landing, we found him pacing the wharf
and uttering his indignation and fears most violently
while ample apologies were proffered us from all quarters.
I afterwards discovered that to bandy words with the
lower
classes of Italy, was but to waste one's breath and
subject
the patience to a great trial;to meet them on their
own ground and give them the advantage which the
fluency
of their language affords. They must be addressed
the language of manner, to which they are peculiarly
susceptible
.
There is a power in manner. How finely
Byron describes, in the bearing of Conrad
that commanding art
That dazzles, leads, yet chills the vulgar heart.
Who that is susceptible to nature, will deny that the sway
of manner consists in its truth? We speak of the
impressive
dignity of some of the Indian tribes; kings might
strive to imitate it in vain. It is the gift of nature the
ennobling grace of the forest lords. The companionship
of geniuswhen do we most perfectly realise it? What
enthusiasm has led the gifted mind into such an
outpouring
that manner is forgotten, and every look and
movement
is instinct with soul. In aged persons and
children
those
who have lived too long to meditate effect, and
those who, as yet, listen only to the inward oracle, we more
frequently see the perfect spell of manner. What a world
of allurement is involved in the common phrase, an
unaffected
manner! Nothing is so delightful as what is
spontaneous
.
A frank expression of sentiment, a native
manner, captivate; thrice happy when the latter is
habitual
.
Memnon's image imparted not its mysterious
strains except at the touch of the sunbeams, nor will
manner
yield its true witchery from any inspiration but that
of the soul.
PET-NOTIONS.
Our
loving tendencies, like Bob Acres' valor,
sometime
ooze out, if not from the finger ends, yet in forms
the most various and fantastic imaginable. All of us
have our little oddities, minor loves and minor interests,
objects trifling, and perhaps ridiculous in themselves, and
yet were we at strict confessional, perchance, it would
appear that these pet-notions are as much heart-binders
as mightier things. For my part, I see nothing to be
ashamed of in the minute eccentricities of our wayward
hearts, restless minds, or fanciful idealities. I love to
see human nature vindicate itself, however quaintly. It
is a proof of the ethereal essence of the soul that when a
man is entombed between four bare walls, he will, like
poor Trenck, cherish amity with a dungeon mouse, or
love, like Pellico, of prison memory, to minister to the
pleasure of a spider. Pet-notions, like every other
species
of the immense family of notions, are highly
reprehensible
in their excess. When instead of serving their
appropriate office of nooks for the play of our little amiable
humors, they are made the sole fields for the free
bounding
affections to revel in, then are pet-notions rendered
stocks wherein to cramp and pervert humanity. I would
fain believe that this is less the case than formerly. Here
and there only in the wide world, I ween, may the
woman
now be found whose love has yielded up its sanctity,
and become concentrated in a poodle-dog or a parrot.
The pet-notions of our day, I take to be legitimate, and
not seldom interesting. They are what they should be,
tiny curious leaves, peeping out comically from among
the more umbrageous foliage of our love-bowers.
Few things minister more generally and appropriately
to the pet passions than flowers. Beautiful provision does
Flora make for our little loves. I marvel not that many
are touched with an universal affection for the entire
contents
of the goddess's cornucopia; and, like Horace
Smith, merge in attachment to the delightful family their
partiality for an individual member, and exclaim, with that
fond bard,
Floral apostles! that in dewy splendor
Weep without wo, and blush without a crime!
O may I deeply learn and ne'er surrender
Your lore sublime!
But it is essential to a pet-passion that its objects should
be petty and single, minute, and, as far as may be, unique.
Accordingly those who love flowers at all, generally love,
with especial affection, a particular species. Could the
truth be known, I think the above-named Horace is
partial
to some bell-flower, he speaks so touchingly of the
Floral bell that swingeth
And tolls its perfume on the passing air.
But however that may be, it is an obvious fact that
pet-flowers
are remarkably common. Witness the tributary
stanzas of the standard poets; and observe how
individual
characteristics are shadowed forth even in
pet-notions
.
Who but poor Burus could have written so
lovingly
of a mountain daisy? His deep, tender spirit of
humanity
led him to cherish the wee bit flower as it did to
note the young castaway, with a sympathy surpassing
what gaudier flowers and more prosperous human beings
could inspire. Does not Wordsworth affect primroses
because
they are so common and grow wild? Mrs.
Hemans
,
methinks, would scarcely have spoken of any but
a pet-flower as she has of the water-lily; and of a truth, I
know of few similitudes whereby her own sweet self
can be better typified. Graceful, lovely, and upward
gazing is the lilyand so was the poetess. A friend of
mine is passionately fond of pinks. In summer
you may know him among a thousand, by one of his
little
favorites protruding from his button-hole or twirling
between his lips. There is an analogy between his
pet-flower
and himself. He admires neatness, order, and
symmetry of arrangement. He suffers if a picture hangs
awry, and wherever he is, begs leave to right its position.
A smile lights up his countenance whenever a man of
well-arranged exterior presents himself. In a word, my
friend is `as neat as a pink.'
There are those who have so little of their proper
humanity remaining, that nature furnishes no little
emblems
which please them by affinity; so, their pet notions
are confined to some trinket of rare materials or peculiar
workmanship. There's old Carvillewho with much
precision of character unites not a little of superstition
and technicalityone of that class so admirably
described
as `endeavoring to atone by microscopic accuracy for
imbecility in fundamental principles.' Carville's pet-notion
some time ago, was a very small and exquisitely wrought
death's head, which he carried in his waiscoat pocket, to
remind him, as he said, `of his coming change.' Now
he has the key of his tomb hung up above his writing desk
for the same purpose. I've heard of a gentleman who
carries a phrenological chart on the lid of his snuff-box.
This pet-notion ministers highly to his pleasure and
advantage
,
since all his brother mortals are, as soon as
seen, brought to trial, as his eye glances from his mull to
their craniums. Medals, coins, old china, and autographs,
are the pets of many.
The pet-notions of others are far more abstract than
these; they consist of words or phrases which have
become
,
from long use, inseparably associated with the
individual
.
They may have been first adopted from
caprice
;
but usually we find the person has, or fancies he
has, the tact of making them very expressive, or they
mean much in his estimation, suit his voice and air, or
indicate from
his
mouth a mystic profundity of knowledge,
wit, or sentiment. At all events, they are pet-notions,
as you may know from their frequent use, and the aim at
effect with which they are uttered. An acquaintance of
mine exclaims, `My dear fellow' every five minutes,
with an affectionateness which is touching in the extreme.
He knows it, and therefore has petted the phrase till now
he would as soon part with his own name as discontinue
the moving enunciation. A fashionable, conversable lady,
whom I have often heard talk, expresses her assent to
whatever views are promulgated to her by the term `
decidedly
,'
uttered with an intonation and nod
superlatively
impressive. It was a decidedly pet-notion of hers to
introduce this word continually into her vivacious
chattings
.
I know a poetical dandy who used to accomplish
the same object by the phrase `
true, true
.' The
articulation
of these words did not cost him much breath, of
which tight garments left him little to waste; there was
a dignity in their very brevity, and therefore were they
complacently adopted into his petty vocabulary.
My quondam friend in the city of  was a
fine-hearted
old Italian bachelor, who had sojourned years
by-gone
in this country. He spoke tolerable English,
except
the accent and nasal melody with which the words
were connected at long intervals. Now the choice of a
phrase for a pet was of no small importance to the good
signor. In the first place, it ought to be
a priori
, of
universal
applicability, in order to come in whenever his
verbal
memory should failan accident by the way, of no
unfrequent occurrencethen it should have a latent
wisdom
,
for my old friend prided himself upon his
knowledge
of the world, and delivered the most ordinary
expressions
with an air of oriental gravity; therefore must
the phrase be rife with meaning. Whether these
considerations
led to its selection, whether he gleaned it from
learned men of this land, consulted Dr. Johnson, or hit
upon it by a happy effort of his own genius, I cannot
36
positively declare; but assuredly never was there a
better
or more fitting pet-notion furnished foreigner from
the bounteous bosom of our blessed vernacular. The
first time I heard it from the lips of the signor, I was
lost in admiration, and not doubting it was the precursor
of some profound discourse, I composed myself to listen
with an emotion of thankful expectancy; the second time,
I was taken less by surprise, and noted with new delight
the gesture, glance, and preparatory
ahem;
by and by, I
became accustomed to it, and never ascended the high
winding stairs which led to the old man's apartment,
without an indefinite anticipation, or descended them
without a lurking lingering sense of my friends
pet-notion
.
I seem even now to hear him. I admired to go
thither with novices, to witness the effect. It was
astonishing
with what facility he introduced the phrase into
conversation, no matter what its nature or end. Whether
speaking of the latest political intelligence, of the
weather
,
of the opera, of dinner, of time past, present or
future
;
of this or that man, woman or child, of books
or beggars, of war or walking, of money or
martyrdom
;still,
still would he gravely, solemnly, fondly
reiterate, `My dear sir, human nature has always been
the same.'
The natural interest in the principle of life which
characterises
human beings, influences their pet-notions.
We instinctively love animationthe embodying of a
living, moving, self-actuating energy. Hence the most
generally cherished pet-notions are taken from the animal
world. And herein I again recognize a true humanity
in these foibles of the affections; if such they may be
called. I have found those who make an intimate of
some lone member of the feathered tribe, find
companionship
in one of the canine species, or tenderly care for a
steed, generally prove, in the double and best sense of the
term, clever fellows. I know much is said of the dearth
of domestic attachment, of the folly of bestowing so much
care on a brute, &c.; but, when not over-indulged, such
pet-notions are usually discoverable in whole-hearted and
susceptible beings. I have heard of an eccentric
Englishman
who petted an oyster many years, feeding it
with oat-meal till its size was prodigious. No less
cheerful
are the little back yards of the French metropolis,
because at noon and eve the white-capped housewife
provokes
the mocking-bird, whose cage hangs under the
vine leaves, by her endearing greetings, to echo every
note of the woodland. The favored dove that stoops at
sunrise
to the window, and quaintly turns upward her
sparkling
eye as she perches on the fair hand which has
nourished
her; the spaniel who leaps to hail the return of his
master, despised old bachelor though he be; the tabby
favorite
who purs forth her love in the lap of her whose
blessedness were otherwise indeed single; the pampered
gold fish in their glassy globe, and the froward kid who
looks in at the door,indicate to the reflective observer
that the freshness and expansion of humanity have not
departed from the dwelling; that love is there, albeit some
of its overflowings fall soothingly even upon the soulless
brute.
It was no small amusement to Shelley, at Oxford, to
sail paper-boats. Dr. Johnson used to save orange-peel
and feed his cat with oysters. Many a milliner's
apprentice
cherishes a box of mignonette, and the poorest clerk
can afford to keep a geranium in his windowof which
the feel of the leaf, says Hunt `has a household warmth
in it somewhat analogous to clothing and comfort.' A
man in Germany, once collected a large number of
ropes with which criminals had been executed; and a
monk passed years in attempting to gather all the prints
of the Madonna ever issued.
Vaucluse was as odd and withal as affectionate as any
of the students at the university of . I have
seldom
known a more singular pet-notion, or one more
fondly
petted than was his. He was romantic in the extreme,
and the mysterious appearance of his notion coupled with
a highly romantic era in its history, which I will relate,
combined to deepen the pride and interest with which he
cherished his pet. He was gazing thoughtfully from his
window, just as the sun beamed brightly upon the sill,
when bending his eye thither, from an aperture beneath,
he saw a young toad spring out and composedly seat
himself
in the genial rays. Presently an unfortunate fly
sailing languidly by, was snapped at, and devoured in a
twinkling, by the speckled intruder, and this act of
destructiveness
was repeated at intervals, until the shadows
darkened the sill, when the toad quietly retreated to his hole.
Vaucluse marked this for a white day in his monotonous
life. Already his heart yearned toward the
independent
fly hunter. He found something singularly
interesting
in his appearance and manners. There was a touch
of misanthropy, a grave contempt of the world, a
magistrate-like
dignity, a solitary quietude and an honest
bachelorism
about the toad, that chimed in with the student's
humor. He determined to adopt and cherish him; and
accordingly was at the window, to welcome his pet-notion,
as soon as Sol brightened the sill, and joining in the fly
hunt, he daily surfeited the stomach of his favorite till he
looked, for all the world, like a Dutch alderman. Things
were in this state, when Vaucluse was disturbed in the
midst of his feeding operations, by the abrupt entrance of
the last man he wished to see, under such circumstances.
It was no other than Snider, a medical student, noted
for his sarcastic drollery, and prematurely, by
complaisance
,
ycleped doctor. The toad-fosterer prepared
himself
for a wit-battering; but he looked upon the child of
his adoption and felt a martyr's courage nerve him.
What was his surprise to see his friend assume an
expression
of sadness as his eye rested on the toad, and
then look mournfully in his face.
What's the matter? he enquired.
Vaucluse, he replied solemnly, I'm sorry for you;
and he drew out his handkerchief.
For heaven's sake, explain yourself; this suspense is
insupportable.
Is it possible that a man of your intelligence has
suffered
himself to be deceived?
My dear doctor, do, do, I pray you, speak.
Know then, Vaucluse, that your unwise pampering
has induced the incipient symptoms of apoplexy in yon
poor toad.
36*
No; you are not in earnest
I am. Mark his distended sides, his gasping breath,
his heavy eyes.Vaucluse, he cannot survive the night,
but through the application of immediate medical aid.
Say not so. Can you, my dear doctor, can you cure
him?
If the case is unconditionally left with me.
Doctor, I fear to trust you; but there's no remedy.
Do what thou wilt, but do it quickly.
The eye of the young Esculapius brightened; the toad
was his first patient. Softly upheaving the sash, he gently
lifted the wheezing animal from his warm seat, and raising
him as if more nearly to inspect the gustatory organs, he
suddenly ejected from his mouth into the open maw of the
unfortunate toad, an immense quid of half-consumed
cavendish; then replacing him, he awaited only to see
him sneeze thrice, with a shudder swallow the pill, and
retire to his dark abode; then glancing at the confounded
and indignant Vaucluse, he made his exit, murmuring
the whileemetic and catharticlarge doseoperation
protracted resultgeneral reduction of the system.
Why need I relate the vigils of a romantic student who
vainly watches for the coming of his pet-notion? Suffice
it to say that days, weeks, nay a whole month flew by, and
the toad greeted not the eyes of Vaucluse. Hope
darkened
into anxiety, anxiety into dread, and dread into
despair
.
The solitary student observed the first monthly
anniversary of his pet's departure by unusual moodiness
and abstinence. When the sun kissed the white surface
of the window sill, he stood with a fixed eye, folded arms
and a frowning brow, looking upon its solitude. Did he
dream? Something like a toad's head seemed protruding
from the hole. He rubbed his eyes; and with what
emotions
,
I leave the reader to imagine, beheld something
very like a toad, the outline, the shadow of his corpulent
pet, slowly creep forth and drag himself to his old position.
The speckled skin hung flabbily, the legs were perfect
anatomies; the toad seemed in the last stage of a
consumption
.
In vain his feeble jaws essayed to seize their
prey. His eye gleamed brilliantly. Vaucluse tearfully
opened the casement, placed the daintiest flies in the open
mouth of the convalescent, and ere many days beheld the
bright colours revive upon the epidermis, the sides and
back plump heartily out, and the fly-hunt proceed more
briskly than ever. He once more rejoiced in his
pet-notion
.
LOITERING.
Philosophers
seldom deem the minor characteristics
of their kind worthy of discussion. Otherwise, methinks
they would have analysed a feeling of which not a few are
conscious; I mean the
loitering
propensity. Even the
poets, who are vastly more circumspect in nothing the
quaint things of life, have scarcely alluded to this.
Neither
Crabbe, indefatigable as he was in taking cognizance
of the veriest humors of our nature, nor Wordsworth,
bravely as he has persevered in showing up the more
simple
and native workings of the heart, have done justice
to the inherent disposition to loiter which belongs to some
men, as truly as their gait or their noses. Let no one
suggest that the topic would have been appropriate to
Thomson's Castle of Indolence. Your legitimate
loiterers
are the busiest men alive. Depend upon it their air
of leisure, though it may indicate the absence of certain
domestic
inspirers of activityproves any thing rather than
the absence of thought. Why, Addison was wont to loiter
in club-rooms, Irving in old English castles, and Charles
Lamb at book-stalls. The Spectator, Sketch-Book, and
Elia, prove that they did not loiter in vain. Taste and
circumstances combine to influence our habits of loitering.
The young physician loiters in the druggist's shop, the
coxcomb in the street, and the poet by the river's side.
Loiterers of some kind and in some degree are we all,
superlatively busy and time-saving as we may
complacently
think ourselves.
There is no little philosophy in loitering. The driving
creatures who are ceaselessly on the move, brushing by
you with a smile of recognition which habit has
stereotyped
on their countenances, and a nod which says, How
d' ye do, and good b' ye at the same time, know none
of the true zest of life, save the little modicum which is
involved
in mere locomotion. They are like certain
poetasters
who in the race of rhyme, linger not for ideas.
What to them are the border roses and beautiful vistas of
rural pathways, or the heart-stirring faces and rich
print-shop
windows of the metropolis? Like Young Rapid, their
watch-word is
keep moving;
and as to by way thoughts
or observations, they'll none of them. Now, consider
how much of the pleasure of life is contingent, and how
little direct. In pressing ardently onward to a much
desired
goal, we, in a manner, prepare ourselves for
disappointment
.
But the flower that smiles up to us unbidden
from the hedge, the splendid prospect suddenly
encountered
,
the
en passant
greetingthese are thrice enlivening
because expected.
Fertilizing and auspicious as is the energetic play of
all the faculties, there is a deep wisdom in allowing the
mind to lie fallow. Like the soil thus exposed to the
grateful agencies of nature and its own self-evolved
energy
,
its productiveness is eventually enhanced. Amid the
exciting elements in which we live, there is a little danger
of a dearth of action. And if one would press on with
secure intelligence, let him sometimes loiter to scrutinize
and meditate, let him behold what is
around
as well as
before
him. Oh, it is true philosophy, in such a shadowy
world as ours, to linger momentarily over every joy-beam,
were it only to garner up its blessedness in our memories!
It is, after all, by dribblets that good comes to us; and
thus only can we happily imbibe it to any great degree.
A lover of books unless thoroughly imbued with the
spirit of Dominie Sampson, feels rather oppressed than
inspired on first entering an immense library. Yet such
a one may lounge an hour over a bookseller's counter, or
scan the pages of a racy magazine, enjoying the while a
mood the most calmly pleasurable. In this, as in many
other respects, there is a coincidence between the
influences
of art and literature. To one whose love of the
beautiful is passionate and keen, there is something
oppressive
in the aspect of a well-stocked gallery, while an
artist's sanctum proves a delightful resort; and a fine
parlour
picture, accidentally fallen in with, is productive of
unalloyed delight. A single congenial volume represents
to the imaginative mind the idea of literature; and a sketch
or statue is an eloquent symbol of art. There is a
philosophical
principle involved in these facts. The truth is, the
feelings of a man of ideal and susceptible temperament
and these characteristics are rarely disunitedare as
delicate as they are vivid. An imposing array of objects,
until singly and methodically scanned, by the variety and
richness of their suggestions, confuse and satiate his
sensitive
taste. Individually, unobtrusively, unexpectedly
addressed
,
his mind freely responds. The current of
feeling
thus receives an impetus, neither rude nor onerous,
but precisely strong enough to urge it into a thoughtful
and happy flow. Painters speak of a feeling for color;
so is there a feeling for the beautiful and the true in man,
which will not bear forcing nor feasting, but finds its own
gratification in self-possessed and spontaneous
observation
.
And thus the loiterers, on the world's highway, in
true enjoyment and actual good, not unfrequently outstrip
the most bustling and speedy of the careering multitude:
as the fowl can keep
Absolute stillness, poised aloft in air,
And fishes front, unmoved, the torrent's sweep
So may the soul, through powers that faith bestows,
Win rest, and peace, with bliss that angels share.
BROAD VIEWS.
I love
to steal away from a group of
system-worshippers
,
and commune awhile with some solitary, uncourted
being, whose scope of thought is unlimited by any
artificial
bounds, and the play of whose feelings is as free as
the mountain wind. It is like leaving the smoky
precincts
of a highland hut, on a summer morning, to stand
beneath the open sky and look forth upon the hills.
There is something as refreshiug to the mind's eye in
broad views of life and man, of art and literature, of facts
and individuals, of nature and society, as there is to the
bodily sense in majestic and boundless scenery. Broad
views are characteristic of mental elevation. To the
eagle's eye, when he hangs poised among the clouds, a
common arena and universal atmosphere blend the aspect
of earth and her myriads. By as certain a law, does the
human universe present a general and softened picture
to the intellect, sublimated by love and enlarged by
culture
.
It was once my privilege to walk through a renowned
repository of art, with a man of genius. I had
scrutinized
the various objects there preserved with
companions
of less
calibre
, who evidently prided themselves
upon detecting discrepancies of style and errors of
execution
.
My new
cicerone
, on the contrary, designated
beauties in works, which, as wholes, are held in light
estimation
,
and was continually directing my attention to
the lesser excellencies of the more celebrated productions.
This was the genuine spirit of noble criticism. Broad
views are as naturally taken by gifted men, as limited
ones by those of subordinate intelligence. You never
hear an ardent lover of art or literature commenting
con
amore
,
upon the minor blemishes of a production in which
genius is dominant. How do the aspirants for a
reputation
for gentility err by continually mooting the narrow
topic of rank; and how do the would-be critics mistake
their vocation by anxiously discussing etymologies!
Broad views are the legitimate result of experience and
general knowledge.
The author of some modern farce makes one of his
heroes, an accomplished Parisian duellist, console a
foreign
coxcomb whom he has challenged, by promising to
have him `neatly packed up and directed.' Somewhat
after this fashion, men appear to be dealt with in society.
Because an individual sees fit to connect himself with a
certain association, manifest an interest in a specific
object
,
or temporarily display, with more than ordinary
force, a particular principle of his nature, he is at once
classed, newly baptized with a party name, enrolled,
severed by an artificial distinctionin a word, `packed
37
up and directed.' An imaginary badge is affixed to him
as significant as the philactery of the pharisee, the star of
courtly honour, or the colored ribbon denoting academic
or knightly preferment. To all the general interests and
purposes of social life, he is proscribed. The usual
method
of answering the question, `What sort of a person is
?' is to designate the body political, scientific or
otherwise
,
to which the individual is attached. A fashionable
votary refers you to the `circle,' a religionist to the
`sect,' and an intellectualist, to the `school;' each
`packs up and directs' that most diverse, spontaneous,
and free of human resultscharacter, according to his
whim.
Classification is doubtless very applicable to minerals
and plants, and labels have been found very useful in
pharmacy. The inert, unalterable, fixed qualities of
matter may be designated by a specific or generic name,
may be `packed up and directed:' but the idea of so
disposing of human beingsof indicating the endless
modifications of feeling, imagination and thought, by any
epithet referring only to opinions, is preposterous in the
extreme. We have two brief, but most expressive terms
for the two most sublime objects in the universe; we
speak of
sea
and
sky;
but whoever thinks of taking
profound
cognizance of a particular wave, or devoutly
following
through the horizon a single, shifting cloud?
We regard the various movements of the deep and the
ever changing aspect of the heavens, with perfect
confidence
that the calm etherial canopy of the one still
stretches in beauty above, and the fathomless depths of
the other still sound on their way below. Why should
we be less just to man? Why believe that the deep
attributes
,
the great elements of his nature, are invaded by
the aspects his versatile being presents in a world of
circumstances? Why fix our eye upon the temporary
wave or the passing cloud, when there is an infinite
depth below and a glorious expanse above, which
shall endure when the currents of opinion and the
breezes of circumstance have died away on an illimitable
shore?
If Madame de Stal did not grievously err in her idea
that mankind are never alike but `through affectation
or design,' then this system of classifying is especially
unjust, and to form any definite notion of an individual
from the party-title affixed to him, is altogether
unphilosophical
.
Yet how perversely we cut ourselves off
from society calculated to inspire the deepest interest or
to exert a most auspicious influence, by the dominion of
some foolish antipathy! Hundreds are avoided or but
casually known because they labor under the
imputation
of being antiquarians, phrenologists, or littrateurs,
as if each and all of these characters might not be
cultivated
without absording humanity! Yet being `packed
up and directed' under these or equally effective terms,
men, ay, and women too, are rendered obnoxious to
no small portion of their fellow creatures. `Why do you
not converse with Miss A?' I enquired of a very
sensible lady at a party the other evening. `Oh, I'm
terribly afraid of literary ladies,' she replied, with an
ill-suppressed
shudder at my suggestion. Now the lady in
question had merely given to the public some lively
sketches of common life, such as would have been very
appropriate epistolary matter wherewith to entertain an
absent friend; and she was in the habit of talking
well of every thing in the whole range of topics, except
literature, about which she knew and cared no more
than was absolutely necessary to vindicate her claims
to ordinary cultivation. Yet was she thus
unceremoniously
`packed up' in that peculiarly odious box marked
`BLUES.'
This miserable habit of our times is vividly illustrated
by the manner in which those next most sacred things
to mortals, books are treated. Celsus reprobates the
idea of a fixed system of diet, on the ground that men
are exposed to every variety of influence and
condition
of body; and if books have been justly considered
as mental food, then may we, on the same ground,
advantageously
vary our reading. Yet there is scarcely
an individual who has not `packed up and directed'
numberless works, of the true value of which he is
altogether
unaware; packed them up in the iron casket of
prejudice, and directed them to the far distant region of
neglect.
`It is the spirit of the soul's natural piety,' says
a British divine, `to alight on whatever is touching
or beautiful in every faith, and take thence its secret
draught of pure and fresh emotion.' And so is it
the spirit of him accustomed to broad views, to
recognize
man, as such, however artificially displayed,
to blot out, at a glance, the label society has attached to
him, and behold the earlier and indelible signature of
nature;
that secret spirit of humanity,
Which, 'mid her weeds and flowers, and silent
Overgrowings, still survives.
THE END.